Democrats celebrated the unlikely victory of their candidate, Doug Jones, above, in  . ( .) The upset trims the Republican majority in the Senate to one. And it is a snub to   who backed Roy Moore, the Republican candidate, despite accusations of sexual misconduct with teenage girls. Earlier in the day Mr. Trump   and insulted a female senator as someone who “would do anything” for campaign contributions. Meanwhile, congressional Republicans are   and began work on  . _____ a battle cry for President Trump, has been adopted by strongmen across the world to silence critics and journalists.  . One country where “fake news” has been invoked is Turkey, which leads the world in the number of journalists jailed in connection with their work.  , a record number of journalists are imprisoned around the world. Separately, a statement by the U.S. ambassador to Britain, suggesting Mr. Trump  , has deepened questions about whether the two countries’ “special relationship” can withstand his tenure. _____ in Paris, President Emmanuel Macron of France, above center, urged the world’s political and business leaders to  . But accomplishments were limited. (Our international climate correspondent looks at a surprising factor in greenhouse gas emissions:   is simply wasted.) Separately, Mr. Macron will host Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany and other European and African leaders today to   in the vast and lawless Sahel region of Africa. _____  are out for “Star Wars: The Last Jedi,” which hits theaters this weekend. (Above, Mark Hamill as Luke Skywalker.) . “It has visual wit and a human touch, no small achievement for a seemingly indestructible machine that revved up 40 years ago and shows no signs of sputtering out (ever),” she writes. If you’ve forgotten who exactly is fighting whom, or don’t know what a porg is, you can brush up   before watching the new film. _____  by the love and feedback we received in the callout last week to readers of this briefing. We read every message and take all to heart, including this one: “What I would like to read about less? Don’t laugh: Trump.” (You can always reach us at  .) More broadly,   from readers’ comments over the last year, including advice on how not to get hit by a truck and how to stop procrastinating. , including Reddit and Kickstarter, posted calls for action to stop  . But the giants, like Google and Facebook, stayed out of the fray. : Indiegogo, the service that helped take crowdfunding mainstream, is  . deal to swallow most of Rupert Murdoch’s movie and television empire  , according to two people briefed on the matter.  of  .  at a natural gas facility in Austria left one dead and 18 injured. It raised concerns about tightening energy supplies across Europe. [ ]  has presented the White House with a plan that envisions at least two more years of combat against Islamist militants in Somalia. [ ]  filed terrorism charges against Akayed Ullah, the suspect in the attack on the New York City subway on Monday. [ ] is offering many of its at-risk citizens a pill, free of charge, that drastically reduces the risk of contracting H.I.V. [ ]  of Sweden condemned a string of anti-Semitic episodes in Gothenburg and Malmo, the country’s second- and third-largest cities. [ ] , the four-time winner of the Tour de France, was found to have abnormal levels of an asthma drug at the Vuelta, the Spanish race. [ ] What could make a   better? Whiskey. of the  . to get  .  the Cirque Romanès has delighted the French public with   about the Roma community: “It’s our way to build bridges between our culture and other cultures.” Barcelona’s Modelo prison  , and tough detention conditions. , the British designer Thomas Heatherwick   in New York, which was prefabricated in Italy. , the Oscar-winning actor,   in his new production of “Falstaff” for Opera Vlaanderen in Belgium. The holiday season involves many traditions. For Britons and millions of others around the world, one of them is Queen Elizabeth II’s annual Christmas Day message. The speech was first given 85 years ago by King George V, her grandfather. “Distant lands thrill to his ‘God bless you,’ ”  . “Farmers in Brisbane, Australia, listened to it in a Summer heat of 95 degrees in the shade,” a correspondent wrote from London, in apparent awe of the radio technology. “Passengers on Atlantic liners heard it as their ship plowed through Winter storms.” In 1952, the queen gave her first Christmas message, sitting in the chair used by her father and grandfather,  . According to the BBC, 100 million people heard the speech. Five years later, the speech was televised for the first time. ( .) The change occurred,  , after the queen was criticized as being too remote and surrounded by “tweedy” courtiers. “That it is possible for some of you to see me today is just another example of the speed at which things are changing all around us,”  .
BOCA RATON, Fla. —  Cryptocurrency exchange operator Coinfloor said on Wednesday it will launch a futures exchange for digital assets that will include the first physically delivered bitcoin futures contracts  next month. The new British Virgin Islands-based trading platform, known as CoinfloorEX, is aimed at hedge funds, proprietary trading firms and sophisticated retail investors, as well as cryptocurrency miners, Mark Lamb, co-founder of Coinfloor, said in an interview. "When you talk to the liquidity providers, they all say the same thing, which is they want a physically delivered futures contract so they can hedge their exposure across exchanges," he said on the sidelines of the Futures Industry Association's annual conference in Boca Raton, Florida. Some traditional futures exchanges, including those run by Cboe Global Markets Inc and CME Group Inc, already offer bitcoin futures. But they are cash settled, meaning the actual cryptocurrency does not change hands. Many proprietary trading firms and large investors have voiced concerns that the cash-settled process can be manipulated too easily, as bad actors can attempt to move the price of the indexes or auctions on spot exchanges that set the futures prices in their favor, Lamb said. The first physically delivered contract launches in April. Coinfloor, which includes the closely held Chicago-based proprietary trading firm DRW among its investors, was started in 2013 and runs the largest UK-based cryptocurrency spot exchange in London and another spot exchange Gibraltar. (Reporting by John McCrank in Boca Raton, Florida; Editing by Dan Grebler)
TOKYO —  Four years after popular Tokyo-based bitcoin exchange Mt. Gox was hacked and went bankrupt, the case still casts a shadow over the regulatory regime put in place to protect Japan's thriving cryptocurrency market. Mark Karpeles, the French founder and former CEO of Mt. Gox, says he hopes to recoup the millions lost by his customers in the heist. That's now a possibility, given the surge in bitcoin's value in recent years to some 10 times its earlier value. "What I'm trying to do is to find the best solution," Karpeles said in a recent interview, "because I believe it is my responsibility as CEO of Mt. Gox." Mt. Gox still had about 200,000 bitcoins left in a separate storage location after 850,000 disappeared in 2014. Those holdings are managed by court-appointed trustees who have sold 35,000 bitcoins, raising 44 billion yen ($415 million) in cash to reimburse losses from the exchange's failure. Based on today's prices, the remaining bitcoins are worth far more than the estimated $620 million in earlier losses. The trustees deny claims that sale triggered a recent slight drop in highly volatile bitcoin prices. After Mt. Gox collapsed, Karpeles was detained for months before being released on 10 million yen ($94,000) bail while awaiting the outcome of his trial for embezzlement and data manipulation, charges unrelated to the hack. Mt. Gox was a wakeup call for Japan, though the relatively strong regulatory regime set up after the bitcoin dealer has not prevented further hacks. Earlier this year the Tokyo-based Coincheck exchange reported a 58-billion yen ($547 million) loss of a cryptocurrency called NEM due to suspected hacking. About half the world's bitcoin trading is estimated to be in yen and there are 16 licensed virtual currency exchanges in Japan, where bitcoin owners alone number 2 million to 3 million. That could grow to 10 million this year, said Yuzo Kano, chief executive for BitFlyer, one of Japan's largest licensed cryptocurrency exchanges. "Japan is now bitcoin's heart, the country that is at the center of its support," said Kano, who helped the government set up its licensing system and other regulations. Kano heads the Japan Blockchain Association and was recently tapped to head a new organization to beef up regulations, working with the Financial Services Agency. Financial regulators worldwide are scrambling to catch up with the boom in cryptocurrencies and Japan is treading carefully, seeking to minimize risks while maneuvering to attain global leadership and nurture entrepreneurship in the new financial technology. Bitcoin has been a legal form of payment in Japan since April 2017, and a handful of major retailers already accept bitcoin payments. Some governments, such as in China and South Korea, have adopted a more cautious approach, while others, like Switzerland and Canada, are wooing the "miners" whose high-powered computers process the algorithms used to create virtual currency tokens. The U.S. falls somewhere in between. There have been no arrests for the theft at Coincheck, which has acknowledged that it erred in keeping a stash of the digital money in what's known as a "hot wallet," within reach of hackers. Cybersecurity experts say large amounts of virtual currency should be kept offline, in so-called "cold wallets." The exchange is reimbursing losses from that heist and strengthening its security. So far, the cases seem to have done little to discourage Japanese, who have turned to stashing yen at home since banks pay near-zero interest rates, from dabbling in cryptocurrencies. Giant billboards and TV ads sing praise of Bitcoin. The warnings about buying at your own risk come in tiny print. A band called Kasotsuka Shojo, or "virtual currency girls," in stereotypical housemaid outfits, literally sings praise of bitcoins: "Let's go mining. Dig right there. I'm going to make money to pay my utility bill." Karpeles is hoping the arrest in July in Greece of a main suspect in the Mt. Gox theft, Alexander Vinnick, will help vanquish any lingering suspicions that he might have pocketed the missing bitcoins. A California grand jury has indicted Vinnick, a Russian, on allegations he used funds from the Mt. Gox hack for money-laundering, though it's unclear whether he'll be extradited to the U.S. or to Russia. Karpeles is not overly optimistic about tracking down the missing bitcoin.  His lawyers have portrayed the young French man as a convenient scapegoat for Japanese authorities eager to find someone to blame for an embarrassingly massive cybercrime. He denied any intention of embezzling funds. His defense team has argued that the money and data he is alleged to have handled improperly were used for company operations or actually belonged to him. Not permitted to leave Japan while still facing trial, Karpeles works at a couple of technology jobs, such as voice-over-internet-protocol and video-game development. Fluent in Japanese after eight years in the country, he appears on YouTube and on a Japanese online streaming video service, offering advice on cryptocurrencies. He likens how cryptocurrencies work, and the precariousness of their value, to a game of musical chairs — with about 10,000 people around each chair. "As long as everyone is dancing, it's fine, but if everyone wants to sit at the same time there won't be enough chairs," he said. ____ Her work can be found at https://www.apnews.com/search/yuri%20kageyama
The   said on Friday it had rejected an application to create an   tied to the price of Bitcoin. Within a few minutes of S.E.C.’s announcement, the price of a single Bitcoin tumbled more than 15 percent, to around $1,060. The price soon recovered some of the lost ground, however. The decision was a significant setback for Tyler and Cameron Winklevoss, twin brothers who  , or E.T.F., four years ago. An exchange-traded fund tracks an index, or basket, of assets but trades like a stock. The commission said it was rejecting the Winklevoss Bitcoin Trust because the markets where Bitcoin are currently traded are largely unregulated. The lack of such regulation, the commission said, raised “concerns about the potential for fraudulent or manipulative acts and practices in this market.” The price of Bitcoin has climbed sharply in recent weeks in anticipation of the commission approving the Winklevoss brothers’ fund, with the price of a single Bitcoin surging to a record high above $1,300. Bitcoin aficionados had hoped that an exchange-traded fund would help bring the virtual currency into the mainstream by making it available to retail investors through brokerage firms like Charles Schwab and eTrade. Several other companies have also applied to operate Bitcoin exchange-traded funds, and the S.E.C. could reach a different decision on those proposed funds. But the commission’s broad concern about the unregulated nature of Bitcoin markets suggests that an approval may be unlikely in the near future. “It seems as if the other E.T.F.s in the pipeline for the S.E.C. are facing the same stone wall,” Charles Hayter, founder of the virtual currency data provider CryptoCompare, said on Friday. The commission   that Bitcoin was “still in the relatively early stages of its development and that, over time, regulated Bitcoin-related markets of significant size may develop.” The commission added that it could reconsider a Bitcoin exchange-traded fund if more mature markets developed. Tyler Winklevoss said that he and his brother were not giving up on the exchange-traded fund. “We began this journey almost four years ago, and are determined to see it through,” he said. “We agree with the S.E.C. that regulation and oversight are important to the health of any marketplace and the safety of all investors.” The twins rose to fame through their legal tussles with Mark Zuckerberg, the founder of Facebook. More recently, the brothers have   and have dedicated themselves to promoting the virtual currency and bringing it into the mainstream. The twins already won regulatory approval from New York authorities for their  , where virtual currencies can be bought and sold by professional traders. The proposed E.T.F. would have been tied to the price of Bitcoin on the exchange. Most Bitcoin, however, are traded outside the United States, beyond the reach of American regulators. The virtual currency emerged in 2009 and was celebrated for its ability to circumvent government authorities. Since then, Bitcoin has gained prominence partly because of its use on shadowy online black markets, where it is exchanged for drugs, and in countries like China and Venezuela, where some citizens are looking to evade government oversight. Over time, it has become clear that Bitcoin’s growth prospects are probably limited if it is not easily available through regulated institutions to ordinary investors. Jerry Brito, executive director of the Coin Center, a virtual currency advocacy group, said that the S.E.C.’s decision presented a problem for the further development of the technology. “How do we develop well-capitalized and regulated markets in the U.S. and Europe if financial innovators aren’t allowed to bring products to market that grow domestic demand for digital currencies like Bitcoin?” Mr. Brito said in a statement on Friday. Many large financial institutions have mostly declined to invest significant resources into Bitcoin, because of the regulatory questions that surround it. But the same institutions have been   in the technological concept introduced by Bitcoin, known as the blockchain, which presents a new way of keeping track of all types of information.
SAN FRANCISCO — Russian and Venezuelan officials are hoping virtual currencies can help their countries make an end run around American sanctions. Both governments, with ambitions to create state-sponsored cryptocurrencies, are looking to take advantage of the promise that Bitcoin introduced to the world financial system: a new kind of money and financial infrastructure, outside the control of any central authority, particularly the United States. The Russian and Venezuelan plans may sound outlandish, even in the financial Wild West of Bitcoin and its online competitors. But they underscore how the rise of virtual currencies is pushing governments around the world to rethink the most basic elements of their own currencies and financial infrastructure. What has seemed like a fringe concept is starting to gain some level of acceptance in global finance. Several of the largest central banks in the world, including the   and the  , have said they are looking at using the technology introduced by Bitcoin to track and issue their own digital currencies. In Venezuela, the idea has come from the top. President Nicolás Maduro laid out a plan last month to create a homegrown digital currency known as the Petro, which would be similar to Bitcoin but backed by the government’s oil and natural resources. In Russia, officials under President Vladimir V. Putin have floated the idea of a Bitcoin-like crypto ruble. “When it comes to state-sensitive types of activities, this instrument suits us very well,” one of Mr. Putin’s aides, Sergei Glazyev, said last month in a conversation about the crypto ruble, according to      . “We can settle payments with our business partners all over the world regardless of sanctions.” Economists and virtual currency experts have given Venezuela’s Petro and the crypto ruble from Russia low probabilities of working in the way the governments seem to anticipate. That’s because Bitcoin and other virtual currencies are decentralized systems with no one in charge, while the Russian and Venezuelan plans would give the leaders of both countries a measure of control over the new currencies. That runs counter to some of the most basic concepts of virtual currency. All Bitcoin transactions are recorded on a ledger known as the blockchain, which is maintained by many independent computers. The system was designed that way explicitly to avoid central banks and large financial institutions. Just as email allowed messages to move around without going through a central postal service, the computer network maintaining Bitcoin records allows money to move around without going through any central authority. That would provide a good way to get around sanctions, which are usually enforced through regulatory and banking disclosure rules. But some central bankers have said that issuing their own currencies on some sort of blockchain could make it easier for citizens to use the money without going through intermediaries like banks and credit card companies. It could also make the records more resistant to tampering and hacking. In a  , a member of the German central bank’s executive board, Carl-Ludwig Thiele, said the bank’s “conceptual study shows that blockchain technology can be adapted to meet the current needs and requirements of the financial system.” “The prototype works,” he added. These projects, though, have been slow to move from prototype to working systems, and many officials and programmers have pointed to many technical hurdles that still need to be overcome. None of that has stopped Venezuela from moving forward quickly with its effort to create a digital asset that the government can control. Mr. Maduro introduced the idea on Dec. 3 in his regular Sunday television program. He said he had been monitoring so-called cryptocurrencies and had put in place plans to create the Petro, which would be backed by the country’s gold, oil, gas and diamond reserves. “To overcome the financial blockade, this will allow us to move toward new forms of international financing,” he said. Since then, the government has created an office of the cryptocurrency superintendent and appointed officials to run the operation. The Petros are set to live on a blockchain like the one Bitcoin uses, but will derive their value from the government’s natural resources. The link between Petros and natural resources could be similar to the backing that gold provided for most international currencies a century ago. The backing might counteract the sort of hyperinflation that the real Venezuelan currency, the bolívar, has experienced in recent years because of the government’s unbridled expansion of the money supply. The boldness of the Petro plan is in proportion to Venezuela’s  , which has officials looking for anything that could help. “The country is in a social crisis,” said José Ángel Álvarez, the head of a national association, Asonacrip, that has been working with the government on the Petro. “How do we manage to build trust? Open technology, clear rules that meet the attributes of the cryptocoin: decentralization, for example.” Mr. Álvarez said he anticipated that the first oil will be sold for Petros in the first half of 2018. But the link between the currency and the government’s oil holdings is likely to make it unattractive to investors, given the lack of confidence that investors have shown in Mr. Maduros’s government. There is a measure of irony in the government’s interest in cryptocurrencies. Over the last few years, Venezuelans have shown a growing interest in virtual currencies as a means of escaping Mr. Maduro’s government. An online marketplace known as LocalBitcoins has connected Venezuelans looking to buy Bitcoin and get their money out of the bolívar, which has steadily lost value because of hyperinflation. This year, the number of transactions in Venezuela on LocalBitcoins has risen tenfold, according to Chainalysis, a data analysis firm. The Venezuelan government has not been nearly as welcoming of this type of virtual currency activity. Randy Brito, the founder of the Facebook group Bitcoin Venezuela, said that in December he identified between 10 and 20 cases where people in Venezuela appeared to have been arrested for their Bitcoin activities — more than double the cases he had seen in the year up until now. In most cases, buying any sort of foreign currency is illegal in Venezuela. That prevents residents from sending all of their money out of the country. Mr. Brito, who left Venezuela in 2004 and now lives in Spain, said everyone in his group was aware of how the government was punishing its citizens for doing the same thing that the government was trying to do within the broader financial system. “The irony is in front of us,” he said. “They have been blockaded by the U.S., just like they blockade their own people from operating.” The Russian government has also not looked kindly upon its citizens’ use of Bitcoin and other virtual currencies. While the government’s policies have remained opaque, officials with the Russian Central Bank have talked   of people inside the country to virtual currency websites, and Mr. Putin has   of the technology. “First and foremost, this is an opportunity for laundering illegal gains, tax evasion and even financing of terrorism, not to mention the proliferation of scams to which ordinary people can fall victim,” he said in October. But Mr. Putin has indicated that he is open to potential uses of the technology that would be under his control. In June, he had a   with Vitalik Buterin, the creator of one of the largest virtual currency networks, Ethereum. Mr. Buterin was raised in Canada and has dual Russian and Canadian citizenship. A number of officials with the   and the   have dropped hints about the creation of some sort of crypto ruble. The efforts in Russia are much less urgent than those in Venezuela because the Russian economy is doing much better. But leaders there have been looking widely for any way to push back against American sanctions. The Russian minister of communications, Nikolai Nikiforov,   that a crypto ruble would be designed quite differently from Bitcoin, with no need for the mining process through which Bitcoins are released into the world. Such a currency would make it easier for the government to track and tax transactions, which is an advantage that other countries have spoken about as well. The authorities in the United States have long been aware that virtual currencies might be used to evade sanctions. David S. Cohen, a Treasury official focused on terrorism and financial intelligence,   that the American authorities were not seeing any widespread efforts to get around sanctions with virtual currencies. But, he said at the time, “these are adaptable actors who are drawn to ungoverned spaces and so may increasingly look to this technology as an attractive way to transfer value.”
New year, new administration and, soon, a new chairman for the  . Timothy G. Massad, the chairman, said he would step down at the start of Donald J. Trump’s presidency. His resignation comes after Mary Jo White, the chairwoman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, said in November that she planned to leave at the end of the Obama administration. Jay Clayton, a Wall Street lawyer who has worked on prominent public offerings, is a leading candidate for chairman of the S.E.C.,  , which cited two sources familiar with the matter. There are also other unfilled seats at both agencies, which means the Trump administration will play a significant role in shaping the oversight of financial markets. The president-elect has not yet indicated his choice for the top job at the C.F.T.C., and J. Christopher Giancarlo (the lone Republican on that commission’s panel) is expected to lead the agency in the interim. Mr. Trump has, however, named  , a Washington lawyer, as his chief trade negotiator. Mr. Lighthizer has long advocated   policies, indicating that Mr. Trump intends to fulfill his campaign promise to get tough on China, Mexico and other trading partners. The president-elect’s push for things to be made in America is creating unease among Republicans who view his stance as retrograde. Mr. Trump’s episodic campaign to expand domestic manufacturing nevertheless scored again when Ford said it would scrap plans to build a small-car assembly plant in Mexico. Mr. Trump had also threatened to impose tariffs on cars made in Mexico by General Motors, forcing the company to defend itself. Both developments show the enormous impact Mr. Trump is having even before he takes office but raise questions about how competitive   can be. There was also turbulence for House Republicans, who   to gut the Office of Congressional Ethics. After voting to eliminate it, they were inundated with angry missives from constituents. Mr. Trump also weighed in on Twitter to question their priorities. After a hastily convened meeting with Republican leaders, members emerged to say the changes had been scrapped. If a country’s currency loses its value or the government has removed the largest cash notes from circulation, where does one turn? With countries veering closer to isolationism and raising the likelihood of new barriers, where can one go to move money between borders with little oversight? Some appear to have taken refuge in Bitcoin. That has helped push the digital currency’s price to a peak last seen in 2013. One Bitcoin was going for about $1,025 on Tuesday — about 140 percent more than it cost at the beginning of 2016. Most of the people buying and selling Bitcoin are still from China — wealthy citizens have used it to evade government controls on moving money in and out of the country, Bitcoin specialists say. And the heavy trading on Chinese Bitcoin exchanges suggests that there are plenty of  , likely forecasting how the virtual currency might one day be used. — Jayesh Dubey, who tried to blow the whistle on a scheme targeting Americans run from a call center in a Mumbai suburb. India is now seen as a  , helped by a demographic bulge of computer-savvy, young, English-speaking job seekers, a call-center culture, and super-efficient technology. • The Federal Reserve releases the minutes from the December meeting of the Federal Open Market Committee, where officials   for the first time in a year. The records will be closely analyzed for clues about the Fed’s thinking and what is coming up this year.
Recently, my brother experienced a cryptocurrency windfall. Almost overnight, $300 ballooned into tens of thousands, and now he can remodel his basement. Maybe. I don’t know. I suppose he can if he finds the money lurking behind the math. Since the spring, I have furrowed my brow through two lunches, three dinners and half a dozen kaffeeklatsches during which my conversation partners made pronouncements about the ever-mystifying Bitcoin. They were certain of the simplicity of what I call “space money,” certain of its life cycle, certain of its dynamics. My mind, on the other hand, can manage only a few key words before it charges merrily toward free association: Bitcoin, blockchain, key chain, chain of fools, fools rush in, Salma Hayek, etc. Throughout these brain-blitz discussions, my boyfriend sat beside me and, I assumed, shared my skepticism. But then the impassioned talk would animate him, and I wondered if he, too, may soon invest. And I judged them all for it. I thought: “Why invest in something you can never hold in hand?” Faith in things unseen, with the stakes as high as they are — I couldn’t surrender to it. And that’s curious, because I’m a religious person: hopeful, faithful and forever looking toward the nothingness of sky knowing, in my bones, that there’s a “there” there. But with love, I was focused on something tangible. I could see what I was holding. The very flesh of it. And I knew it was substantial enough to warrant all of my beaten-down but unrelenting faith. I was holding someone who generated so much noise, in me and for us. He stimulated thought and conversation in a way that felt endlessly curious. He was insistent about everything: that people apologize, that he bring hot tea to his evening doorman, that deodorant and body spray are one and the same, that I drink more water. He was set ablaze by the political news ticker. He had dreams for this country and suffered no one’s apathy. He preferred winter to summer and took to snow like a child. When he painted — a leisure habit he was trying to incorporate into his everyday life — there was no leisure in it. He was fierce, self-deprecating and determined. He loved his family as I did mine: completely, proudly and with the highest priority. Whenever I placed a meal before him, he looked like a recent escapee from prison, wild-eyed and deliriously happy. His absurd physical comedy worked like a charm on me. And for someone born in the 1990s, he had an inexplicable love of jazz. When we first met, I was battling to extricate myself from a relationship with someone profoundly kind but with whom I was misaligned. Months after the demise of that relationship, I saw him again, at a lazy Saturday gathering of friends. Engrossed in an hourslong conversation, we ignored everyone else all afternoon until I let him walk me home. I knew he would ask me for a date before long, and, after twice declining in consideration of a friend who had once dated him, I could no longer resist. He felt too familiar to bypass. As if, despite having no shared roots, we had been growing toward this encounter all along. On our first date, I belly laughed multiple times. I thought of my friend Rebecca, who instinctively knew that the man who is now her husband was “it” because of a sidesplitting first dinner. On our second date, we lay awake on the cold cement in Joan of Arc Park until the birds began their morning repertoire. And, at the end of our third, he huddled beside me in a bus station, pressed play on “Try a Little Tenderness” and slipped his phone into his breast pocket, the music drifting between us like the softest and most fated stitching of time. Six months later, walking through Midtown amid the bitter November cold, we noticed a bedraggled man peering into the window of a pizza shop, retreating to the curb, and then returning to look through the panes. My boyfriend asked if he was hungry and pressed a sandwich into his hands. The man thanked us, but then met our gaze beseechingly and said, “How did you know?” I listened long enough to hear my boyfriend say, “We didn’t. You just looked a little tired,” before I turned my back and burst into tears. A month later, my boyfriend would say that this was the moment he fell in love with me. For me, it was just one of hundreds of times I fell in love with him all over again. Like the time he defended me against a critical friend. Or when he was waiting in my office one morning with a sly smile on his face and flowers in his hands. Or when he sneaked into my apartment to assemble a behemoth of an armchair. Or when he deferred to my expertise in conversations about education. Or when he fed my niece supper. Or when he capaciously took interest in my friends or childhood home, people and places to which he had no connection other than me. Or when he fearfully, but finally, said he loved me. Every time I introduced him to friends, I felt proud. He was magnetic, interested, interesting and always warm. To be fair, a month into our relationship, he said he was worried about the pressure my readiness for commitment might visit upon him. But I believed there was something between us that could not be replicated. I had a hunch, even then, that this union bore my sought-after truth — that we vibrated at the same frequency and would always grow in lock-step pace. Several months later, after a painful fight, we parted at the subway — I in sadness and he in anger. But moments later, he came bounding down the stairwell just as my train arrived, followed me into the car and said he felt sick the instant he’d left me. Over the coming months, he would say that we were his deepest love, that he had no reservations about me, just about his own readiness. Piteously, I would hear only the first part. For years before we met, I had been consumed by a numbness that utterly reduced me. The pain of leaving home to attempt adulthood was exacerbated by my inability to find peace in partnership. I tried to turn every relationship into a love that could replace the mighty one with which I was raised, but they left me feeling unseen or stagnant. With him, though, I felt alive. I felt like the version of myself I long assumed had been dead and buried. And I began to believe that I was meant to be paralyzed by fear throughout all of those tumultuous years so that, when he finally appeared, I would be free to love him. I started to understand what others had always described: the softening of edges that certainty affords us. All the things that might have troubled me about him — his inability to hear me when he was fixed upon a computer screen, his lukewarm interest in fiction, his occasional melodrama — could be set aside if it meant that I could keep him. For the first time in my life, I didn’t label our differences as damning. They were the space within which we divided, leaving room for us to yearn for each other, to be dazzled by our distinctiveness, to always want to draw the other closer. Everyone with whom I have discussed Bitcoin has affirmed that it is a system based on trust. These elusive wonder coins bear and accrue value because of the shared faith that miners and moneymakers place in them. And now, I’m kicking myself for not investing some paltry sum at an earlier date. All along, I thought I was holding something of value because I could see and feel it. But realness and value are products of shared and equal faith, no matter if in things unseen. I can’t find or visualize Bitcoins, and I will never understand how complex math brings them deeper into reality. But when people equally believe in them, they become viable. He and I, on the other hand, were doing our arithmetic separately, in each of our messy minds. And while I will never understand how someone could hold the full weight of me in his arms and choose to let go, I understand that his final calculus was different from mine. With Bitcoin, you know exactly how much you invest, how much you stand to lose, how much you own. Going into this — my hard-won, full-bodied love — I only knew that I had everything to gain. And I just thought that, if I could see it, feel it and know it to be true, it couldn’t possibly disappear. But between my brother and me, one of us now has a soon-to-be remodeled home, its reliable cemented foundation paid for by “space money.” And the other, palms bare, remains suspended in space.
SAN FRANCISCO — The   is on the hunt for people who used Bitcoin to evade taxes. The tax agency sent a broad request on Thursday to Coinbase, the largest Bitcoin exchange in the United States, asking for the records of all customers who bought virtual currency from the company from 2013 to 2015. The document, a so-called John Doe summons, said that an I.R.S. agent recently found three cases in which people were using Bitcoin to evade taxes — two of which involved Coinbase customers. The I.R.S. said that those findings — and Bitcoin’s relatively high level of anonymity — have led the agency to think that many more people are using the virtual currency for similar purposes. “The I.R.S. not only has suspicion that the John Doe class includes U.S. taxpayers who are not complying with the law — it knows that the class in the past included such violators, and very likely includes others,” the document says. The summons comes shortly after the Treasury Department’s inspector general   chastising the tax agency for not taking more aggressive action to curb “unlawful activities by those who use virtual currencies.” “None of the I.R.S. operating divisions have developed any type of compliance initiatives or guidelines for conducting examinations or investigations specific to tax noncompliance related to virtual currencies,” the report, delivered in September, said. The request this week would require Coinbase, a start-up based in San Francisco with funding from several leading venture capital firms, to turn over the identity and full transaction history of millions of customers — it had about three million customers at the end of 2015. But the company is already gearing up to fight the request. “We want to work with law enforcement — that’s generally our policy,” the company’s head legal counsel, Juan Suarez, said Friday. “But we can’t tolerate sweeping fishing expeditions. We are very concerned about the financial privacy rights of our customers.” The existence of the summons was   on Twitter by the financial blog Zero Hedge. The request from the I.R.S. appears to be the most sweeping single effort to track down people using virtual currency to break the law. In the past, Coinbase has received narrowly tailored requests for information about customers, and generally complied, Mr. Suarez said, but never something as broad as the latest summons. Coinbase and other companies that buy and sell Bitcoins are required by regulators to record the identities of people who buy and sell virtual currency on their platforms. The underlying Bitcoin wallets, however, are tracked by a decentralized network of computers that generally do not record the identities of the people involved in transactions. A Bitcoin wallet looks like a series of random letters and numbers, and anyone can open one without providing their identity. The most famous early use of Bitcoin came on the Silk Road, an online site where users could pay for drugs with Bitcoin, with the understanding that their identity would never be recorded. The documents filed this week indicated that the tax agency was interested in going after both large tax evaders as well as small-time Bitcoin users who might not be recording their virtual currency transactions properly for tax purposes. The basic tax rules for Bitcoin users were set down by the I.R.S. in 2014. The agency’s guidance said that people should treat their virtual currency as property, rather than currency, for tax purposes. If a person buys a Bitcoin for $200, for example, then sells it later when its value has risen to $400, the $200 in gains are supposed to be recorded to the tax authorities. Omri Marian, a professor of tax law at the University of California, Irvine, said that most Bitcoin users were probably not aware that they were supposed to record their losses and gains as taxable events every time they bought anything with their Bitcoins. “It may be the case that many people were not aware that what they were doing is taxable,” Mr. Marian said on Friday. “Are those the people the I.R.S. is looking for?” An I.R.S. agent, David Utzke, said in a document filed on Thursday, along with the summons, that he was already pursuing larger offenders. Mr. Utzke said he identified two companies that were buying Bitcoin and misreporting them with the I.R.S. as technology expenses. Mr. Utzke said both of the companies were customers of Coinbase. The companies themselves were not named in the document. Coinbase provides its customers with information about the gains or losses they make on every virtual currency transaction. The tax agency, however, said it was not getting the information it needed to determine whether Coinbase users were making the proper tax payments. “The risk/reward ratio for a taxpayer in the virtual currency environment is extremely low, and the likelihood of underreporting is significant,” Mr. Utzke wrote. “The characteristics of virtual currencies could enable them to replace traditional abusive tax arrangements as the preferred method for tax evaders.”
SAN FRANCISCO — Until recently, China was a center of Bitcoin activity while the rest of Asia looked on with little interest. Now, the tables have turned. The Chinese government has been clamping down on virtual currency activity at the same time that hundreds of thousands of Japanese have thrown themselves into Bitcoin trading, making Japan’s main Bitcoin exchange, bitFlyer, the largest in the world in recent weeks by some methods of counting. South Koreans have also shown a sudden interest in virtual currencies, though they have generally opted for Bitcoin competitors like Ethereum and Ripple. Trading has been so popular that two South Korean exchanges, Bithumb and Coinone, have set up storefronts in Seoul that people can visit to buy and sell in person. Since Bitcoin was created in 2009, it has become increasingly popular around the world because of its anti-establishment appeal — a virtual currency that is challenging governments and financial institutions. But in South Korea and Japan, the countries’ most important institutions have been leading the way. Japanese trading took off after the government approved legislation in April that creates the first national licensing program in the world for virtual currency exchanges. On Friday, the   that it was giving the first licenses to 11 exchanges, including bitFlyer. “Japanese people tend to be very conservative with their investments, but once they get triggered they go all in,” said Yuzo Kano, the founder and chief executive of bitFlyer. In South Korea, trading ticked up after the country’s largest company, Samsung, announced in May that it had joined a large alliance of global companies aimed at finding corporate use for the software behind Ethereum. Ethereum includes a virtual currency, Ether, but it is also software that allows parties to enter into what are essentially legal agreements, or smart contracts, involving the money. The South Korean government moved last week to curb some of the frenzy. Korean regulators   on Friday that new virtual currencies, being sold through so-called initial coin offerings, will be banned in the country. The regulators also said they would exercise stricter oversight of online exchanges. But trading in the most valuable coins went on after the announcement. (Regulators in the United States and Switzerland   on Friday to crack down on the offerings.) Companies in both Japan and South Korea have been experimenting with the blockchain, the technology introduced by Bitcoin that allows multiple parties to keep shared digital records. And a consortium of Japanese banks   that they were preparing to introduce a national digital cash, J Coin, that shares some qualities with Bitcoin. Even North Korea is getting in on the game, with   that people with ties to the government have been trying to “mine” new Bitcoins and to hack into virtual currency exchanges in South Korea and elsewhere. Digital money like Bitcoin, which exists outside the traditional financial system, could be useful for a country trying to evade financial sanctions. So far, though, virtual currency trading in Japan and South Korea has not been tied, in any significant way, to buying or selling things with Bitcoin or any of its competitors. Instead, interest in both Japan and South Korea appears to be linked to a longer history of speculative financial trading as a recreational pastime — and to the general interest in virtual goods. “Word just spreads really fast in Korea,” said Tony Lyu, the founder and chief executive of Korbit, a Korean exchange. “Once people are invested, they want everyone else to join the party. There’s been this huge, almost a community movement around this.” The interest in South Korea and Japan is picking up some of the slack in support of Bitcoin that has been lost to the crackdown in China. At various points in the past few years, China has been thought to account for over  . The government, though, has stepped in several times to cool the speculative fever. The latest measures appear to be the most serious yet. All Bitcoin exchanges have been   by the end of October. Some in the Chinese Bitcoin community believe that business will be allowed to resume after the annual meeting of the People’s Congress, the national legislative body, takes place in mid-October — but there have been no clear indications of that. The price of most virtual currencies dropped sharply after the Chinese government’s moves leaked out in September. But it did not put a damper on interest in Japan and South Korea, and the prices of digital tokens recovered most of their losses. The price of Bitcoin recently stood around $4,300, down 12 percent from the high earlier last month. But that was up about 50 percent from the low last month and still up more than 340 percent since the beginning of the year. Bitcoin has been used — most controversially — to buy drugs online and make virtual ransom payments to hackers. More recently, it has provided   through initial coin offerings. Beyond all that, though, it is a speculative asset. People buy and sell it because it is scarce — only 21 million Bitcoins will ever be created — and investors hope it will gain real-world applications in the future. Japan might have seemed like an obvious place for Bitcoin to catch on earlier. The anonymous creator of Bitcoin carried a Japanese name, Satoshi Nakamoto. But most people from Bitcoin’s early years believe that the person or people behind Bitcoin were not from Japan. Japan was also home to the first major Bitcoin exchange, Mt. Gox. But Mt. Gox was run by a Frenchman living in Tokyo, with mostly foreign customers. Perhaps more important,  , leaving it vulnerable to thieves who eventually stole most of the Bitcoins the exchange held for its customers — some $500 million worth at the time. The collapse of Mt. Gox in 2014 scared many Japanese people away from Bitcoin. But it also encouraged the government to move forward with some of the most far-reaching legislation in the world, which gave a sort of government stamp of approval to the market when it was passed in April. The legislation promises licenses to exchanges that follow anti-money-laundering practices, and defined Bitcoin as a valid means of payment. Trading took off almost immediately. Much of the interest at bitFlyer, the largest exchange, has been for futures contracts, which are not as popular elsewhere. When these are included in tallies, bitFlyer is hosting more trading than any other exchange in the world, according to data from CryptoCompare. The legal status of virtual currencies in South Korea has been less clear than in Japan. But Samsung’s decision to join the so-called   was enough of an institutional sign of approval for many Koreans. Corporations like Samsung are generally interested in using the Ethereum software without using the internal virtual currency, Ether. But the announcement set off a summer of feverish trading in Ethereum and a number of other Bitcoin alternatives. In recent days, the heaviest trading has been in a  , known as Bitcoin Cash, which can handle more transactions. Trading volumes have been amplified in both South Korea and Japan because many of the exchanges offer leverage, which amplifies both positive and negative swings. Jeff Paik, the founder of Finector, a research firm in Seoul, said the trading had been worrisome because it had been dominated by older pensioners, not tech geeks. These traders, he said, have been deciding what coins to buy and sell not because of the underlying technology, but because of the number of other people trading the same thing. “There’s no logic to it,” Mr. Paik said. “As long as there is an open market, and a currency to be traded, people will flock into it. It doesn’t matter which coin.”
NEW YORK —  Wall Street has been much more excited about the system underpinning bitcoin than the cryptocurrency itself, but the global financial industry has not yet been able to do much with the technology known as blockchain. Reuters has found several blockchain projects launched by major financial institutions that have been shelved, as development of the technology enters a hype-meets-reality phase. The casualties include projects by the Depository Trust & Clearing Corporation (DTCC), BNP Paribas SA and SIX Group, Reuters has found. These were among the wave of blockchain tests touted by the financial industry over the past few years, as firms bet the new technology would displace much of the sector's infrastructure, cutting out middlemen, speeding transactions and reducing costs for things like securities and payments processing. Yet as some projects were developed, companies pulled back for various reasons - from costs to industry readiness, underscoring that, for all its potential, blockchain is still in its early days. DTCC, known as Wall Street's bookkeeper, recently put the brakes on a blockchain system for the clearing and settlement of repurchase, or repo, agreement transactions, said Murray Pozmanter, head of clearing agency services at the DTCC. The project, which had successfully tested with startup Digital Asset Holdings (DA), was shelved because banks and other potential users believed the same results could be achieved more cheaply using current technology, he said. "Basically, it became a solution in search of a problem," he said. Post-trade services provider, SIX Securities Services, a unit of the group that operates Switzerland's stock exchange, has also decided not take into production a prototype built by DA for the processing of securities, SIX spokesman Jürg Schneider, told Reuters. "We wanted to go into another direction," Schneider said. The partnership with DA, run by former JPMorgan Chase & Co executive Blythe Masters, was announced in 2016. French bank BNP Paribas in 2016 said its securities services division had partnered with startups including SmartAngels to build a platform for private small businesses to manage their securities. The bank stopped work on the project, and will instead team up with other financial institutions on another blockchain initiative called LiquidShare, said a source familiar with the matter. "Creating an enterprise-wide robust blockchain platform requires the full cooperation of the whole post trade ecosystem," the source said. PROOFS OF CONCEPT The DTCC, BNP Paribas and SIX tests were among a barrage of blockchain "proofs of concept" announced with great fanfare by financial institutions. "A large part of the problem has been expectation management, or rather lack thereof by many vendors and large consultancies that made claims that could not be fulfilled in the time spans they had said on stage at fintech events," said Tim Swanson, founder of technology advisory Post Oak Labs. Reuters reported last week JPMorgan was considering spinning off its marquee blockchain project Quorum. In July a partnership between settlement provider Euroclear and startup Paxos to develop a blockchain service was dissolved. Still, other projects are moving forward. Pozmanter said the DTCC is still examining another project with DA and that it is close to testing a blockchain-based trade information warehouse set to launch next year. "We're still bullish on the technology," Pozmanter said. The repo test with DA "met all its stated goals" and led to a new project that DTCC is examining, said DA spokeswoman Vera Newhouse. SIX is working on a blockchain project with Nasdaq  and Australia's stock exchange ASX Ltd said in December that DA will help replace its registry, settlement and clearing system, in one of the most ambitious projects to receive a green light. (Reporting by John McCrank and Anna Irrera; Editing by Nick Zieminski)
Bitcoin has many cousins and competitors. None have grown more popular than Ethereum, a global computer network with its own virtual currency, called Ether. Ethereum is a global computing network operating according to rules defined by Ethereum software. Those rules allow the Ethereum network to be programmed to complete certain types of computing tasks, with every computer on the network completing the task in parallel to ensure it is done correctly. Generally the tasks involve money. The creator of Ethereum, Vitalik Buterin, has likened it to a global smartphone that can be programmed to operate according to the apps built on top of it. The apps are called Dapps because they are run by a decentralized network of computers. Mr. Buterin says he chose the name because it refers to “the hypothetical invisible medium that permeates the universe and allows light to travel.” He announced Ethereum in late 2013, but it didn’t go into operation until 2015. The Ethereum network has its own virtual currency, Ether. In the simplest sense, Ether are needed to pay the other computers on the network to complete tasks. It isn’t free to use the network. People have also decided to buy and hold Ether, betting that it will become more valuable as more people want to use the network and need Ether to pay for the network’s computing power. Mr. Buterin was a Bitcoin aficionado, and he was inspired by its success. But he set out to build something that could do more than Bitcoin: He wanted to build a system that would make it possible to program more complex financial transactions. The shared records of the Ethereum network — of every transaction and computation it has ever performed — are known as a blockchain, just as the shared records of all Bitcoin transactions are known as a blockchain. But Ethereum’s blockchain database is totally independent of Bitcoin’s blockchain. Let’s say two companies want to conduct a complicated financial transaction, like settling a stock option. Neither company trusts the other company to conduct the transaction on its computers. Both companies could hire a third party, like a stock exchange, to conduct the transaction, which is what they generally do today. But that forces them to trust that third company and to pay that company fees. With Ethereum, they can conduct the transaction on a shared computer that allows them both to check the records, ideally saving on fees. As this example suggests, Ethereum has proved attractive to financial companies that have to complete lots of complicated financial transactions with competitors they don’t trust. Many banks are looking at how Ethereum could be used as a central operating system for various trading markets, replacing today’s exchanges and middlemen. JPMorgan Chase has even created its own version of Ethereum, known as Quorum. Other companies, like Samsung and Toyota, have experimented with Ethereum as a way to keep track of products moving through supply chains that involve many players. Dozens of large companies around the world came together this year to create the  . The group is working to develop versions of the Ethereum software that are battle tested enough to be used in a corporate setting. The versions of the Ethereum software that companies are building will most likely be used to set up private networks that would be totally separate from the public Ethereum network and that would not use the Ether currency. Some people, though, are betting that these private networks will eventually be plugged back into the public network. Just as with Bitcoin, you can buy Ether from people who already own them on virtual currency exchanges. Most large countries have exchanges where a variety of virtual currencies can be bought with the local currency. Just as with Bitcoin, Ethereum are “mined,” or created by computers joined into the Ethereum network. These computers are in a race to complete the transactions and computing work on the network. The faster your computers, the more likely you are to win the race and receive a bundle of new Ether. There is generally a new winner every 15 seconds or so. It has not yet been decided how many Ether will ultimately be distributed, but the number is likely to be around 100 million. So far, 94 million have been distributed. As with Bitcoin, Ethereum mining serves a dual process of getting new Ether into the world while providing an incentive for people to join the network and help maintain the Ethereum blockchain.
The cycle can feel numbingly familiar: mass shooting, followed by politicians offering their thoughts and prayers, followed by others demanding stricter gun laws. So it is hardly a surprise that lawmakers from California responded to the mass shooting at a high school in Florida last week by quickly calling for more gun-control laws. Still, the comments from Senators Kamala Harris and Dianne Feinstein make the frustration clear. Speaking on  , Ms. Harris described looking at autopsy photos from shootings during her time as a prosecutor, suggesting that perhaps lawmakers should do the same. “When you see the effect of this extreme violence on a human body and especially the body of a child, maybe it will shock some people into understanding,” she said, adding: “We cannot tolerate a society and live in a country with any level of pride when our babies are being slaughtered.” Ms. Feinstein has taken to Twitter to renew her call to support an assault weapons ban, which she has co-sponsored with other Democrats. “How long will we accept weapons of war being used to slaughter our children,” she wrote the day of the shooting. “A generation of students has grown up with active shooter drills as the norm. They are saying ‘enough’ and I couldn’t be more proud,” she  . She also said she would introduce a bill that would require all gun purchases to be limited to those who are at least 21 years old. “If you can’t buy a handgun or a bottle of beer, you shouldn’t be able to buy an AR-15,” she said. Those calling for stricter gun laws took to the street over the long weekend too, with hundreds of women with Moms Demand Action   in Los Angeles and   in Bakersfield. • Companies like Twitter have been trying to eliminate automated accounts. And yet,   sent out hundreds of posts about   after the school shooting. [ ] • Top   executives, board members and other officials were aware of sexually predatory coaches for years, but did not take action against them. As a result, hundreds of young victims suffered. [ ] • It was just before 6 a.m. when officers maneuvered their sport-utility vehicles in front of a Los Angeles apartment building. A look inside  . [ ] • Even as millions of dollars flow in from two ballot measures, Los Angeles County’s   is getting worse. [ ] • Utility officials say preventing   will be costly. Should rural customers who live in high-risk areas have to pay more? [ ] • When prosecutors   with executing a scheme to commit election fraud, they singled out  , saying Russians repeatedly used the platform to sow discord in the United States. [ ] • A growing number of   are their putting research labs and other engineers close to wherever the boss sits. It’s because what they’re doing really matters. [ ] • The rich have always feared robbery and extortion. Now, big holders of  and other virtual currencies have become alluring targets for criminals. [ ] • The director of  Ryan Coogler, is an Oakland native. But there’s another connection to consider: The city is also the birthplace of the Black Panther Party. [ ] • The film smashed box office records over the weekend. [ ] • At the   in Los Angeles, you could see that the players actually cared — and that’s a sign of progress. [ ] • The   have signed   to an eight-year, $144 million contract. He was widely believed to be the prize of this free-agent class. [ ] •  , a Berkeley alum from Oakland, had some, uh, puzzlingly   at the Olympics. So how’d she qualify? [ ] • In a place as manic and transient as Los Angeles can sometimes be,   may be more important than you think. Simply mastering your neighborhood Ralphs can help you feel connected to a place. [ ] Are you still obsessing over Cronuts? Or cruffins, perhaps? Those are  2013. Behold, instead, the latest Instagram-ready food mash-up: the “Tacro” — a croissant-taco hybrid available at Vive La Tarte’s Ferry Building kiosk in San Francisco. “It started as a fun internal project,” Arnaud Goethals, the co-owner of Vive La Tarte said in an email. “We challenged our team to create a savory croissant to pair with their favorite flavors. After several weeks and many variations, the Tacro was born.” Mr. Goethals did not respond directly to a question about whether the cruffin and Cronut inspired his team’s Tacro. But he did note that there are three varieties: “pulled pork and pineapple”; “Chile chicken and avocado”; and “B.B.Q. jackfruit.” A breakfast Tacro, Mr. Goethals said, is also on the way. Tacros are available from 11 a.m. on, but be warned: Mr. Goethals said they usually sell out by 2 p.m.
Frank Yiannas has spent years looking in vain for a better way to track lettuce, steaks and snack cakes from farm and factory to the shelves of  , where he is the vice president for  . When the company dealt with   outbreaks, it often took weeks to trace where the bad ingredients came from. Then, last year,   executives flew to Walmart’s headquarters in Arkansas to propose a solution: the blockchain. As Mr. Yiannas studied their pitch, he said, “I became increasingly convinced that maybe we were onto the holy grail.” The blockchain — the buzzy, bewildering technology behind cryptocurrencies like Bitcoin — is starting to be applied to real-world problems like tracking pork chops, shipping containers and footwear with a speed and security not currently possible. The IBM-Walmart partnership is one of the biggest practical tests to date. At its heart, blockchain simply refers to a bookkeeping method that “chains” together entries so that they are very difficult to modify later. It provides a way for large groups of unrelated companies to jointly keep a secure and reliable record of their transactions. IBM is trying to position itself at the forefront of the heated competition for practical uses of this arcane idea. Walmart is just one of 400 IBM clients testing it out, and IBM now has around 650 employees dedicated to the technology. The most immediate business opportunities are in the financial world as a tool to track and trade stocks, bonds and other assets. But in the next week, Maersk, the global shipping giant, is expected to announce it is using IBM’s version of the blockchain to track the avocados, flowers and machine parts it carries on its enormous cargo ships. Last month, the government of   to trace the goods flowing through its ports. Yet success is far from assured. Rival Microsoft   that it was working with JPMorgan Chase and several other corporate giants on a system that competes against IBM’s, based on the virtual currency network known as Ethereum. Many banks are concerned that IBM could push them into a version of the blockchain that would lock them into IBM’s software. “We believe with 100 percent certainty that it’s going to matter,” Mark Russinovich, the head of Microsoft’s blockchain efforts, said of the technology. “It’s a question of where’s its going to matter and how it’s going to matter.” It was Bitcoin that first caught the attention of IBM researchers, and everyone else. Bitcoin, born in 2009, represented a novel idea in the financial world. Unlike, say, dollars or yen, Bitcoins are virtual tokens, unaffiliated with any nation. Anyone can open a wallet and receive Bitcoins — without providing any identifying information — and transactions are recorded on a universal ledger that is visible to everyone. Drug dealers have embraced its relative anonymity. And people who live in countries that strictly control their financial systems, like China and Venezuela, have used Bitcoin to store their money beyond the watchful eye of the government. But while the public focused on stories like these, geeks became fascinated with Bitcoin’s underlying structure and the communal way in which it was updated. That database was referred to as the blockchain because all the transactions were sorted into “blocks,” and each block was chained, using sophisticated math, to the ones before it, all the way back to the very first transaction — a structure that makes it tough for anyone to change the records after the fact. In 2014, a handful of IBM employees began building their own version of Bitcoin, known as Blue Coin, which could be used to track financial transactions, totally independent of Bitcoin. But it was a small, exploratory project with no real support inside IBM. “I was prepared to tell them to shut it down, that cybercurrency is not our role to play,” said Arvind Krishna, director of research at IBM. But a team kept working on the technology, changing the name to Bluechain and then to Openchain. And Mr. Krishna eventually invited his team to a meeting at IBM’s central lab in Yorktown Heights, N.Y., for one last chance to defend the technology. They explained that this was about more than just a currency — it was a new way of tracking shipments and transactions in supply chains of all kinds, from food to prescription drugs to diamonds. Because all the participants would be keeping their own live version of all the data, without a central authority, they could immediately see everything that was going on and trust that no one else had tampered with it. “That was the ‘aha’ for me,” Mr. Krishna said. “This was not really about digital payments, but establishing trust in transactions in general.” He called it “a technology that can change the world.” There are still many in the industry who are skeptical of the long-term significance of the blockchain concept. Doubters have said that it is, at best, a slightly more reliable way to track data, and at worst, a much less efficient method of keeping data than current ones that rely on central gatekeepers. But blockchain champions like to compare it to the significance of the internet, which provided a universal computing language for communicating seamlessly among networks. The blockchain, they say, could provide that universal language for valuable data and information. A few months after Mr. Krishna’s aha moment, his team presented the idea at an annual gathering where IBM’s top executives consider new technologies that could be major opportunities — or threats — to IBM’s business. Blockchain was the first subject of discussion, and the first that Virginia Rometty, IBM’s chief executive, gave the green light to. She turned to Mr. Krishna, the research chief, and said, “You run with this,” he recalled. She asked for a working version within two months. Her hurry-up response was a reflection, in part, of IBM’s eagerness to find new businesses to make up for the erosion of its traditional hardware, software and services offerings. The company has made progress with new products like data-analysis software and its Watson artificial intelligence software. But growth in new businesses has not yet offset declines in traditional businesses. In January, IBM reported its 19th consecutive quarterly drop in revenue, though some of that sales retreat was because of profit-draining operations the company sold off, like semiconductor manufacturing and industry-standard server computers. IBM has already suffered from being late to one of the biggest trends in technology today, cloud computing, where it moved slowly at first and watched the early market leadership go to Amazon and Microsoft. Today, Mr. Krishna said, “The first-mover advantage is even more important than it used to be.” After getting Ms. Rometty’s push on the blockchain, the IBM team’s first move was to make its software “open source,” meaning that it would be free and available for anyone to review and tinker with. IBM’s bet was that this would establish its technology as a de facto standard, and that it could make money by selling software and services that would sit on top of the technology. It was the chairman of IBM Europe, Erich Clementi, who personally pitched the concept to the top technology executive at Maersk. Like Walmart, Maersk had already been looking for years for a better way to trace the goods it ships around the globe. For Maersk, the problem was not tracking the familiar rectangular shipping containers that sail the world aboard its cargo ships — instead, it was the mountains of paperwork that go with each container. Maersk had found that a single container could require stamps and approvals from as many as 30 people, including customs, tax officials and health authorities. While the containers themselves can be loaded on a ship in a matter of minutes, a container can be held up in port for days because a piece of paper goes missing, while the goods inside spoil. The cost of moving and keeping track of all this paperwork often equals the cost of physically moving the container around the world. What’s more, the system is rife with fraud. The valuable bill of lading is often tampered with or copied to let criminals siphon off goods or circulate counterfeit products, leading to billions of dollars in maritime fraud each year. Maersk and IBM began working on a version of its software that would be open to everyone involved with every container. When customs authorities signed off on a document, they could immediately upload a copy of it, with a digital signature, so that everyone else involved — including Maersk and government authorities — could see that it was complete. If there were disputes later, everyone could go back to the record and be confident that no one had altered it in the meantime. The cryptography involved would make it hard for the virtual signatures to be forged. The first test of the system happened last summer and tracked all of the paperwork related to a container of flowers moving from the Port of Mombasa in Kenya to Rotterdam in the Netherlands. It went well enough that Maersk and IBM followed up by tracking containers with pineapples from Colombia, and mandarin oranges from California. The difficulty of making this work in the real world is that everyone at every step along the way needs to be involved, otherwise it’s unlikely to induce any more confidence than the old system. “You need to have something in it for all stakeholders, in order to get the whole chain going,” said Jakob Stausholm, the chief financial and technology officer at Maersk, who is leading the project. “That’s the difficult part.” IBM and Maersk have recently been seeking cooperation from customs authorities, freight forwarders and the producers that fill the containers. Just last month, Maersk and IBM began running their first trials with these partners involved, on shipping routes between Rotterdam and Newark. Not everyone has been so willing to buy in to the IBM approach. Many technologists who got excited about Bitcoin have said that the newer, corporate-designed blockchains — like the one being built by IBM — are missing one of the main elements of Bitcoin’s success, namely the extremely decentralized structure. Anyone in the world can join Bitcoin and, in effect, study its ledgers. But only a limited set of participants can gain access to ones like IBM’s. That could make them more vulnerable to attack from, say, a hacker who targets a few of the participants. Even though the IBM technology for tracking shipments is more decentralized than previous methods, “it still concentrates power in a handful of entities,” said Emin Gun Sirer, a professor at Cornell who studies distributed systems. The companies working with IBM have been less worried about these security issues. Almost all of them demanded that the system not be open like Bitcoin. While they are giving up some security benefits, the private blockchains can move faster than Bitcoin, which has been  . IBM has faced questions from companies worried that the tech giant has too much control over the system it is building and could make them dependent on IBM software for years to come. IBM tried to fend off this line of attack when it made its software open source in 2015. The foundation that is now in charge of the computer code, the  , has attracted many other companies that are now working on the project alongside IBM.  , the Bank of England, Kaiser Permanente and nine other new members joined. But the director of the Hyperledger Foundation, Brian Behlendorf, acknowledged that IBM is still the single largest contributor to the project. As a result, it has been an uphill battle to convince others that it is not simply an IBM project. “They have such a head start that it can leave the impression that Hyperledger is an IBM product,” Mr. Behlendorf said. “We are trying to tell a story about the other companies building on top of Hyperledger. That is emerging. It will take some time.” Microsoft has fended off this sort of problem by focusing most of its efforts on a blockchain that it had nothing to do with building, the blockchain behind the virtual currency known as Ethereum. This has already helped Microsoft move in on some clients that IBM is also pursuing. Bank of America, for instance, is   that will track the flows of money around trade deals. But IBM has taken an early lead. Its list of collaborators includes the likes of the London Stock Exchange and the Bank of Tokyo, and lots of companies outside the financial world like Maersk and Walmart. “This is the most well-thought-out project in the space,” said Mr. Sirer, the Cornell professor. Now all IBM has to do is get the systems out into the real world and show that they work. At Maersk, Mr. Stausholm said it could take five or even 10 years for that to happen, given all the partners — manufacturers, customs officials and farmers — that need to come together. “I really do believe in it,” he said, “but I don’t know how fast it will be able to take off.” At Walmart, Mr. Yiannas is more optimistic. His company has already completed two pilots with IBM — moving pork from Chinese farms to Chinese stores, and produce from Latin America to the United States — and he is confident a finished version can be put together within a few years. “I think this is our one best hope for getting it right,” he said.
After months of talk and hype, the world’s biggest banks have taken the first steps toward moving a significant piece of financial infrastructure onto a so-called blockchain — the technology introduced to the world by the virtual currency Bitcoin. The company that serves as the back end for much Wall Street trading — the Depository Trust and Clearing Corporation, or   — said on Monday that it would replace one of its central databases, used by the largest banks in the world, with new software inspired by Bitcoin. The organization, based in New York, plays a role in recording and reporting nearly every stock and bond trade in the United States, as well as most valuable derivatives trades. , which has been making a big push into blockchain technology, will be leading the project for the D.T.C.C. and aims to have it fully functioning by early next year. “This is a real tangible step into what could be a very different future for Wall Street,” Michael C. Bodson, the chief executive of the D.T.C.C., said in an interview. The announcement is one of the most advanced steps yet in Wall Street’s continuing effort to harness the technological concepts underlying Bitcoin. Financial institutions around the world have been fascinated by Bitcoin not because of the volatile virtual currency itself, but because it introduced a new way of executing and recording financial transactions without a central authority. All Bitcoin transactions take place on a global financial ledger known as a blockchain, which is maintained and updated by a network of thousands of computers around the world, similar to the way that Wikipedia is kept up by diffuse volunteers rather than by a single company. Wall Street has been drawn to the blockchain concept because it allows information to be recorded in real time without the bottleneck that central authorities generally introduce. The decentralized nature of the technology also makes it harder for attackers, or hackers, to take control of the network. The D.T.C.C. project will not use Bitcoin’s blockchain. Instead it is building something similar to a blockchain, known as a distributed ledger, which multiple financial institutions can update and view at the same time. Unlike Bitcoin’s blockchain, the D.T.C.C. ledger will be open only to invited participants. Mr. Bodson said the basic promise of a distributed ledger is that it provides “one version of the truth that everyone shares and everyone utilizes.” The new ledger will replace an existing database, known as the Trade Information Warehouse, that records information about every   trade that comes through the D.T.C.C. Credit default swaps, which played a major role in the 2008 financial crisis, are essentially bets on the success of bonds. The D.T.C.C. oversaw about $11 trillion in credit default swaps trading last year, or 80 percent of all trades in the global market. Banks rely on the Trade Information Warehouse to determine when payments are due and what size they will be. Because the database will be edited in group fashion, the hope is that it will provide a more streamlined and reliable source of information. Mr. Bodson said that if the database was successful, the D.T.C.C. could use the technology to move money rather than just record information. Over the last few years, most   to explore the potential utility of blockchain technology. This has gone to the highest levels, with some   onto some sort of blockchain. But while there have been endless announcements about tests and proofs of concept, almost no one has disclosed plans to actually use a blockchain or distributed ledger in the real world. Until now, the most discussed announcement came from the Australian stock exchange, which said in early 2016 that it had hired an American software company, Digital Asset Holdings, to build a distributed ledger for its back-end systems. The Australian exchange, though, has said it has not made a final decision on whether it will move to the new technology. The D.T.C.C. has been talking publicly about its interest in the blockchain for a while, and last year it announced that it had successfully completed a test of a distributed ledger database in its credit default swaps trading business. Mr. Bodson said that since then the D.T.C.C. had determined that a distributed ledger would be cheaper to run than its existing system. The D.T.C.C. tests were done using a distributed ledger technology created by a start-up, Axoni, that will also be involved in the project, along with R3, a consulting firm working with dozens of banks on blockchain projects, and IBM. “The fact that they are taking this as seriously as they are is indicative of the broad-felt sense in the financial community that this technology is here to stay,” Charley Cooper, a managing director of R3, said of the D.T.C.C.
The price of Bitcoin has hit record highs in recent months, more than doubling in price since the start of the year. Despite these gains, Bitcoin is on the verge of losing its position as the dominant virtual currency. The value of Ether, the digital money that lives on an upstart network known as Ethereum, has risen an eye-popping 4,500 percent since the beginning of the year. With the recent price increases, the outstanding units of the Ether currency were worth around $34 billion as of Monday — or 82 percent as much as all the Bitcoin in existence. At the beginning of the year, Ether was only about 5 percent as valuable as Bitcoin. The sudden rise of Ethereum highlights how volatile the bewildering world of virtual currency remains, where lines of computer code can be spun into billions of dollars in a matter of months. Bitcoin, the breakout digital currency, is also hitting new highs — one Bitcoin was worth $2,600 on Monday. But the Bitcoin community has struggled with technical issues and   among its biggest supporters. It has also been tainted by its association with   and  . Against this backdrop, Ether has been gaining steam. The two-year old system has picked up backing from both tech geeks and big corporate names like JPMorgan Chase and Microsoft, which are excited about Ethereum’s goal of providing not only a digital currency but also a new type of global computing network, which generally requires Ether to use. In a   of 1,100 virtual currency users, 94 percent were positive about the state of Ethereum, while only 49 percent were positive about Bitcoin, the industry publication CoinDesk said this month. If recent trends continue, the value of Ethereum’s virtual currency could race past Bitcoin’s in the coming weeks. Virtual currency fanatics are monitoring the value of each and waiting for the two currencies to switch place, a moment that has been called “the flippening.” “The momentum has shifted to Ethereum — there is no doubt about that,” said William Mougayar, the founder of Virtual Capital Ventures, which invests in a variety of virtual currencies and start-ups. “There is almost nothing you can do with Bitcoin that you can’t do with Ethereum.” Even though most of the people buying Ether and Bitcoin are individual investors, the gains that both have experienced have taken what was until very recently a quirky fringe experiment into the realm of big money. The combined value of all Ether and Bitcoin is now worth more than the market value of PayPal and is approaching the size of Goldman Sachs. Investors buying Ether are placing a bet that people will want to use the Ethereum network’s computing capabilities and will need the currency to do so. But that is far from a sure thing. And real-world use of the network is still scant. Bitcoin, on the other hand, has made inroads into mainstream commerce, with companies like   and Expedia accepting Bitcoin for purchases, along with the black-market operators who use the currency. The fact that there are fewer real-world uses for Ethereum has many market experts expecting a crash similar to the ones that have followed previous run-ups in the price of Bitcoin and other virtual currencies. Even during recent pullbacks, though, the value of Ether has generally continued to gain on Bitcoin in relative terms. Ethereum was   by a 21-year-old college dropout, Vitalik Buterin, who was born in Russia and raised in Canada. He now  , jokingly, as Cathay Pacific Airlines because of his travel schedule. The Ether he holds has made him a millionaire many times over, but he has generally avoided commenting on the price increase in Ether. Mr. Buterin was inspired by Bitcoin, and the software he built shares some of the same basic qualities. Both are hosted and maintained by the computers of volunteers around the world, who are rewarded for their participation with the new digital tokens that are released onto the network each day. Because the virtual currencies are tracked and maintained by a network of computers, no government or company is in charge. The prices of both Bitcoin and Ether are established on private exchanges, where people can sell the tokens they own at the going market price. But Ethereum was designed to do much more than just serve as a digital money. The network of computers hooked into Ethereum can be harnessed to do computational work, essentially making it possible to run computer programs on the network, or what are referred to as decentralized applications, or Dapps. This has led to an enormous community of programmers working on the software. One of the first applications to take off was a user-led venture capital fund of sorts, known as the Decentralized Autonomous Organization. After raising over $150 million last summer, the project  , and appeared ready to take Ethereum with it. But the way that Mr. Buterin and other developers dealt with the problems, returning the hacked Ether to users, won him the respect of many in the corporate world. “It was good to see that there is governance on Ethereum and that they can fix issues in a timely manner if they have to,” said Eric Piscini, who leads the team looking into virtual currency technology at the consulting firm Deloitte. Many applications being built on Ethereum are also raising money using the Ether currency, in what are known as initial coin offerings, a play on initial public offerings. Start-ups that have followed this path have generally collected Ether from investors and exchanged them for units of their own specialized virtual currency, leaving the entrepreneurs with the Ether to convert into dollars and spend on operational expenses. These coin offerings, which have proliferated in recent months, have created a surge of demand for the Ether currency. Just last week, investors sent $150 million worth of Ether to a start-up, Bancor, that wants to make it easier to launch virtual currencies. If projects like Bancor stumble, Ether could as well. Several big companies have also been building programs on top of Ethereum, including the mining company BHP Billiton, which has   to track its raw materials, and JPMorgan, which is   to monitor trading. Over the last few months, over 100 companies have  , including global names like Toyota, Merck and Samsung, to build tools that will make Ethereum useful in corporate settings. Many of the companies using Ethereum are building their own private versions of the software, which won’t make use of the Ether currency. Speculators are betting that these companies will eventually plug their software into the broader Ethereum network. There is, though, also the possibility that none of these big trials come to fruition, and the current excitement fizzles out, as has happened many times in the past with Bitcoin after big price surges. “I hope this is the year where we start to close the gap between the speculative value and the actual value,” Mr. Mougayar said. “There is a lot at stake right now.”
WASHINGTON — A manufacturing start-up recently announced plans to move into a shuttered aluminum factory in upstate New York, taking advantage of abundant cheap electricity from the St. Lawrence River. Instead of smelting aluminum, however, the company plans to turn that power into Bitcoins. Money is supposed to be a means of buying things. Now, the nation’s hottest investment is buying money. And the investment rush is raising questions about whether one reason for the slow pace of economic growth in recent years is that the nation is busy distracting itself. While Bitcoin mining may not be labor intensive, it diverts time, energy and capital from other, more productive activities that economists say could fuel faster growth. “It appears that much of our evolving digital infrastructure is devoted to activities, like the proliferation of cybercoins, that are worse than frivolous,” said James McAndrews, the former head of research at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York. By a wide range of measures, America has a productivity problem. The economy is growing slowly, and almost 20 percent of adults in their prime working years  . Americans who do have jobs are less likely  . Even the most basic kind of production is in decline.   and making fewer babies. Some economists see evidence that people are  ,  , and plowing a growing share of their time, capital and natural resources into virtual products like social media, games and the latest fad: virtual currencies. Bitcoin, the largest virtual currency, is a particularly voracious consumer of resources because new Bitcoins are distributed in a kind of lottery where each ticket is purchased with electricity. Bitcoin miners compete for the coins by submitting answers to difficult math problems. Instead of solving the problems, miners use computers to submit a flood of guesses. This can be lucrative: Each Bitcoin is currently valued at about $10,550. Believers insist it is a worthwhile endeavor. They describe Bitcoin as a superior currency that will eventually come into wide use, and they predict even broader applications for  , the  used to record ownership of Bitcoins and to verify transactions. But Bitcoin remains so hard to use that a major Bitcoin conference in January  . It is, in practice, a speculative investment, like gold. And Tyler Cowen, an economist at George Mason University, said mining gold was a better use of resources, because even if it lost value, it could be used to fill teeth. “Once the Bitcoin power is burned, it is never coming back,” he said. Colin L. Read, the mayor of Plattsburgh, N.Y., also sees it as a public nuisance. The city was guaranteed a fixed supply of cheap electricity as part of the construction of power-generating dams on the St. Lawrence in the 1950s. Bitcoin mining companies are plugging into that power supply like a swarm of hungry mosquitoes. Mr. Read said that Bitcoin mining now consumes about 10 percent of the city’s power, and that is forcing Plattsburgh to buy a growing amount of extra electricity on the open market, at rates up to 100 times higher than its base cost. Mr. Read, who is also an economics professor, said he would rather sell the city’s supply of cheap power to companies employing large numbers of people.  , which makes bottle caps, also uses about 10 percent of the city’s power, but it employs about 200 people. The mining companies? “They hire a security guard,” he said. “And a guy who comes when something breaks.” David Bowman, who describes himself as Plattsburgh’s first Bitcoin miner — “I started a long time ago, around 2014,” he said — started with a handful of computers. Now he has 20 machines. A few years ago, he rented a room in an old paper warehouse, where he runs the specialized hard drives around the clock. They sit side-by-side on wire racks, fans whirring to dissipate the heat. About half a dozen other mining companies have since moved into the same building. Mr. Bowman, who is from Plattsburgh, said he sympathizes with the mayor’s concerns. He is the only employee of his company, and he is presently a full-time medical student on the Caribbean island of Grenada. But Bitcoin mining paid his college tuition and it is paying for medical school. And he doesn’t see that Plattsburgh has better options. “The place needs all the jobs they can get,” he said, although his company employs no one beyond him. He does pay fees to an investor-owned company that operates and maintains the machines and has one employee. Other governments also are grappling with the merits of virtual currencies. Enel, the largest European power company, said earlier this month it would not sell electricity to a virtual miner, citing environmental concerns. “Enel has undertaken a clear path toward decarbonization and sustainable development and sees the intensive use of energy dedicated to cryptocurrency mining as an unsustainable practice that does not fit with the business model it is pursuing,” the company, partly owned by the Italian government, said in a statement. Some Bitcoin miners emphasize their reliance on renewable energy, but the energy they use might otherwise be put to other purposes. Consider the example of Quebec, one of the world’s largest producers of hydroelectric power. Local demand has flatlined, leading the province to consider exporting electricity to Massachusetts, which is seeking to increase the share of current power consumption generated by sustainable sources. But Quebec is now weighing that possibility alongside a wave of proposals from mining companies. Some American utilities, too, are hungry for new customers. Domestic demand for electricity is in decline as power-hungry industries, like aluminum smelting, have moved to other countries and  . “They’re thankful that anyone still wants to use energy,” said Robert McCullough of McCullough Research, an Oregon energy consultancy. And plenty of places are hungry for jobs — even the relatively few jobs that virtual mining brings. Massena, the town with the shuttered smelter, is about two hours from Plattsburgh. It also enjoys a guaranteed supply of cheap electricity, but it has lost several of its major employers, including the smelter and a General Motors factory. The New York Power Authority reserves 490 megawatts of low-cost power for industrial users in Franklin, Jefferson and St. Lawrence counties, the northern tier that includes Massena. The decline of local industry means only 52 percent of that power is currently committed, which is why officials were delighted when a company called Coinmint proposed to install 16,000 computers in the old aluminum building. The company, which is still negotiating contracts, told the power authority it would employ 150 people. Employers historically have created 30.5 jobs in exchange for each megawatt of low-cost electricity, according to the power authority, while Coinmint is proposing to create just new 10 jobs per megawatt. But 10 is more than none. “The plan is to get anybody here that you can,” said Steven D. O’Shaughnessy, Massena’s town supervisor. “I have said all along, I’ll take whatever I can.”
• Judge deals AT&T a setback in fight with Justice Department • Billionaire investor Steven A. Cohen lost a bid to seal a sex discrimination lawsuit against his investment firm. • Corporate leaders are discussing whether the finance industry can help regulate gun sales. • Walmart’s fourth-quarter earnings missed expectations. • Facebook is still facing blowback for an executive’s tweets about Russian electoral meddling. • Qualcomm’s revised bid for NXP raises questions about Broadcom’s pursuit of the company. The telecom company  between the White House and the Justice Department regarding AT&T’s $85.4 billion acquisition of Time Warner. On Tuesday, a judge ruled that AT&T was not entitled to those documents, saying the companies had not “made a credible showing that they have been especially singled out.” AT&T has argued that the Justice Department has unfairly singled out its proposed merger with Time Warner partly to stay in favor with the White House. President Trump has been a vocal critic of Time Warner’s news network, CNN, and said before the election that the deal should be stopped. The trial is set to begin on March 19. For the first time, and after much protest, public companies must report their employees’ median pay and compare it with that of the chief executive. The Dodd-Frank Act, passed nearly eight years ago, required the disclosure, and firms are now disclosing it in proxy reports for 2017. Companies, lobbyists and some compensation experts spent years criticizing the rule, arguing that it revealed little about pay trends and was of little use to shareholders. The Institute for Policy Studies, a liberal-leaning think tank, on Tuesday noted that Honeywell was the first United States corporation to release the ratio. The company’s C.E.O., Darius Adamczyk, had a total pay package of $16.8 million in 2017, which was 333 times the pay of the median employee. The rule allows certain companies to exclude some foreign employees from the calculation of the ratio. Honeywell excluded workers from several countries where pay is most likely lower than in the United States. “The 333:1 ratio that Honeywell is reporting most likely would be even wider if Honeywell took all its workers into account,” the Institute said. A federal judge in Manhattan, in a brief order, rejected a motion filed by lawyers for Mr. Cohen and his firm, Point72 Asset Management, to temporarily seal a complaint filed last week by Lauren Bonner, an employee of the firm. Mr. Cohen’s lawyer had asked the judge to seal the lawsuit, which alleges the firm underpays female employees and fosters a hostile workplace for women, pending the resolution of another motion to push the matter into arbitration. Judge Analisa Torres of Federal District Court in Manhattan said the request to seal the entire complaint was “not narrowly tailored” and was inconsistent with the “presumption of public access” to court records. Lawyers for Mr. Cohen had sought to seal the order because it contained details of other employees’ compensation packages. The lawsuit also detailed a testosterone-fueled “boys’ club” atmosphere in which men commented frequently on women’s bodies and belittled their abilities. Andrew writes: More from the column:  President Trump expressed some openness to  . The United States Treasury Department is flooding the market with debt. On Tuesday, the government sold $179 billion worth of debt. That’s been a regular question since the tax overhaul was signed into law last year. Analysts at Goldman Sachs in a note over the weekend shed some light on the answer. • “Companies have pointed to a modest increase in investment as one destination for the incremental cash flow from tax reform. Consensus estimates for 2018 capex have increased by $17 billion (3 percent) since the passage of tax reform.” • Last month 39 S.&P. 500 companies increased their dividend, while for the first since 2012 no companies cut their payments. • Buying back shares remains a priority of companies, Goldman writes. Over the past 2 ½ months, S.&P. 500 firms have announced $171 billion of buybacks, $67 billion of which has come this year, a 22% increase from the same period in 2017. By many measures, corporate earnings are the strongest they have been in the past decade. Goldman points out: • Companies in the S.&P. 500 are set to report that profit grew 15 percent last quarter. That’s the fastest pace since 2011. • The percentage of companies beating estimates is at its highest level since 2010. The percentage beating sales forecast is at its highest since 2004. But the stock reaction to S.&P. 500 companies either beating or missing expectations “has been muted relative to history.” The reason? Investors are more focused on tax reform and earnings forecasts for 2018, Goldman writes. Analysts have raised their 2018 earnings estimates for companies in the S.&P. 500 by 7 percent so far this year. Higher profit margins because of the lower corporate tax rate are driving much of the increase in this year’s earnings forecast. A point that becomes clearer by looking at 2018 sales estimates. Analysts have increased their revenue forecasts by only one percentage point and much of that increase comes from higher oil prices boosting forecasts for energy companies. Remember when the company said that it was changing its name from Long Island Iced Tea and shift its corporate focus to virtual currencies? Well,  : • Long Blockchain has named a new C.E.O., Shamyl Malik. • It plans to spin off its beverage division into the publicly traded Long Island Brand Beverages by June 30, and the company’s last C.E.O., Philip Thomas, will be on the new business’ board. • And last week, Nasdaq informed Long Blockchain that it   because its stock price had traded too low. Long Blockchain’s market cap as of this morning was $31.9 million, below Nasdaq’s threshold, after shares in the company tumbled amid the great crypto crash of early 2018. The company is appealing. Here’s why the company’s shares are down 10percent — their biggest fall since 2015 — after  : • The company earned   a share, while analysts had expected $1.37. • Operating income    , to $4.5 billion, thanks to charges tied to the closing of Sam’s Club stores. • E-commerce sales   during the quarter, a slower pace than in previous quarters. • Full-year sales growth expectations went down by  , to 1.5 percent to 2 percent, in part because of Sam’s Club and a curb on the sales of tobacco products. What the company’s chief, Doug McMillon,  : Days after Rob Goldman, its vice president of advertising, tried to clear up misconceptions about the company’s role in the 2016 presidential election, Facebook  . President Trump took the tweets as proof that Russia didn’t try to help him win, while critics said they  . Mr. Goldman apologized in an internal Facebook post. But his tweets — which   — suggested that Facebook executives   how central the company was to Russia’s misinformation campaign, according to Nicholas Thomson of Wired. More from Kevin Roose of  : Josh Hendler, the former head of tech for the Democratic National Committee,  , “It was an almost perfect example of Silicon Valley overconfidence and lack of sophistication when it comes to politics.” • One sign of how highly Google and Facebook value A.I.: The researchers sit near their C.E.O.s. ( ) • Is Google’s ad blocker for the Chrome browser good for the web? ( ) • Washington’s mayor, Muriel Bowser, toured San Francisco to promote her city’s tech bona fides. ( ) • And Washington has granted Elon Musk’s Boring Company permission to do a little digging. ( ) • Snapchat and Nike’s partnership during the N.B.A. All-Star Weekend highlighted the social network’s future in e-commerce. ( ) • Sony is planning an A.I.-based ride-hailing system for Tokyo. ( ) With Qualcomm   to  from $110, it may have finally found a way to beat back its persistent and unwanted suitor. Broadcom has said a higher NXP bid would be a deal-breaker (as of this morning, however, Michael hears that it isn’t clear whether it will walk away). The new offer may have come at an opportune time: I.S.S., the influential proxy adviser, recommended that Qualcomm shareholders vote for four of Broadcom’s six board nominees. (But that too falls short of Broadcom’s goals. The company’s C.E.O., Hock Tan, has said he would walk away if the entire slate wasn’t elected.)  Elliott Management, which campaigned against the $110-a-share offer, is on board with the new one. But will Qualcomm’s shareholders accept paying more for NXP? It and other hedge funds stand to be big winners from Qualcomm’s raised offer. that Elliott, Soroban Capital Partners, Pentwater Capital Management and Farallon Capital Management own 47 percent of NXP’s shares. • Albertsons plans to buy Rite Aid to better compete with Amazon, Walmart and Walgreens. ( ) • BHP Billiton’s C.E.O. will meet with Elliott Management to discuss changing its corporate strategy. ( ) • SoftBank   as part of any minority investment. But Patrick Jenkins of the FT ponders whether Masa Son can become  . • The marketing company Engine Shop has bought T Burns Sports Group, the consultancy founded by Terrence Burns, who worked on eight winning Olympic and World Cup campaigns, including Pyeongchang’s. ( ) • How Spotify’s privately traded shares could influence its direct listing. ( ) • The head of Arcadia, which owns Topshop, denied being in talks to sell it to a Chinese textile giant. ( ) • ValueAct has bought 5.4 percent of Merlin Entertainments, which owns Madame Tussauds, as U.S. activists continue to seek targets in Europe. ( ) • Temenos of Switzerland is near a deal to buy Fidessa, a British maker of financial software, for more than £1.3 billion. ( ) • President Trump   the Senate campaign of Mitt Romney, whom he once called “  in the history of Republican politics.” • Public support for the tax overhaul  , according to a survey by the NYT and SurveyMonkey. It has also made   about stock prices.   over whether the Office Management and Budget should get involved in tax rules. • The recent budget deal takes a step toward a federal rescue for as many as 200 multi-employer pension plans. ( ) • The Office of Financial Research, Washington’s financial storm forecaster, is foundering. ( ) • How Michael Cohen, Mr. Trump’s longtime personal lawyer, used intimidation, hush money and a top tabloid publisher to protect his client. ( ) • The Trump administration is continuing to dismantle Obama-era L.G.B.T. policies. ( ) • The California assemblywoman Cristina Garcia, a leading voice for #MeToo, has been accused of sexually harassing staffers. ( ) An estimated   in the U.S., and $235 million in four-day sales. The fifth-biggest U.S. box office opening ever, not adjusted for inflation. An estimated $387 million in sales worldwide. (Oh, and a soundtrack that’s  .) Has Disney’s latest blockbuster   that there aren’t big audiences for movies with largely black casts? More from Brooks Barnes of the NYT: What effect would Wakanda opening itself up have for global trade balances? What would happen to mining stocks? How would its immigration policies work if the country’s ruler says, “In times of crisis, the wise build bridges?” Does Wakanda have its own blockchain technology? Investors have been held hostage until they paid Bitcoin or Ether ransoms worth millions of dollars, as criminals   at the crypto-rich. The worst part: There’s no way to halt or reverse a Bitcoin transfer. Solutions discussed at a recent conference included hiring security, setting up “duress wallets” to fool hostage takers, and keeping Bitcoin fortunes secret.  China’s crackdown on crypto   there. Prime Shipping Foundation, which struck the first freight deal settled in Bitcoin,   And retail investors   if the digital money markets collapsed, according to S. & P. Global Ratings. About $11,490, according to  • Mark Carney of the Bank of England says Bitcoin has failed as a currency. ( ) • Paul Singer of Elliott Management called virtual currencies “one of the most brilliant scams in history.” ( ) • Sarah Tavel of Benchmark thinks digital money has a bright future but many I.C.O.s are “complete scams.” ( ) • John Flint, HSBC’s incoming C.E.O., is a virtual currency skeptic too. ( ) • Deutsche Bank is cutting 250 to 500 investment banking jobs, unnamed sources say. ( ) •  , Citibank’s global head of foreign exchange solutions, is stepping down after 38 years at the bank. He’ll be replaced by Sam Hewson. ( ) • HSBC’s full-year results missed expectations, partly because of the collapses of Steinhoff International in South Africa and Carillion in Britain. ( ) • Private equity bosses face an uncomfortable choice between becoming corporations, potentially bolstering their valuations, and staying as partnerships to keep taxes lower. ( ) • WeWork’s C.E.O. doesn’t just want to lease communal offices. He wants to transform how people work, live and play. ( ) • Britain’s prime minister, Theresa May, is considering a contingency plan that would involve holding back billions of pounds in Brexit payments if the E.U. does not give Britain the trade deal it wants, unnamed sources say. ( ) • The European Central Bank has asked Latvia to freeze payments to its third-largest lender, ABLV Bank, after the U.S. Treasury Department said it may label the firm a money launderer for North Korea. ( ) • Fox News is planning a stand-alone subscription service, available without a cable package. ( )

SAN FRANCISCO — The creators of the famous Forbes rich list have made their first attempt to identify  . Yet the list that was published on Wednesday, right after major drops in virtual currency prices, inadvertently also served as a reminder of the fleeting nature of that wealth. While the list in Forbes magazine, which was assembled in recent weeks, identifies about 10 virtual currency billionaires, most of them were not billionaires by the time the feature went online on Wednesday morning. On Monday alone, the prices of many virtual currencies plummeted over 20 percent, before stabilizing on Tuesday. At the top of the list is Chris Larsen, a founder of the Ripple virtual currency. Mr. Larsen was   last month when Ripple’s price peaked, taking his net wealth to nearly $60 billion. Since then, the price of Ripple’s digital token, XRP, has fallen more than 80 percent. Forbes put Mr. Larsen’s wealth at around $8 billion, but the same holdings were worth less than $6 billion by Wednesday. Mr. Larsen is followed on the Forbes list by Joseph Lubin, an early investor in the Ethereum virtual currency network; Changpeng Zhao, founder of the virtual currency exchange Binance; the brothers Tyler and Cameron Winklevoss,   who are famous from their legal battles with Mr. Zuckerberg over Facebook; and Matthew Mellon, the banking heir who is now a major holder of XRP. The list is a reminder of how the biggest gains in virtual currencies have been reaped by a small number of early adopters — despite the early promises that virtual currencies could democratize the financial system and spread wealth more evenly. Nearly all of the people on the list either helped found virtual currencies or have been involved with them for years. Recent   among Bitcoin holders have found that it is significantly higher than in even the most stratified countries, which may sting many people who recently rushed into virtual currencies and are now sitting on losses. For early virtual currency adopters like the people on the Forbes list, the recent price declines are not catastrophic. The price of Bitcoin is still up 600 percent from a year ago, and up 70,000 percent from when the Winklevoss twins began buying in 2012. Identifying the richest people in the secretive and paranoid virtual currency realm is far from easy; some of it is guesswork. Mr. Lubin, whom Forbes pegged as the second-wealthiest person in the virtual currency universe, illustrates the difficulties. He told the magazine that he had begun selling his Ethereum tokens, known as Ether, last year to fund his business, ConsenSys. Because Forbes could not verify his holdings, the magazine put his wealth at between $1 billion and $5 billion before the most recent price declines. The normal Forbes billionaires list is easier to compile because the richest people in the world generally have most of their wealth tied up in stock holdings, which usually have to be disclosed for big public companies. With virtual currencies, it is not necessary to disclose your identity, and the system was created by people who were interested in protecting financial privacy. Many large holders of virtual currencies are loath to acknowledge their holdings for privacy and security reasons, and many people who are rumored to have giant Bitcoin stockpiles are not on the Forbes list. Perhaps the most notable omission is Satoshi Nakamoto, the mysterious creator of Bitcoin, whose identity has been guessed at many times but never confirmed.   that Satoshi, as the creator is known, most likely amassed about one million Bitcoins during the network’s first year, when few other people were mining new tokens. Those Bitcoins would now be worth around $7 billion. Others have publicly claimed to have large holdings without verifying those holdings. Brock Pierce, a former child actor and the leader of a  , has said he would donate $1 billion of his virtual currency fortune to charity, but Forbes said, “He refuses to provide documentation that proves he has anywhere near that much money.” The magazine estimated Mr. Pierce’s wealth at between $700 million and $1 billion. The list suggests that inventing virtual currencies can end up being less lucrative than investing in them. The magazine estimated that the inventor of Ethereum, Vitalik Buterin, is less wealthy than two early investors, Mr. Lubin and Anthony Di Iorio, who had previously managed his family’s patio-door business in Canada. And while three big holders of Ripple’s token, XRP, are on the list, the inventor of the digital token, Jed McCaleb, is not.
Howdy, Mike! How are you? I’m preparing to head to Minnesota for the holidays. On the plus side: I get to see the Mall of America. But, I’ll freeze. The high is expected to be -3 degrees.  Hello there! I’m headed to Fort Worth, Texas, to see my folks for Christmas. But more important, I’m going to experience five days of   and barbecue, because all I do when I go home for the holidays is eat like an Olympic weight lifter. Related: I hope Santa brings me an angioplasty this year. But enough about seasonal gluttony, let’s talk tech! : So there was more drama with cryptocurrencies this week, big surprise. First, there were the usual price swings — the price of Bitcoin soared to nearly $20,000 this week before crashing to around $15,000, and now it’s somewhere in the middle. And by the time people receive this newsletter, it’ll probably be nowhere near there. Right. But people who were introduced to cryptocurrencies through Bitcoin are now learning about the wild variety of other kinds of crypto tokens online. And so the biggest news this week wasn’t with Bitcoin but a variant called Bitcoin Cash — an alternative currency that was created a few months ago. This week, Coinbase, one of the largest Bitcoin exchanges, added Bitcoin Cash to its service. And that’s when things went crazy. The price of   to three times its original price. Coinbase had to halt trading, cancel some trades, and now it’s in the process of investigating what happened — in particular,  . You’ve been tweeting about this all day, so I know you have some thoughts. I have to admit, I’ve kind of gone cuckoo for cryptocurrency. It’s just so weird, lawless and interesting! If you’d have told 14-year-old me that I’d be into esoteric new forms of digital finance in my 30s, I’d have called both you and my future self a huge nerd. And a time traveler, I guess. So, a few things. First, the Coinbase thing is interesting because the evidence of the company accepting Cash appeared a few days before on Reddit, which gave some folks a heads up and the decision to invest in Cash ahead of the debut. Why does that matter? Glad you asked! Well,  , any currency that Coinbase decides to accept on its platform typically immediately goes up in price, because it’s one of the most popular exchanges and growing quickly among American newcomers. And, as we saw last night, that’s exactly what happened. Anyone who had the luck, foresight and inside information to trade on that detail probably made a lot of money. But is insider trading illegal? If we’re talking about the securities world of exchanges like the Nasdaq and N.Y.S.E., then yes, it is very much illegal. Don’t do it. But as many of our friends on Twitter pointed out to me, it’s not illegal to trade commodities on inside information, though perhaps it is unethical! And right now, we’re not even fully sure whether Bitcoin is classified as a security or a commodity. What a world.  What’s striking to me about this space is how lawless and reckless it is. There’s a feeling like in the 1990s dot-com era — that anyone can make it rich, that it’s a brand new space and anything is possible. It’ll probably end up in tears for a lot of people, but there’s also undeniable excitement. I 100 percent agree. What’s fascinating are the corollaries in other areas of tech, like with Uber, for instance. Often the argument is, “What we’re doing is not illegal because a framework of laws addressing what we do doesn’t even exist.” Though to be honest, I’m not sure that argument will always hold up in court. Speaking of Uber, I had expected that Uber’s future would brighten after they brought on a new chief executive, but things seem as grim as ever for the company. Europe’s highest court   and not a tech platform that simply connects riders and drivers. This is obvious to anyone who uses it — everyone thinks of Uber as a taxi — but the ruling has a practical effect: it means that Uber cannot use nonprofessional drivers and has to comply with other taxi rules across Europe. And it could affect how other “gig economy” companies — firms that, like Uber, rely on contractors to service other customers — operate. Is this a big deal for Uber? Like any wonderfully nuanced beat reporter, I’ll say “yes and no.” Yes, it’s a big deal insofar as it limits a certain type of growth for Uber in Europe, namely the company’s peer-to-peer model, UberX. That basically lets anyone with a working car sign up for Uber, flooding the market with an enormous supply of cars and growing the business immensely. It’s been a boon for Uber in the United States, and the company has hoped to spread that abroad as well. That said, some of Uber’s most successful markets are those in which the company is tightly regulated and treated essentially like a taxi service. In New York, for example, Uber is required to only use drivers who are registered with the Taxi and Limousine Commission — that is, cab and private drivers — unlike most of the other cities in the United States. And yet, New York is still a huge market for Uber, where they do quite a bit of business. So does it cripple the business? No, and there are other cities Uber can try to push its UberX option. But it is a bit of a rain on Uber’s money parade. What’s worse for Uber, in my mind, was that  detailing a history of espionage and corporate counterintelligence inside of Uber for years. It’s tough to come back from being seen like your ride-hailing company is full of Jason Bourne wannabes. Although to be fair, Jason Bourne is pretty cool. Do you think I could be like him some day? Ha-ha, no. Anyway, it’s a short week. The holidays are upon us. Can we just stop talking now? Yeah, I can hear the Tex-Mex calling my name. Peace!
LONDON —  , the online art auctioneer known for   to Martin Shkreli, has had a rough 12 months, including the bankruptcy of its parent company. Now Paddle8 is trying a new tack: merging with The Native, a Swiss technology and e-commerce company, and adopting the use of blockchain, the technology that underpins virtual currencies like Bitcoin. Paddle8 announced on Tuesday that it had taken an investment from The Native, creating what the two say is a partnership meant to adapt online art sales — and potentially more — to an age of wealthy millennials well versed in virtual currencies. Their first partnership will be  , which is meant to help introduce tech to online art and luxury sales and will draw on The Native’s Blockchain Lab division. A revamped Paddle8 will open this spring with services meant to go beyond art auctions into other luxury offerings. And the company will hold its first art and luxury auction accepting Bitcoin — already titled “Bidcoin” — on Aug. 18. “This is a way for us to show we can better align with a new generation of collectors,” Alexander Gilkes, a founder of Paddle8, said in a telephone interview. In 2016, Paddle8   in an effort to create a next-generation trans-Atlantic online auction house — but the marriage dissolved early last year when Auctionata filed for insolvency after serious questions about   came to light. “Last year was a horrible start to the year,” Mr. Gilkes said. Of the merger with Auctionata, he added, “There were very many salient reasons for doing it, but we didn’t see how the events would unfold.” Sergey Skaterschikov, The Native’s chairman, said he saw the benefits of applying blockchain technology, essentially an online ledger of transactions, to the art world. “A lot of the art trade is built on asymmetric information,” he said. “It was scaring a lot of potential buyers from the collectible market.” The Native will buy a 15 percent stake in Paddle8 for 8.5 million Swiss francs, or $8.8 million. The Native will also have an option to buy an additional 36 percent of Paddle8 for 24.5 million Swiss francs, giving it a majority stake. “The nature of the transaction actually solved for our reservations,” Osman Khan, another Paddle8 founder, said. “It really is a somewhat more cautious approach, after what we’d gone through.” Cameron and Tyler Winklevoss, the investors who have long been proponents of Bitcoin and virtual currencies, have advised Paddle8 since 2015 and had pushed the company to adopt blockchain technology. “We’ve long considered cryptocurrency as key to increasing transparency in markets around the world, including the art market,” Cameron Winklevoss said in a statement.
For the past year, chief executives have often talked about the new sense of moral responsibility that corporations have to help their communities and confront social challenges even when Washington won’t. In the aftermath of the school shooting in Parkland, Fla., that killed   — and at a time when Washington shows   — there’s a real opportunity for the business community to fill the void and prove that all that talk about moral responsibility isn’t hollow. Here’s an idea. What if the finance industry — credit card companies like Visa, Mastercard and American Express; credit card processors like First Data; and banks like JPMorgan Chase and Wells Fargo — were to effectively set new rules for the sales of guns in America? Collectively, they have more leverage over the gun industry than any lawmaker. And it wouldn’t be hard for them to take a stand. PayPal, Square, Stripe and Apple Pay announced years ago that they would not allow their services to be used for the sale of firearms. “We do not believe permitting the sale of firearms on our platform is consistent with our values or in the best interests of our customers,” a spokesman for Square told me. The big financial firms don’t even have to go that far. For example, Visa, which published   in 2016 espousing its “corporate responsibility,” could easily change its terms of service to say that it won’t do business with retailers that sell assault weapons, high-capacity magazines and bump stocks, which make semiautomatic rifles fire faster. (Even the National Rifle Association has said it would support tighter restrictions on bump stocks.) If Mastercard were to do the same, assault weapons would be eliminated from virtually every firearms store in America because otherwise the sellers would be cut off from the credit card system. There is precedent for credit card issuers to ban the purchase of completely legal products. Just this month, JPMorgan Chase, Citigroup and Bank of America   to buy Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies. To be clear: Those three banks won’t let you use your credit card to buy Bitcoin, but they will happily let you use it to buy an AR-15-style semiautomatic rifle — the same kind of gun used in mass shootings in Parkland; Newtown, Conn.; San Bernardino, Calif.; Las Vegas; and Sutherland Springs, Tex. Visa, oddly enough, is the card of choice of the N.R.A.: There is actually an   issued by First Bankcard, a division of First National Bank of Omaha. And Mastercard proudly announced last year that it was the branded card for Cabela’s, an outdoor gear megastore with a seemingly limitless  . Visa spokesmen did not reply to several emails seeking comment. A spokesman for Mastercard sent a boilerplate statement that expressed “disgust with recent events, including last week in Florida.” “Our payments network is governed by standards that have been established over time,” the statement said. “Chief among these is that we do not and will not permit merchants to engage in unlawful activity on our network.” He said the company would continue to talk to customers and lawmakers about its policies. If Visa and Mastercard are unwilling to act on this issue, the credit card processors and banks that issue credit cards could try. Jamie Dimon, chief executive of JPMorgan Chase, which issues credit cards and owns a payment processor, has talked about how he and his bank have “a moral obligation but also a deeply vested interest” in helping “solve pressing societal challenges.” This is your chance, Mr. Dimon. And here’s a variation on the same theme: What if the payment processing industry’s biggest customers — companies like McDonald’s, Starbucks, Apple, Amazon, AT&T, CVS and others that regularly talk about “social responsibility” — collectively pressured the industry to do it? There’s a chance that some of the payment processors would stop handling gun sales. Perhaps their voices would help push one of the banks to step out and lead? Is all of this a pipe dream? Maybe, but I spent the last 72 hours calling and emailing a handful of chief executives to discuss these ideas. None wanted to speak on the record, because it’s a hot-button topic. But all applauded the idea and some said they had already been thinking about it. A few, I discovered later, called their peers to begin a conversation. At least two executives said a reason that they haven’t been more outspoken yet is that they fear reprisals from the N.R.A. and other gun supporters — not just in the form of boycotts that could affect their bottom line, but also actions that could imperil the safety of their employees. Obviously there would be opposition. When Peter Thiel, the co-founder of PayPal, was asked at a conference about his former company’s decision to not do business with firearms merchants, he made his displeasure clear.   if I was still running it,” said Mr. Thiel, who left the company years ago and is a supporter of President Trump. Perhaps the biggest stumbling block to an approach like this are companies like Walmart, which has huge sway over the financial industry. While Walmart stopped selling assault rifles in 2015, it might look askance at any policy by a bank issuer or credit card company to limit the kinds of products it sells. Critics of using the finance industry to influence gun sales might argue that such a move would be discriminatory against gun retailers. But gun sellers are not a protected class, like age, race, gender, religion or even political affiliation. This would be a strictly commercial decision. Another critique is that it is impossible to prevent every shooting, no matter how guns are restricted. And the banks’ actions would affect millions of their own law-abiding customers, effectively dictating what they can and cannot buy. The most troubling aspect of having the finance industry try to restrict gun sales is that it would push the most dangerous guns into an untraceable world where sales would depend on cash. That’s true. All things considered, though, it would make it considerably harder to even find such guns. There are other sectors of the finance industry that could step up. For example, Lloyd’s of London is the favored insurance company for gun shows. It could pull out. None of this is a panacea. But it’s a start. It takes leadership and courage — exactly what these executives say they have. If they don’t want to back up their words with actions, the next time there’s a school shooting that prompts a conversation about gun companies, it should also include the financial complex that supports them.
SAN FRANCISCO — Floyd Mayweather, perhaps the greatest boxer of his generation, is not shy about using social media to display the wealth that his years of prize fighting have won him. On Facebook, you can find videos of Mr. Mayweather draped in diamond chains. Want to see him with blocks of $100 bills taped to his torso? There’s that, too. Recently, Mr. Mayweather has shown his appreciation for a new kind of money. In September, he told his 13.5 million followers on Facebook not once but twice that they should buy a new virtual currency known as the Centra token. “Get yours before they sell out,” he wrote above a picture of himself admiring the many boxing title belts he had been awarded over the years. “I got mine and as usual I’m going to win big with this one!” Mr. Mayweather is among the many celebrities who have recently endorsed an initial coin offering, the name for a hot but loosely regulated new method of fund-raising in which entrepreneurs sell their own virtual currencies to investors around the world. The boxer’s endorsement of Centra, along with a similar endorsement from the popular rapper DJ Khaled, lent a patina of credibility to a project that has ended up with more than a few problems, including a chief executive who does not appear to have been a real person and a shaky, fast-shifting business plan. Thanks in part to the endorsements, in just a few weeks Centra’s founders raised over $30 million from investors around the world. They finished their fund-raising this month, just before a grand jury indicted two of the three co-founders on perjury charges stemming from a drunken-driving case. Centra was one of the 270 or so I.C.O.s that have raised more than $3.2 billion this year, a 3,000 percent jump from last year’s total, according to data from Tokendata.io, which tracks coin offerings. Investors have been willing to pay real money for these virtual tokens because they hope their value will go up as fast as the price of Bitcoin, the best-known digital currency, has in recent months. Celebrities have helped stoke the I.C.O. boom. The  , the   and the soccer player  , for example, have all promoted new virtual currencies to their sizable followings on social media in recent months, offering legitimacy and attention to coin offerings that might have otherwise gone unnoticed. Mr. Mayweather, who has promoted three different tokens — Centra, Stox and Hubiits — has even taken to calling himself Crypto Mayweather in social media posts, a play on his better-known nickname, Money Mayweather. But the story of Centra illustrates that beneath the signs of mainstream acceptance, coin offerings still exist in a legal gray zone with few checks on the ambitions of young entrepreneurs. “It’s undeniable that a celebrity endorsement brings a new audience into the world of crypto currencies,” said Peter Van Valkenburgh, the director of research at Coin Center, a nonprofit that advocates for Bitcoin and related technology. “But I’m not certain that celebrity endorsements are doing a good job of bringing attention to the legitimate projects.” The original virtual currency, Bitcoin, is a digital token — with no physical backing — that can be sent electronically from one user to another, anywhere in the world. The network on which Bitcoin is stored and transferred was designed to operate without any company or government in charge, governed by a far-flung collaboration of volunteer programmers and computers that maintain all the records.  have taken advantage of the decentralized structure of Bitcoin and another popular virtual currency network, Ethereum. People can pay for tokens like Centra using Bitcoin and Ether (the currency inside Ethereum), and no financial authority needs to approve the payments or even know they happened. Coin offerings have also copied the decentralized structure of Bitcoin and Ethereum, and are riding on the coattails of tech industry enthusiasm for those currency systems. The Centra founders said their token would fuel a new virtual currency debit card and online market. Some venture capitalists have said these new tokens could provide a way to fund and support new global networks — like the next generation of the internet. But while Bitcoin and Ethereum have gone through years of public vetting (and still have plenty of critics), the new tokens being sold in recent months are unproven, and marketed on the promises of their creators. The creators of Centra are 26-year-old friends from southern Florida, Sam Sharma and Raymond Trapani. The company’s chief marketing officer, Robert Farkas, was recently given the title of co-founder as well. Before Centra, neither Mr. Sharma nor Mr. Trapani had any professional experience with the technologies associated with virtual currencies, or with the debit cards they were hoping to build. The primary business experience of Mr. Sharma and Mr. Farkas was at Miami Exotics, a luxury car rental business that the two built. Mr. Trapani’s   shows that he was also a credit repair specialist with a penchant for pictures of luxury cars and stacks of $20 bills. “You can sit and watch my life, or you can join my team and live a life like mine!” he wrote in  . The lack of experience in the virtual currency industry did nothing to limit the ambitions of Centra’s founders. In July, they put out a website and   that described Centra as an answer to the proliferation of virtual currencies. “Centra Tech has a brilliant solution, the world’s first Debit Card that is designed for use with compatibility on 8+ major cryptocurrencies blockchain assets,” the announcement said. Making up for the inexperience of the young men was an older chief executive named Michael Edwards, at least according to the Centra website at the time. The first cracks in the project appeared in early August when a programmer, Harry Denly,   that Mr. Edwards appeared to be made up. The photo on Centra’s website was a photo of a Canadian physiology professor who had no relation to Centra — and none of the details on Mr. Edwards’s LinkedIn profile, like his work experience at Bank of America and Wells Fargo, checked out. Centra initially threatened to sue Mr. Denly but then said the bad profiles were the result of freelancers who had hastily put together the company’s marketing material. The LinkedIn profile was deleted. The company has since removed any mention of Michael Edwards from the Centra site and elevated Mr. Sharma to be president. The company also deleted several other employees whose identity and existence were challenged on social media forums. “When I got involved, the website got cleaned up from A to Z,” Mr. Sharma said in an interview. Centra charged past these hiccups and began its token sale, got its endorsement from Mr. Mayweather (more on that later) and moved ahead with its plans for a virtual currency debit card. The debit card was described as a new product that would make it possible to spend virtual currencies anywhere Visa cards were taken. The company’s site showed Centra cards emblazoned with the Visa logo. There was one problem with this plan. The company had not been approved, or had even applied, to run a Centra card on the Visa network, a spokeswoman for Visa said. After The New York Times reached out to Visa this month, Centra took all the mentions of Visa off its website. Mr. Sharma then said in an interview that the company had shifted its strategy and was now planning to run its cards on the Mastercard network in partnership with a Canadian financial institution. He said this would not require approval from Mastercard because the Canadian institution would issue the cards. But a Mastercard spokesman, Brian Gendron, disagreed. “Centra would need approval from Mastercard for something like that, and we are not aware of any approval that has been sought or achieved,” Mr. Gendron said. Because Centra began raising money without going through any standard background checks, no one verified the company’s credentials with the credit card networks or other relevant authorities. A basic background check would have turned up the numerous run-ins with the law that Mr. Sharma, the company president, has had. Mr. Sharma has been sued in Florida and New York several times on allegations of unpaid bills and business deals gone sour. Twice, people have accused him in court of trying to fraudulently sell or lend them cars that he didn’t own, and twice he has been evicted for claims that he failed to pay rent. The landlord in Boca Raton, Fla., who evicted him, Steven Fern, said that after Mr. Sharma stopped paying the rent on his condominium, Mr. Sharma promised repeatedly that he would make it up the next month. “He stayed the entire time, literally until the day the police came,” Mr. Fern said. “It was a strange scenario, and we lost a lot of money.” Mr. Sharma said that these problems, a few years ago, had happened when he was “a kid.” He said the landlord’s statements were “not accurate.” For now, the bigger problem facing Mr. Sharma and Mr. Trapani is the perjury indictment by a Manhattan grand jury on Oct. 5, just a few days after Centra finished fund-raising. The charges stem from an incident last year in Manhattan, when Mr. Sharma was arrested early on a Friday in a white Maserati.  , Mr. Sharma ran a stop sign and had “a flushed face, a strong odor of alcohol on his breath and watery and bloodshot eyes, and was unsteady on his feet.” Mr. Sharma and Mr. Trapani both said during Mr. Sharma’s trial that on the night in question, Mr. Sharma had only had Sprite and one glass of pinot grigio, according to the indictment. “As defendant Sharma and defendant Trapani knew, the testimony that defendant Trapani gave was false, and the truth was that on March 24, 2016, there were alcoholic beverages other than pinot grigio on the table and the defendant did not order Sprite,” the indictment said. Mr. Sharma said that he couldn’t speak to the case because it was still going on, but that it should not have any effect on Centra. “I’m obviously not comfortable with that situation,” he said. “But it’s not that I did something so intensely crazy that investors need to worry.” He and Mr. Trapani both said they were moving ahead with their big plans for Centra, including more projects with Mr. Mayweather. Mr. Trapani said the company was connected with Mr. Mayweather and DJ Khaled through social contacts in Miami. Mr. Trapani said Mr. Mayweather was so intrigued by Centra’s technology that he wanted to be paid in Centra tokens, and wanted to be a partner for future business ventures. “He’ll do anything we ask,” Mr. Trapani said. “He’ll go shopping around Beverly Hills if we ask him to do it with this card.” The boxing champ understood their deal differently. A spokeswoman for Mr. Mayweather, Kelly Swanson, said he had been paid in cash for the posts and was not involved in any continuing relationship with Centra. She did not say how much he had been paid. After being contacted by The Times, Mr. Mayweather deleted his Instagram and Facebook posts endorsing Centra, though he left up a Twitter post. Mr. Sharma disputed the account of Mr. Mayweather’s spokeswoman and said the boxer had received Centra tokens. “We dealt with Floyd directly through my guy,” Mr. Sharma said. “It was a very direct, individual deal.” Representatives for DJ Khaled did not respond to requests for comment. Other celebrities have already learned the risks of associating with initial coin offerings. In September, Ms. Hilton endorsed a token known as Lydian Coin on Twitter, where she wrote: “Looking forward to participating in the new @LydianCoinLtd Token!” Ms. Hilton deleted the post after   of the founder of Lydian Coin, who had aimed to raise $100 million. Regulators have been relatively slow to crack down on problematic coin offerings. But the Securities and Exchange Commission did recently bring its first case against what it claimed was a fraudulent project — a relatively small one that collected a few hundred thousand dollars. For now, Mr. Sharma and Mr. Trapani are sitting on the $30 million that investors gave them. Mr. Sharma shared and proved his ownership of the Ethereum wallet where they are currently keeping the money. Assuming regulators don’t step in, Mr. Trapani and Mr. Sharma can keep the money, even if they don’t build anything. But they say that won’t happen. Mr. Sharma said Centra was planning to issue its first batch of debit cards this year, regardless of the denials of Visa and Mastercard, and would unveil its broader technology in November. They have already rented lavish offices in Miami Beach and hired several people. “I see us taking over as being the No. 1 company that people will use to use their crypto assets,” Mr. Sharma said, using an industry term for virtual currencies. “Once our proof of concept goes from beta to live, I think that we are going to take market dominance in the full aspect.” Some potential investors did not share Mr. Sharma’s enthusiasm and discussed their concerns on Reddit and other social media platforms. But those criticisms ended up having less of an impact than the social media nods from Mr. Mayweather and DJ Khaled. “What’s important is Centra is being endorsed and they have a product,”   “That’s what matters to investors!”
MEXICO CITY — With Venezuela suffering one of the most severe economic collapses of modern times, the beleaguered administration of President Nicolás Maduro announced on Tuesday that it had begun a presale of virtual currency backed by the nation’s vast petroleum reserves. The government, which had announced plans for the new digital currency late last year, said the initiative was a response to a financial crisis marked by a profound devaluation of the national currency, the bolívar, and quadruple-digit inflation. The country is suffering desperate scarcities of food and medicine, soaring crime rates and the collapse of public services and the health system. The crisis has driven hundreds of thousands of Venezuelans to flee the country seeking a better life. The Maduro administration hopes that sales of the digital currency, known as the petro, will help its treasury pay off debt and increase imports of vitally needed goods, as well as raw materials for manufacturing. Venezuelan officials also asserted that the new digital currency — the first to be issued by a nation — would allow investors to do an end run around sanctions imposed against their country by the Trump administration. These sanctions ban the purchase in American markets of new securities issued by the Venezuelan government, and outlaw business dealings with Mr. Maduro and several top administration officials. “For big problems, big solutions,” Mr. Maduro said Tuesday night at a ceremony in Caracas. “We Venezuelans are indomitable.” He called it a “cryptocurrency to take on Superman.” But many analysts and critics of the government did not give the digital currency much hope of success. “I just think it’s a desperate move by a regime that is increasingly isolated and has an economy that has spiraled out of its control,” said Cynthia J. Arnson, director of the Latin American Program at the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars. The Venezuelan government has said the value of the petro will be tied in some way to the value of a barrel of Venezuelan oil. But the Maduro administration has not given many details on how this pricing would work, and many investors have said they would not trust the government to faithfully maintain the link between the petro and the price of oil. “The petro will most likely suffer all of the same ills as Venezuelan debt,” predicted David Smilde, a sociology professor at Tulane University who has researched Venezuela for more than two decades. A spokesman for the United States Treasury Department warned American investors last month that the petro might still run afoul of the sanctions, telling Reuters that the currency “would appear to be an extension of credit to the Venezuelan government” and could “expose U.S. persons to legal risk.” Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, a Republican, and Senator Robert Menendez of New Jersey, a Democratic, wrote to the Treasury secretary, Steven Mnuchin, in January, asking him to monitor the situation closely. “We have serious doubts about whether Venezuela has the capacity to launch a cryptocurrency,” the letter said. “But regardless, it is imperative that the U.S. Treasury Department is equipped with tools and enforcement mechanisms to combat the use of cryptocurrency to evade U.S. sanctions in general, and in this case in particular.” Critics of the Maduro administration, including many in the international community, attribute the nation’s economic problems to government mismanagement. Mr. Maduro blames a conspiracy involving the political opposition working in concert with foreign governments, especially the United States. On Monday, Mr. Maduro made an overture to President Trump, inviting him for bilateral talks through a  . “@RealDonaldTrump campaigned promoting noninterference in other countries’ domestic affairs, “ he said. “The time has come to fulfill it and change your agenda of aggression for one of dialogue.” Mr. Maduro added: “Dialogue in Caracas or in Washington, D.C.?” The Trump administration has sought to justify its sanctions against Venezuelan officials by accusing them of political repression and public corruption. Last month, while adding four more names to the growing list of Venezuelan officials placed in the sanctions list, the Treasury Department criticized the nation’s all-powerful Constituent Assembly for prohibiting three major opposition parties from participating in the presidential election. Mr. Maduro will be running for re-election in the April race, and with his government in control of the electoral machinery and the highest court, he is expected to win. But the United States, Colombia and other countries have already declared that they will not recognize the results. Ms. Arnson said the introduction of the currency could provide a political lift to Mr. Maduro’s re-election ambitions. “Looking like you’re doing something to save the economy, that goes beyond paying off your foreign creditors, is an important part of the electoral strategy,” she said. “But I think this is fantasy-land in terms of being an economic life jacket.” The Venezuelan government’s petro initiative is one of the wildest outgrowths of an explosion in activity around virtual currencies over the last year. Inspired by the skyrocketing price of Bitcoin in 2017, many entrepreneurs raised money by creating and selling their own virtual currencies in so-called initial coin offerings. Many governments around the world have also been examining whether it would make sense to   on something similar to the network that Bitcoin runs on, with the Bank of England and the People’s Bank of China announcing experiments. Russian government officials have also discussed issuing some sort of crypto-ruble, to evade American sanctions. But no government has moved ahead more swiftly, and with more abandon, than Venezuela. The documents that have been put out by the Venezuelan government suggest that the petro’s release will be similar to the offerings done by private companies. The   said the process would begin with a presale of digital tokens, to gauge demand, and then be followed by an “Initial Coin Offer,” with 82 million petros released to the public. The petros are then supposed to be tradable on virtual currency exchanges around the world, the white paper says. A   says the Venezuelan government will accept the petro for tax payments and fees. Mr. Maduro directed the state oil company, PDVSA, and other public companies to handle a percentage of their sales and purchases in petros. Coin offerings have been attractive to entrepreneurs because investors can send their money using Bitcoin or other existing virtual currencies, which do not go through banks or other institutions that could decline the transactions. The movement of money outside of the traditional banking system has allowed coin offerings to go ahead even though American regulators have said that most of them are probably  . The same structure could be beneficial to Venezuela, given that it is facing American sanctions that have made it hard to raise money through established channels. For investors, though, the petro may be a hard sell, given that the system will be designed and controlled by the Venezuelan government, which has not been the most reliable financial player. The design of the petro, while clearly inspired by Bitcoin, would, in some ways, be the opposite of most virtual currencies like Bitcoin, which are designed to operate without any central government or authority in charge. Bitcoin has largely won over investors because there is no central authority that could suddenly change the number of Bitcoins to be released, or the rules of the network. With the petro, on the other hand, the confidence of investors is likely to be only as strong as their confidence in the Maduro government.
SAN FRANCISCO — There are hedge funds with blockbuster returns. Then there is the Pantera Bitcoin Fund. The fund — one of the first in the world to dedicate itself to virtual currencies — released its returns in a letter sent to investors on Tuesday. The figure for the life of the fund, which was set up in 2013, is eye popping: 25,004 percent. A significant portion of the gains have come this year, thanks to the skyrocketing price of an individual Bitcoin, which hit $19,000 on Monday. (The fund’s 25,004 percent figure was actually counted back when Bitcoin was at $15,500, a week ago.) For comparison, the top performing hedge fund in the world last year returned 148 percent,  , a hedge fund tracker. Since 2013, the Pantera Bitcoin Fund’s compound annual returns have been around 250 percent. The Pantera Bitcoin Fund did not have to do much to get those returns. It just bought Bitcoins and held them as the price went up. Its performance is a reminder of the unprecedented gains that Bitcoin has experienced, with some analysts arguing that Bitcoin’s moves have been   back in the 1600s. But Dan Morehead, who founded Pantera Capital and the fund after a career at Goldman Sachs, said it was not an easy decision to create a Bitcoin-focused hedge fund in 2013, when Bitcoin was primarily known as a currency for online drug markets. “The first hard part was actually deciding to launch a cryptocurrency fund when everyone else thought that was crazy,” he said on Monday. Many of the investors in the Pantera fund have not enjoyed its full 25,004 percent return. Some bought in at the beginning and then sold out when Bitcoin’s price was in a slow steady decline during 2014 and 2015. Others bought in during the current boom and have reaped only the returns that Bitcoin has experienced over the last year. Those still aren’t bad, at around 1,900 percent. Those gains have given Pantera a lot of competition. More than 150   have been created this year, bringing the total number of such funds to 175, according to the research firm Autonomous Next. Pantera estimated that in dollar terms, the fund has made $2.1 billion for its investors. Investors have taken out Bitcoins worth around $1.7 billion to hold for themselves, to avoid paying Pantera’s 0.75 percent annual fees. That has left Pantera holding coins worth $400 million. Overall, investors originally put about $150 million into the fund. Like all hedge funds, Pantera is open only to accredited investors with significant assets. The minimum investment is $50,000. The relatively straightforward strategy of the Pantera Bitcoin Fund, which has offices in San Francisco, could be replicated by small investors buying and holding Bitcoins. But in its investor letter, Pantera noted that investors who go through  , pay fees ranging from 1.5 percent to 4 percent each time they buy or sell Bitcoin, creating more costs than Pantera charges its investors. The Pantera Bitcoin Fund has developed strategies for buying and selling at good prices and also buys and holds an alternative to Bitcoin, Bitcoin Cash, which was  . Mr. Morehead said his fund has been attractive because it allows investors access to Bitcoin without going to Bitcoin exchanges, the places where people buy and sell the tokens, which have been hacked many times in recent years. Several of the fund’s early investors came from the top ranks of the enormous asset manager the Fortress Investment Group. One of them, Michael Novogratz, is  . There have been a number of attempts to set up a similar fund for small investors, a so-called exchange traded fund, or E.T.F. So far, though,  . Meanwhile, Pantera has expanded its own offerings with six other funds. Most recently, it began the Pantera Digital Asset Fund, which owns 25 virtual currencies, including several that were created through so-called  Mr. Morehead said there is a chance that the value of a Bitcoin could plummet to zero, given how early and undeveloped the technology still is. He said he tells investors to put only around 1 percent of their net worth in virtual currencies. But he thinks that 1 percent could do very well. “There are a lot of famous people who have said Bitcoin is a joke,” he said on Monday. “They might be right. But if they are wrong and it goes up 25 times, they are missing out on a huge trade.”
Cameron and Tyler Winklevoss made a risky bet five years ago: They took $65-million settlement with Facebook co-founder Mark Zuckerberg and loaded up on Bitcoin. That wager has paid off. Their Bitcoin stockpile was worth around $1.3 billion on Tuesday. The question now is whether their bitcoin fortune will prove fleeting. The New York Times’s Nathaniel Popper  . • They took their settlement with Mr. Zuckerberg in Facebook shares. The value of their stake grew to $300 million when Facebook went public in 2012. • They began buying Bitcoin in late 2012 when the price of an individual coin was below $10. • At a time when other Bitcoin millionaires are cashing out and buying  ,   or even low-risk bond funds, the Winklevoss twins said they had no intention to diversify and have sold almost none of their original holdings. • They have collected an additional $350 million or so of other virtual currencies, most of it in the Bitcoin alternative called Ethereum. • The brothers are also majority owners of the virtual currency exchange they founded, Gemini, which likely takes their joint holdings to a value well over $2 billion, or enough to make them each of them billionaires. And that’s getting worse. Women hold only 23 percent of senior executive posts with a title that includes the word chief, down from 24 percent in 2016, according to an analysis by Korn Ferry of the top 1,000 American companies by revenue. What catalyst will propel Apple’s market value above $1 trillion? The Republican tax cuts? The iPhone X? Growth in Apple’s services business? While that question has been a favorite question of market watchers for years, it has become more relevant recently as Apple’s market capitalization has crossed the $900 billion mark. But Nomura Instinet’s Jeffrey Kvaal on Tuesday threw some cold water on those bets. In a report, the analyst lowered his rating on Apple’s stock to neutral. Mr. Kvaal wrote: Apple’s stock has gained 55 percent this year and is up nearly 10 percent since it unveiled the iPhone X.  that downgrades of Apple’s stock don’t happen too often. Germany’s Federal Cartel Office  that Facebook abused its dominant position as a social network in Germany to collect user data from third parties.  : The investigation is the most recent example of European authorities going after big American tech companies. Here are a few: • The European Union  for unfairly favoring some of its own services over those of rivals. • The European Union  $14.5 billion in unpaid taxes from Apple. • The European Union   around $293 million in unpaid taxes from Amazon. • The European Union   for providing misleading information about its acquisition of WhatsApp. • The French government  with the Paris Commerce Court against Amazon for abusing its dominant position with some suppliers. So far European regulators have been more aggressive than the counterparts in the United States. But the increasing size and power of these tech giants are raising concerns. Facebook, Google, and Twitter have drawn scrutiny from lawmakers this year over the manipulation of social media during the 2016 election by Russian operatives. At a hearing on Russia’s involvement in the election this fall, Senator Dianne Feinstein of California told the executives of the three companies: “You have to be the ones to do something about this. Or we will.” As : Over the past five years, an index that tracks hedge fund performance has risen 27.83 percent. Over the past four years, the Pantera Bitcoin Fund exceeded that by nearly 1,000 times. The Pantera fund told investors on Tuesday that its lifetime return has been  — mostly by buying early into Bitcoin. (That number is bigger now, since the return was calculated last week, when the digital currency reached $15,500.) Not every investor in the fund enjoyed this eye-popping result, but Pantera’s compound annual return has been about  . More from Nathaniel Popper of  : • Investors are falling over themselves to buy into the initial coin offering of Block.one, a software start-up that isn’t going to make much software and whose tokens, it says, have “no purpose.” ( ) • Investors pushed up shares of LongFin, a financial technology company, by 1,000 percent after it announced plans to buy a specialist in blockchain, the transaction ledger tech that underpins digital currencies. ( ) • The analyst Frederick Cannon of Keefe, Bruyette & Woods says that Bitcoin’s blockbuster rise is hurting its chances of becoming a viable currency. ( ) The investment giant is   from Jack in the Box for   in cash. As of its 2017 fiscal year, its total sales were more than  . The country’s second-biggest Mexican restaurant chain, which operates and franchises more than 700 restaurants. The deal is “consistent with the company’s desire to transition to a less capital-intensive business model.” Read another way, that says, “We don’t want to own and operate so many restaurants.” Roughly   of Qdoba’s restaurants are company-owned-and-operated, compared to just   of Jack in the Box restaurants. For Apollo: Deutsche Bank, PJ Solomon, Morgan Lewis & Bockius and Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison For Jack in the Box and Qdoba: Morgan Stanley, Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher Deep in   on the company’s new hope — its QNX software that could be used to power self-driving cars — is a nugget of potential deal news: two big investors could back a sale of the company. More from David George-Cosh and Jacque McNish of the WSJ: The publication adds that in the past, Samsung and Oracle had come knocking, interested in BlackBerry’s patents. But the company’s C.E.O., John Chen has rejected them, with the blessing of big shareholders. BlackBerry had hired JPMorgan Chase and RBC Capital Markets in 2012 to   of the company. In 2013, co-founder Mike Lazaridis   about helping him take the company private. And yet in 2017, BlackBerry is still a publicly traded company, with a market capitalization of 7.6 billion Canadian dollars, or $5.9 billion. American shares in BlackBerry were up less than 1 percent in early-morning trading today, at $11.02. Get ready to pull out your very tiny violin. But the distinction is there. From  : And as one self-professed supporter of President Trump in Massachusetts  , “I didn’t vote for this. I want low taxes for all — not ZERO for more folks. Where’s my dollar?” Tech companies like Microsoft that stash huge amounts of foreign profits offshore are   from the overhaul, which would impose a 10.5 percent tax on overseas earnings, according to the WSJ. That could induce some to return to the United States, which, as the WSJ points out, could  . Meanwhile, five financial giants including Citigroup, Bank of America and A.I.G. could collectively  , according to the FT. • The Republican Senators Susan Collins and Mike Lee said that they would support the tax proposal, further ensuring its passage in a vote scheduled for today. ( ) • Bob Corker said that he faced a “tough decision” in deciding to support the tax overhaul after initially opposing it — and he denied pushing for a last-minute change that would benefit him personally. ( ) • Mr. Trump outlined a national security strategy that called Russia and China competitors to American dominance. But he ignored investigations into Russian interference in last year’s presidential election and may not meaningfully change the American trade deficit with China. ( ,  ) • The tax bill’s repeal of the individual insurance mandate could lead to higher insurance premiums, though other potential effects have yet to be determined. ( ) • Matthew Petersen, who was nominated by the White House for a federal judgeship but drew scorn when he couldn’t answer basic legal questions, has withdrawn his candidacy. ( ) Mr. Skipper, who   yesterday as president of the sports powerhouse, citing a “substance addiction,” was once one of The Walt Disney Company’s most important moneymakers. For now, Disney has appointed George Bodenheimer, a former ESPN president, as acting chairman for 90 days. More on potential permanent replacements from Lucas Shaw and Eben Novy-Williams  : Mr. Skipper assumed control of the sports network when it was one of the most formidable media properties on the planet, able to command high carriage fees from pay-television providers given its popularity. But as cable TV providers lose customers to streaming services, ESPN has shed subscribers and resorted to layoffs. Mr. Skipper is stepping down days after Disney announced a deal to buy most of 21st Century Fox. Among the assets that would be included in the transaction are Fox’s 22 regional sports networks, which could be combined with ESPN to shore up Disney’s sports holdings. Whoever takes over ESPN will also oversee the introduction of one of Disney’s big initiatives:  , ESPN Plus.  Sports Illustrated spoke with several ESPN employees who said  . “He just signed a new contract,” one said. “He just gave us this rah-rah speech at the mandatory meeting. No one knows what to think.” Pro sports teams are going for big numbers these days, and the Carolina Panthers — who almost won the Super Bowl last year — are assuredly going to earn Mr. Richardson a windfall, even as   of improperly touching and harassing women and using a racial slur. Forbes estimates that the team could be worth $2.3 billion. What works in the Panthers’ favor, according to Ken Belson of  : From Juliet Macur’s latest Sports of the Times column in the NYT:  Microsoft said that it would   with employees who make sexual harassment claims, one of the most prominent companies to do so, according to the NYT. Campbell  , the maker of Kettle Chips and Pop Secret, for roughly $4.8 billion in cash. Hershey  , the maker of Skinny Pop popcorn, for about $902 million (or $1.6 billion including debt). Both Campbell and Hershey are trying to diversify from their core food products, soup and chocolate. Both have had stagnant sales in recent years. The advantage of pursuing Snyder’s-Lance and Amplify is that they focus on somewhat more healthful snacks, a category that has risen in popularity. • Lauren Silva Laughlin writes of the Snyder’s-Lance deal, “Big family shareholders are an obstacle to any outside investor trying to derail the deal, which is a pity because Campbell is on course to destroy shareholder value.” ( ) • Tara Lachapelle writes, “Here come those desperate-looking food deals we told you about.” ( ) Shares in the social networking company jumped 11 percent yesterday, in one of their biggest one-day leaps in the past year. • JPMorgan Chase’s Doug Anmuth   to $27 from $20 and called the company one of the “top small and mid-cap ideas in 2018.” • Jonathan Kees of Summit Redstone began coverage with   and a price target of $26, adding, “now is the time to jump in.” • Whether daily average user numbers continue to grow • Whether a renewed focus on live events brings in advertisers In other news: Twitter   tied to Britain First, the far-right group that produced an anti-Muslim video retweeted by Mr. Trump. •  , a co-founder of Ares Management, said that he would step down as chief executive and would become executive chairman. A younger co-founder,  , will become C.E.O. ( ) On Dec. 12, 1962, Warren Buffett   to buy 2,000 shares of a failing textile maker. (That’s   in 2017 dollars.) On Dec. 18, 2017, A shares in the company, Berkshire Hathaway, closed at   apiece. That’s a rise of about  , adjusted for inflation. Not a Bitcoin-mania-type return, but we suspect that Mr. Buffett is pretty happy regardless. • See how the savings of many Puerto Ricans were wiped out, and what role UBS may have played in that. ( ) • Ikea is under investigation for possibly having skirted E.U. tax regulations. ( ) • HNA, the debt-ridden Chinese conglomerate, is looking to sell about $6 billion worth of property around the world to pay off its obligations, according to unidentified people. ( ) • Companies have borrowed $6.8 trillion this year, capitalizing on still-low interest rates. ( ) • Behind a swell in hospital operator mergers is a frantic attempt to attract patients in an age where people have more choices about where to go for medical care. ( ) • The drug Daranide was created a half-century ago and once cost virtually nothing. Now it’s known as Keveyis and, under new ownership, could cost as much as $219,000 a year. ( ) • Starboard Value, the activist hedge fund, has taken a 9.9 percent stake in Cars.com and believes that the online marketplace could be sold to a private equity firm. ( ) • Virgin Hyperloop One, the futuristic transport company, took in $50 million in new capital from investors in Dubai and Russia, named Richard Branson as its chairman and rebuffed a takeover bid. ( ) • Silvio Berlusconi has had a good year: His net worth grew about $2 billion after shares in his media empire rose dramatically and his center-right political party did well in elections. ( ) • Greenyard, a Belgian food company, said it was in talks to buy Dole Food, the company synonymous with Hawaiian pineapple. ( ,  ) • In related news, scientists are scouring the globe to find a potential replacement for the widely known type of banana, the Cavendish, which is at risk of extinction because of a fungus epidemic. ( )
• A tale of three tech companies earnings. • CBS and Viacom are talking about getting back together. • A shake-up in Airbnb’s C-suite • Why Europe matters for Facebook. • Regulators are worried that Bitcoin’s price is being manipulated. • Jeff Immelt has gone from C.E.O. to V.C. • And when will Congress raise the debt ceiling? Apple reported record profit and sales, Amazon easily beat expectations, and Google-parent Alphabet posted a loss because of the new tax law. $20.1 billion — Apple’s profit during the quarter, up 12 percent.  $88.3 billion — Apple’s revenue for the quarter. • $61.6 billion — Revenue from iPhone sales, up 13 percent from a year earlier.  77.3 million — The number of iPhones that Apple sold in the quarter, down 1 percent and below the 80.2 million analysts expected,   $796 -- The average sale price of an iPhone,  .  $60 billion to $62 billion — Apple's revenue guidance for the current quarter, well below analysts’ expectations of $65.9 billion.  $285 billion — Apple’s big cash pile.  $1.9 billion —the e-commerce giant’s fourth-quarter profit, more than double its profit from a year ago and the first time Amazon’s earnings have surpassed $1 billion in a quarter.  $789 million —The boost to Amazon’s bottom line from a one-time tax benefit.  $60.5 billion — Amazon’s revenue in the quarter, up 38 percent and above analysts’ estimates of $59.8 billion. $3.02 billion — The loss Alphabet reported for the fourth quarter.  $9.9 billion — The hit Alphabet took to its earnings related to the new tax law.  $32.32 billion — The search giant’s revenue for the quarter, up 27 percent from same period a year ago. More than a decade after Viacom and CBS split, the boards of the two companies . • Shari Redstone, who along with her father, Sumner Redstone, controls the two companies, is pushing for a deal.Her previous effort to combine the two companies in 2016 faltered over the concerns of CBS’ directors and CBS’s chief executive, Les Moonves. According to media reports, Mr. Moonves l, though  that he remains wary. • Walt Disney’s deal for much of 21st Century Fox late last year has sparked much strategic rethinking across the industry. Ms. Redstone believes that CBS and Viacom need greater scale to better compete with Disney, Netflix and Amazon. Belinda Johnson is moving up. Laurence Tosi is moving out. And don’t expect the company to go public this year. Ms. Johnson, who’s currently the home-rental company’s chief business affairs and legal officer, will become its chief operating officer. Meanwhile, Mr. Tosi, who had been Airbnb’s chief financial officer since coming over from Blackstone, will leave the company to focus on his investment fund. Airbnb has hired a search firm to find a new C.F.O. Ellie Mertz, the company’s head of global financial planning, will fill in that role on an interim basis. • Ms. Johnson had been a rising star at Airbnb, often compared to Facebook’s Sheryl Sandberg as the company’s  . • Mr. Tosi had been increasingly at odds with Airbnb’s C.E.O., Brian Chesky, over strategy. (The Information covered their disputes — which were over   — in great detail.) Airbnb is heading ever so slowly toward an initial public offering.   as its first outside director, for example, and promoting its most successful business mind to C.O.O. is another step in that direction. Still losing its C.F.O. — particularly one well versed in Wall Street — could set those plans back a bit. Here’s Mr. Chesky on Ms. Johnson: And here’s a statement from Eric Holder, the former U.S. Attorney General who has been advising the company on anti-discrimination policies: And here’s Mr. Chesky on Mr. Tosi: Some of the most consequential battles in the world of technology are playing out in Europe, where governments are cracking down on tech giants like Google and Facebook. Facebook’s quarterly results, released Wednesday, provide crucial information for better understanding the balance of power between Silicon Valley titans and the democracies of Europe. The results clearly showed the importance of the European market to Facebook’s future growth. The company’s average revenue per European user in the fourth quarter of 2017 was $8.86, well below the $26.76 that Facebook rakes in per user in the United States and Canada. Facebook should be able to move that European number a lot higher in the coming years. Europe’s economy is only a bit smaller than the United States’, and the Continent contains prosperous nations whose citizens are just as addicted to social media as Americans. Indeed, Facebook has more daily active users in Europe than in the United States and Canada (277 million versus 184 million.) What is more, total European daily active users grew in the fourth quarter, while the United States and Canada number edged lower. All this helps explain why the growth in European revenue per user, at nearly 50 percent in the fourth quarter versus the year-earlier period, is significantly higher than the 35 percent rate for the United States and Canada. What does this mean for Facebook as European countries introduce measures aimed at   that may go beyond what the company is used to in the United States? Given how lucrative Europe is and will be to Facebook, it may be willing to spend what it takes to comply with new regulations, and even tolerate any inefficiencies the rules impose on its advertising business. Indeed, Facebook itself says it wants to make its network safer for users and democracies. But if there is any slip in that stance, Europe’s leaders, seeing how important their countries are to Facebook’s bottom line, arguably have considerable leverage to respond. Its price on Thursday:  Its all-time high hit on Dec. 18:  That’s more than a 50 percent slide, and it marks it lowest price since November. To put the Bitcoin’s recent slide in perspective, the cryptocurrency has lost $44 billion in market value last month, according to Bloomberg. The tumble has continued so far in February. Bitcoin is down 11 percent Thursday. Regulators are increasingly worried that Bitfinex, a widely used (and famously opaque) exchange,  . The Commodity Futures Trading Commission has subpoenaed the company, whose Tether digital token is often used to buy other virtual currencies. More from Nathaniel Popper of the NYT:  According to  , Bitcoin is trading at $9,545, down almost 7 percent over the last 24 hours, Ethereum’s Ether at $1,099, and Ripple’s XRP at $1.05, down 7 percent. • How Goldman Sachs was rushed into supporting Bitcoin. ( ) • Meet Bibor, a proposed interest rate for lending Bitcoin. ( ) • Samsung is making specialist chips for mining virtual currency. ( ) The Wall Street Journal, citing anonymous sources,   that Saudi Arabia’s Aramco and Google’s parent, Alphabet, are in talks to build a tech hub within the kingdom. Details, including when and if a deal will come to fruition, remain scant at this point. Saudi Arabia is seeking to diversify its economy away from oil, and Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman has made   a key part of his “Vision 2030” plan. In late 2016, he traveled to Silicon Valley to promote those reforms, and the kingdom has taken bigger steps in recent years into the tech investing world. That year Saudi Arabia  , and its Public Investment Fund put $45 billion into SoftBank’s  , which is making eye-popping investments in tech companies. from the WSJ article: It isn’t clear how setting up tech hubs could fundamentally transform an oil company into a tech company — and therefore command a higher multiple — but it’d be interesting to see bankers make that argument. The former G.E. chairman and C.E.O. will focus on tech and health care companies in his new role as  , one of the biggest V.C. firms in the world (that isn’t named SoftBank). From the release: and: (Worth noting: Mr. Immelt’s successor at G.E. is struggling to turn that company around. See below.) Mr. Immelt is only the latest corporate chieftain to find his next act in venture capital. Earlier this week, Ken Chenault announced that he would become  . Mr. Immelt himself famously dallied with Silicon Valley last year, when   to become Uber’s next C.E.O. Its fourth-quarter earnings handily beat expectations. The average price per ad went up 43 percent. Mark Zuckerberg said changes to the News Feed   from the time users spent on it (as Shira Ovide of Gadfly points out, that’s about  ). Here’s where our colleague Peter Eavis says investors should focus: • Apple: Everyone wants to know   — well enough to start a new “supercycle”? • Alphabet: Will   make its nonadvertising business more than a tiny blip in earnings? • Amazon: Will Wall Street have finally  ? ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ • Is digital advertising what’s wrong with the internet? ( ) • More than a million followers have disappeared from the accounts of dozens of prominent Twitter users in recent days.  . ( ) • Microsoft’s cloud computing push continues to pay off. ( ) • Uber is offering bicycle sharing in San Francisco. ( ) • EBay will shift its payments business from PayPal. That pummeled PayPal’s share price in after-hours trading. ( ) • The Twitter co-founder Biz Stone and the Craigslist co-founder Craig Newmark are investing in a fact-checking start-up. ( )  to do it quickly, amid worries that the government could run out of borrowing capacity late this month. (The Congressional Budget Office   because of the tax cuts.) The Treasury secretary argued that the cuts would eventually pay for themselves, but conceded that it wouldn’t happen this year. In the meantime, the Treasury Department said that  . And   over whether to keep supporting short-term bills to keep the government operating. • Robert Mueller appears to be focusing on the White House’s initial statement about a June 2016 meeting between Trump campaign officials and Russian individuals over potential dirt on Hillary Clinton. ( ) • The F.B.I. made an unusual public statement opposing the release of a secret House Intelligence Committee memo about surveillance of a Trump campaign aide. ( ) • A federal appeals court ruled that the president could fire the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau’s director only for cause. ( ) • The E.U. is preparing measures to stop Britain undercutting it on tax or regulation after Brexit. ( ) • The Treasury Department insisted that new sanctions are coming against Russian individuals close to Vladimir Putin. ( ) • Prosecutors have dropped corruption charges against Senator Bob Menendez, Democrat of New Jersey. ( ) • The director of the C.D.C., Brenda Fitzgerald, resigned after she was reported to have bought stock in a tobacco company. ( ) Yesterday’s meeting, Janet Yellen’s last as Fed chairwoman,  . But the accompanying statement hinted that higher inflation — and rate hikes — might be around the corner. Analysts’ takes: • Economists at Bank of America Merrill Lynch write, “This shows that the Fed is taking notice of the recent shift in market perception about inflation.” • Ian Shepherdson of Pantheon Macroeconomics writes, “In short, the statement sets up the March hike, which will be followed by Jay Powell’s first press conference.” • Diane Swonk of Grant Thornton said, “Everything from stronger growth at home and abroad to debt-financed tax cuts have raised expectations for inflation.” , from Binyamin Appelbaum of the NYT: Analysts over at Deutsche Bank think so. They wrote in a research note yesterday: G.E. is the last survivor of the index’s 12 original components from when it started in 1896, and has been in it continuously for more than 110 years. in  . • SoftBank agreed to buy a majority stake in the cellphone service unit of Line, a Japanese messaging company. ( ) • Brookfield Asset Management is in talks to buy Forest City Realty Trust, a fellow real estate owner with a market value of about $6.2 billion, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • CVC Capital Partners has hired Morgan Stanley and UBS to lead an initial public offering of the antivirus company Avast Software, which could be the biggest ever in British tech, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • Meet the three-month old boutique investment bank that helped put together the Blackstone Group’s $20 billion deal for Thomson Reuters’ financial information unit. ( ) • General Assembly, the coding boot camp, may sell itself. ( ) • Tell us your memories of Xerox as the onetime corporate icon strikes a deal with Fujifilm of Japan. ( ) The state’s gaming commission is looking into the numerous, decade-spanning sexual assault and misconduct allegations against Steve Wynn. It has the power to   for Wynn Boston Harbor, the biggest single-phase development in Massachusetts history, which is expected to create thousands of jobs. More from Susan Pulliam, Jon Kamp, Chris Kirkham and Kate O’Keeffe of  : Shares in Wynn Resorts fell more than 3 percent yesterday. •  , who spent 11 years at JPMorgan, mostly as its general counsel, has joined Simpson Thacher & Bartlett as a litigation partner. ( ) • The public relations firm Brunswick Group has hired  , the former president of the World Bank, and  , the former director general of the World Trade Organization, as part of a new consultancy focused on geopolitical advice. ( ) Our colleagues  . They’ll use the best responses in a forthcoming special section. • U.S. prosecutors have issued grand jury subpoenas in an investigation into potential corruption at international sports bodies, and exploring bringing charges of racketeering, money laundering and fraud. ( ) • BMW and Daimler said they had taken action against executives involved in an organization that sponsored emissions experiments on monkeys. ( ) • Equifax began offering a free service on Wednesday that promised to let consumers lock their credit files using their cellphones. It didn’t work. ( ) • Some of Interior Secretary Ryan Zinke’s rapid moves on environmental regulation look vulnerable to legal challenge, experts say. ( ) • SoFi is laying off dozens of employees in its mortgage division, according to people familiar with the matter. It used to highlight the area as a growth prospect. ( ) • Hong Kong developers and distressed debt and private credit funds are lining up to offer financing to HNA, bankers and property investors say. ( ) • David Einhorn’s Greenlight Capital lost roughly 6 percent in January, extending a multiyear period of weakness. ( ) • Private equity heavyweights like K.K.R., Carlyle and Apollo have started issuing U.S. preferred shares, which pay higher interest than traditional bonds and can be a highly efficient way to raise capital. ( ) • Hedge funds have earned spectacular payoffs from bearish bets against companies like Steinhoff International and Carillion, but can accounting sleuths expect more wins on that scale? ( )
Michael Novogratz, the former Fortress executive,   and said Bitcoin will fall to $8,000. Mr. Novogratz’s Galaxy Digital Assets Fund was due to start on Dec. 15. Bitcoin has fallen more than 40 percent the past four days. It hit a low of $10,776 Friday, down from $19,511 on Monday. The digital currency has since rebounded from its low and was recently at $13,268.  that Federal prosecutors in Brooklyn have sought bank records about entities associated with the family company of Jared Kushner. T  is reporting that Bank of America is handing out $1,000 bonuses to about 145,000 employees who earn up to $150,000. President Trump  . Since Wednesday when the bill passed Congress, a growing list of companies have announced plans to pass some of their tax windfall to employees. AT&T and Comcast both will pay a $1,000 bonus to most of their workers in the United States. Wells Fargo, PNC Financial and Fifth Third are raising their minimum wage to $15. Fifth Third will give $1,000 bonuses to 13,500 of its 18,000 workers, while PNC Financial will pay $1,000 bonuses to about 47,500 employees. Boeing said it will spend $300 million on employee training, workplace infrastructure, and corporate giving. Bitcoin is down more than 30 percent and is approaching $10,000. The biggest cryptocurrency traded at a high of $19,511 on Monday. The selling has spilled over to other digital currencies. Ethereum and litecoin are off more than 35 percent. Such tumbles are hardly unusual for bitcoin, which is still up more than 1,300 percent this year. But the decline has some asking if the top is in. Here are some comments from around the web:   : “Has the bubble finally popped? It’s hard to see the bell tolling just yet. We can easily see this market bounce back in very short order. Whilst there have been some hacks, public infighting in the mining community, lots of rumored forks and regulatory pressure building on some fronts, this is likely to be a simple bout of risk-off selling as investors rebalance towards year-end.”   : “The sharks are beginning to circle here, and the futures markets may give them a venue to strike. Bitcoin’s been heavily driven by retail investors, but there’ll be some aggressive funds looking for the right opportunity to hammer this thing lower.” ,  : “The vast majority of long term holders of bitcoin are still way in the money and have shown no sign of cashing out.” $19,511  $13,577 What Stephen Innes, the head of Asia-Pacific trading for Oannes, told Richard Frost and Eric Lam of  : Maybe like a host of companies   as having something to do with digital currency or blockchain technology. What gained a huge amount of attention yesterday, of course, was the beverage maker Long Island Iced Tea Corp. announcing that it was changing its name to Long Blockchain Corp. and pivoting to virtual money. (It will still maintain a beverage division, of course.) What happened was predictable: But maybe we’re not at a top. Shane Chanel, a wealth adviser at ASR Wealth Advisers, told CNN Money that investors may just pile into other digital currencies, adding, “I feel the cryptocurrency madness  .” The firm is  , according to Bloomberg. The firm already clears Bitcoin futures, one of the few banks on Wall Street to do so. Speaking of a Wall Street firm getting into Bitcoin,   late last month? Michel Temer, the president of Brazil,   the sale of a controlling stake in aircraft maker Embraer. Boeing and Embraer said Thursday that they are discussing potential business combinations after  . A deal that gave Boeing control of Embraer, a crown jewel of Brazilian industry, would need government approval.  The companies now have until June 21 to complete their $85.4 billion transaction, according to  . They pushed the deadline back after   for the Justice Department’s lawsuit to block the deal. The court hearings will begin on March 19, which wouldn’t give the two enough time to complete their transaction before the previous deadline of April 22. Who didn’t see this coming? From  : Expect a lot more fighting between now and March 6, when Qualcomm is scheduled to hold its annual shareholder meeting. Eric Schmidt was more than the adult in the room during the early days of Google. He was the technology giant’s person in Washington, Brussels and Beijing. But does his departure as executive chairman next month mean that his services are no longer vital? It comes as Alphabet, now Google’s parent company, and other tech giants need friends in political capitals around the world — and Mr. Schmidt’s connections to previous administrations like the Obama White House may not be as useful. From Dai Wakabayashi, Katie Benner and Claire Miller of  : There was no mention in Google’s announcement about why Mr. Schmidt left. But one issue that has hung in the air is the executive’s well-known personal life — including the bringing of girlfriends to corporate events, the World Economic Forum in Davos and other occasions.  on how the hiring of Marcy Simon, a marketing expert who was in a relationship with Mr. Schmidt, at the company’s Android division caused some consternation in the unit. • Shira Ovide writes, “Google isn’t in desperate need of more adults. But the rest of the technology industry might be.” ( ) • Jennifer Saba writes, “Hiring a strong, independent chairwoman would reflect well on co-founders and controlling shareholders Larry Page and Sergey Brin in more ways than one.” ( ) Or, put another way, government funding has been extended until Jan. 19. The deadline was today. Yesterday’s votes in Congress to prevent a shutdown prevented Republicans from suffering an embarrassment so soon after passing their tax overhaul. But   when they return to Washington next month: • What to do about the young immigrants known as Dreamers • Long-term funding for the Children’s Health Insurance Program beyond March • The future of the warrantless wiretap program run by the N.S.A. and the F.B.I. • Conservative groups plan to spend millions on advertising extolling what they view as the benefits of the Republican tax cuts to a deeply skeptical public. ( ,  ) • Republicans are scrambling to address political weaknesses ahead the 2018 midterm elections — and that led to a loud dispute at the White House this week. ( ,  ) • A federal judge dismissed a lawsuit accusing President Trump of violating the Constitution by continuing to own and profit from his business empire, arguing that the plaintiffs didn’t have legal standing. ( ) • The bonuses that AT&T is paying employees because of the tax bill appear auspiciously timed: Under the current tax code, they amount to a $70 million deduction for the expense, while the deduction would be $42 million under the new tax rates. ( ) • Ford’s C.E.O., Jim Hackett, publicly apologized for nearly three decades’ worth of harassment by employees at two Chicago plants, an issue that was the subject of a recent NYT investigation. ( ) • Six symphonies have cut ties to the famed classical music conductor Charles Dutoit after four women accused him of sexual assault. ( ) • Major League Baseball had pushed out Bob Bowman, the longtime head of the league’s former digital platform, after knowing about accusations of dating subordinates and shoving and verbally abusing colleagues. ( ) Sure, the iPhone maker’s shares have jumped this year, pushing its market value into uncharted territory above $900 billion. How long can the tech giant continue to breathe that rarefied air? Courtesy of Jeff Sommer and Karl Russell of  : When adjusted for inflation, Apple’s market capitalization just recently surpassed Microsoft’s record high. At the heights of the dot-com bubble in 1999, Microsoft’s market capitalization peaked at $647 billion. • Apple’s share of the total stock market doesn’t even rank in the top 20, going back to 1925.  that the iPhone X is helping stanch the flow of customers defecting from Apple to makers of cheaper smartphones. In a research note, the bank said that Apple has a 57 percent retention rate among iPhone users when they upgrade. That’s 20 percentage points higher than any other brand in China. Why is the country important to Apple? It accounted for nearly 20 percent of iPhone sales last quarter — and the iPhone accounts for more than 55 percent of Apple’s sales during that time. Yes, Apple is   of older iPhones. No, it’s not meant to force customers into  , it says. • Facebook signed a deal with Universal Music Group that lets its platforms carry songs from the music label’s artists, settling a long-running dispute. ( ) • Qualcomm has gotten a permit to test self-driving cars on public roads in California. ( ) • We knew Furbys were trouble: The latest model, as well as other toys, could be vulnerable to hackers and identity thieves. ( ) • Boeing is seeking to buy the Brazilian aircraft maker Embraer to try to gain a bigger foothold in the regional jet market — but is awaiting the blessing of Brazil’s government. Separately, a former Embraer executive pleaded guilty to U.S. charges of bribing a Saudi Aramco official to secure a sale. ( ,  ) • Liberty Global agreed to sell its Austrian unit to Deutsche Telekom for 1.9 billion euros, or $2.25 billion, potentially helping set up a bigger deal with Vodafone down the road. ( ,  ) • Roche agreed to buy Ignyta, a maker of an experimental cancer treatment, for $1.7 billion. ( ) • Royal Dutch Shell has agreed to buy First Utility, a British-based electricity provider, for an undisclosed amount to expand its non-oil business. ( ) • Mark Ein, a Washington-based investor, said that he would buy the Washington City Paper after its current owner put the independent newspaper up for sale. ( ) It did so by completing transactions with the controversy-ridden Malaysian government investment fund that have now gotten the attention of the Swiss financial regulator Finma. The Swiss agency will install a person inside the bank to  , “given the inadequacy of the bank’s controls.” JPMorgan said that the activity had taken place years ago, and that the firm has since improved its staff training and surveillance operations.  Finma said it had referred to case to the U.S. Office of the Comptroller of the Currency. U.S. lawmakers are calling for increased scrutiny of the Chinese conglomerate from the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States, or Cfius,  . The Treasury Department, the Justice Department and the Defense Department have endorsed a bill that would make it easier for Cfius to reinvestigate past foreign deals. The conglomerate   in Postal Savings Bank of China to borrow money as concerns about its debt load have started to weigh on its finances. And it still does not have approval to buy a controlling stake in SkyBridge Capital, Anthony Scaramucci’s investment firm. • John Schnatter, who blamed the N.F.L.’s handling of the national anthem controversy for Papa’s John’s declining sales, will step down as chief executive. ( ) • Vince McMahon, the chairman and chief executive of World Wrestling Entertainment, filed details with the S.E.C. of a sale of $100 million of shares to fund an exploration of opportunities in other sports, including football. ( ) • MetLife hired a law firm to investigate how it failed find and pay pension benefits to thousands of people. It said it would hire a specialty firm to locate these people. ( ) • AC Milan, the city’s oldest football club, is struggling to find investors willing to refinance its more than $300 million in high-interest loans from Elliott Management. ( ) • Timing is of the essence when making stock donations, as Michael Milken, the former junk-bond financier knows after two gifts to charity just before the shares plunged in value. ( ) • The online gambling company, GVC, will buy the British bookmaker Ladbrokes Coral in a deal worth as much as 4 billion pounds, or nearly $5.4 billion. ( ) • UBS has to pay $903,300 to one of its former senior strategists who accused it of illegally firing him for blowing the whistle on attempts by commercial mortgage-backed securities traders to influence his independent research reports. ( ) • More American universities than ever are sitting on endowments worth at least $1 billion, helped by heavy investments in stocks. ( )
SAN FRANCISCO — Members of the Securities and Exchange Commission’s staff have been hearing recently from a former colleague with an urgent question: Why aren’t you cracking down on these initial coin offerings? Initial coin offerings are a relatively new method that entrepreneurs have used to raise money for start-ups, by selling custom-built virtual currencies. The practice has taken off this year, despite the warnings of regulators and the uncertainty of the rules concerning the fund-raising method. Joseph Grundfest, who was a commissioner at the S.E.C. in the 1980s and is now a law and business professor at Stanford, said he had been contacting current commission officials and staff to urge them to bring cases, and fast. “I.C.O.s represent the most pervasive, open and notorious violation of federal securities laws since the Code of Hammurabi,” Mr. Grundfest said in an interview. “It’s more than the extent of the violation,” he said. “It’s the almost comedic quality of the violation.” A spokeswoman for the S.E.C. did not respond to a request for comment. Start-ups have raised more than $3 billion this year from investors through coin offerings. Most start-ups say the coins they are selling will be useful as a method of payment in the online services they are building. Coin offerings generally happen without the involvement of financial institutions or regulators because investors pay for the coins using Bitcoin and other virtual currencies, which can be sent outside the traditional financial system. Regulators in China and South Korea have recently banned such offerings outright. In the United States, the S.E.C. has brought one case against a small fraudulent coin offering. The agency has also warned that at least some coins being sold could be considered securities, and would be in violation of securities law if not registered with the authorities — and few are. But Mr. Grundfest, who is also a co-director of the Rock Center for Corporate Governance, said the continuing flow of new coin offerings showed that the warnings were not nearly enough. “We’re waiting to see a whole bunch of enforcement actions in this space, and we wonder why they haven’t happened yet,” he said. “I hope what they are doing is planning on a sweep of 50 I.C.O.s.” Mr. Grundfest is far from the only voice who has criticized the frenzy around coin offerings. Chamath Palihapitiya, a venture capitalist who has expressed enthusiasm about Bitcoin, has   that “99 percent of I.C.O.s are a scam,” a sentiment that other leading venture capitalists have echoed. But Mr. Grundfest’s words could carry more weight, both because he is close to the technology world near Stanford and because he knows what it takes to bring federal securities cases. He said the most obvious way for regulators to go after initial coin offerings would be to label them as securities and punish them for not registering with the authorities. The chairman of the S.E.C., Jay Clayton,   that the agency was planning to crack down on offerings that violated securities law, including virtual coins that should be categorized as securities but have not been registered with the authorities. “Where we see fraud, and where we see people engaging in offerings that are not registered, we are going to pursue them because these types of things have a destabilizing effect on the market,” Mr. Clayton said in a meeting at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York. Mr. Grundfest said that he would welcome this, but that he did not think it should have taken this long. “These are not hard cases,” he said. “You don’t need teams of accountants poring over complex financing documents.” Many companies offering coins have argued that they are not securities because they will have utility on the networks the companies are building. But Mr. Grundfest said it was clear that almost everyone buying tokens at this point was buying them with the hope that their value would go up, not because the buyer wanted to use them on some future computer network. Mr. Grundfest said he thought that the concept of a coin offering could be a useful innovation for certain types of fund-raising. It could, he said, make sense for a company building a decentralized cloud storage network, which could then use the coin as a means of payment and record keeping on the network. But he said almost none of the projects currently raising money through coin offerings had a need for the novel structure. “Is this amazing technology? Yes,” he said. “But most of the stuff we see today is total crap.” Mr. Grundfest said several teams looking at doing offerings had approached him to ask how to do it right. “I say, ‘Look, you are at very high risk for violating the securities law,’ and explain why,” he said. “Then they go find another lawyer.”
SAN FRANCISCO — Recently the founder of something called Ripple briefly  . Another day an anonymous donor set up an $86 million Bitcoin-fortune charity called the Pineapple Fund. A Tesla was spotted with a BLOCKHN license plate. There’s a surge in people  . After the Long Island Iced Tea company announced it would pivot to blockchain,  . In 2017, the cryptocurrency Bitcoin went from $830 to $19,300, and now quivers around $14,000. Ether, its main rival, started the year at less than $10, closing out 2017 at $715. Now it’s over $1,100. The wealth is intoxicating news, feverish because it seems so random. Investors trying to grok the landscape compare it to the dot-com bubble of the late 1990s, when valuations soared and it was hard to separate the Amazons and Googles from the Pets.coms and eToys. The cryptocurrency community is centered around a tightknit group of friends — developers, libertarians, Redditors and cypherpunks — who have known each other for years through meet-ups, an endless circuit of crypto conferences and internet message boards. Over long hours in anonymous group chats, San Francisco bars and Settlers of Catan game nights, they talk about how cryptocurrency will decentralize power and wealth, changing the world order. The goal may be decentralization, but the money is extremely concentrated. Coinbase has more than   that own cryptocurrencies. Data suggests that about  , and some estimate that  . There are only a few winners here, and, unless they lose it all, their impact going forward will be outsize. They also remember who laughed at them and when. James Spediacci and his twin brother, Julian, who bought ether when it was about 30 cents, now run one of the most popular whale clubs: private cryptocurrency trading communities where crypto syndicates are coordinated in group chats. He showed me a screen shot of his Facebook post from 2014 telling everyone to buy ether. “One like,” he said, pointing to his phone. “It got one like.” Whether it’s all built on sand or not, the crypto castle has risen. There’s an actual house called the Crypto Castle, and the king is Jeremy Gardner, 25, a rakish young investor with a hedge fund who has become the de facto tour guide for crypto newcomers. Early one afternoon, he opened a bottle of rosé while he charged half a dozen external batteries so he wouldn’t have to ever plug in his phone in Ibiza, Spain, the next week. “I do I.C.O.s. It’s my thing,” he said. He wore a pink button-front and pink pants. “It’s me, a couple V.C.s and a lot of charlatans.” An initial coin offering is a way to raise money: A company creates its own cryptocurrency and investors buy into the new coin, without actually buying a stake in the company. Mr. Gardner led an I.C.O. for his start-up Augur, creating an “Augur token” that he then sold to raise real world money. These tokens sold fast, and it is one of the forces that kicked off this boom. For a time, the  , a market-forecasting start-up with few customers, exceeded $1 billion. About eight people live in the Crypto Castle on any given night, and some of Mr. Gardner’s tenants brought out snacks (Cheez-Its and a jar of Nutella). One of the bedrooms has a stripper pole. Mr. Gardner leaned back into the sofa and rested his feet on the table. He recently did an I.C.O. for a start-up after-party. “You can I.C.O. anything,” he said. He runs Distributed, a 180-page magazine about cryptocurrency that comes out about once a year. He is now raising $75 million for his hedge fund,  (pronounced “awesome”). He said his closest friends are moving to Puerto Rico to get around paying taxes. “They’re going to build a modern-day Atlantis out there,” he said. “But for me, it’s too early in my career to check out.” He wears a bracelet from his Burning Man camp ( ) and a necklace that is a key on a chain. “I was given this necklace and was told my net worth would go up, and it’s gone up six x since then,” he said. He drew a chart to explain the crypto community: 20 percent for ideology, 60 percent for the tech and 100 percent for the money, he said, drawing a circle around it all. A roommate on the sofa perked up and asked if he’d ever invest in his lucid dreams start-up (the idea is a headpiece that induces them). Mr. Gardner did not seem impressed: “Probably not,” he said. A reality show wants to follow him around, but he’s skeptical that it can add to his life. “I literally have a date with Bella Hadid not having a reality show,” he said. A few weeks after we first met, as the Bitcoin price exploded in December, Mr. Gardner seemed shaken. People had begun making pilgrimages to the Crypto Castle, knocking on the door, hoping Mr. Gardner could help them invest. “Nothing feels real, it doesn’t feel real,” he said. “I’m ready for crypto assets to go down 90 percent. I’ll feel better then, I think. This has been too insane.” Nearby is a building residents call the Crypto Crackhouse. Grant Hummer, who runs the San Francisco Ethereum Meetup, lives there. Long hallways called Bitcoin Boulevard and Ethereum Alley lead to communal bathrooms. Mr. Hummer and his co-founder committed $40 million of their own crypto-made money to their new $100 million hedge fund, Chromatic Capital. “My neurons are fried from all the volatility,” Mr. Hummer said. “I don’t even care at this point. I’m numb to it. I’ll lose a million dollars in a day and I’m like, O.K.” His room is simple: a bed, a futon, a TV on a mostly empty media console, three keyboard cleaning sprays and a half dozen canisters of Lysol wipes. His T-shirt read, ‘The Lizard of Wall Street,’ with a picture of a lizard in a suit, dollar-sign necklaces around its neck. He carries with him a coin that reads, “memento mori,” to remind himself he can die any day. He sees the boom as part of a global apocalypse. “The worse regular civilization does and the less you trust, the better crypto does,” Mr. Hummer said. "It’s almost like the ultimate short trade.” Mr. Hummer went out to meet Joe Buttram, 27, for drinks. As a mixed martial arts fighter, Mr. Buttram said he would fight for a couple hundred bucks, sometimes a few thousand, and worked security at a start-up, but his main hobbies were reading 4chan and buying vintage pornography, passions that exposed him to cryptocurrency. He said his holdings are into double-digit millions but wouldn’t give specifics other than to say he’d quit his job and is starting a hedge fund. There’s a common paranoia among the crypto-wealthy that they’ll be targeted and robbed since there’s no bank securing the money, so many are obsessively secretive. Many say even their parents don’t know how much they’ve made. This also allows people to pretend to be wealthier than they are, of course. “It’s unforgiving,” Mr. Buttram said. “You make one mistake and it’s all gone.” They talk about buying Lamborghinis, the single acceptable way to spend money in the Ethereum cryptocurrency community. The currency’s founder  . Mr. Buttram says he’s renting an orange Lambo for the weekend. And he wears a solid gold Bitcoin “B” necklace encrusted with diamonds that he had made. Otherwise, HODL. This is one of the core beliefs in this community: HODL, “hold” typed very fast, as if in a panic. HODL even if you feel FUD — fear, uncertainty and doubt. If you show wealth, it means you don’t really believe in the cryptocurrency revolution, a full remake of the financial system, governments and our world order that will send the price of ether up astronomically. “HODL when everyone has FUD,” Mr. Hummer said quietly, to explain why he still lives in a dorm room. “This will change civilization. This can 100 x or more from here.” He knows this is strange. “When I meet people in the normal world now, I get bored,” Mr. Hummer said. “It’s just a different level of consciousness.” The tone turns somber. “Sometimes I think about what would happen to the future if a bomb went off at one of our meetings,” Mr. Buttram said. Mr. Hummer said, “A bomb would set back civilization for years.” A few days later, Mr. Hummer was working from his co-founder’s apartment. James Fickel, 26, lives in a high-rise with a Russian blue cat called Mr. Bigglesworth. Mr. Fickel is known in the community for “going full YOLO” and investing $400,000 when Ethereum was at 80 cents. Now, with a fortune he says is in the hundreds of millions, his parents have retired and sent his younger sister to live with him. “I’m taking over her education,” Mr. Fickel said, sitting on a white leather sofa, Mr. Bigglesworth asleep in his impossibly skinny arms. Today, Mr. Fickel is outlining the endgame for cryptocurrency true believers. “It’s the entire world reorganizing itself,” Mr. Fickel said. “We could get rid of our armies because for the first time you’ll have people saying, ‘I want to vote for a global order.’ It’s the internet waking up — it’s the internet grabbing its pitchfork. That’s the blockchain.” Mr. Hummer is skeptical. “All I know is the price of ether is going to go up,” Mr. Hummer said. At a jazz bar a few days later, I run into Mr. Fickel’s personal trainer, Alan Chen, who is now running in this crypto circle. Mr. Fickel had convinced Mr. Chen to put his savings into Ethereum. “I’m retired, man,” Mr. Chen said. “I’m moving to L.A. next week. I got a penthouse on Marina del Rey.” “Don’t say I’m retired,” he added. “I’m going into business now. I’m going to use blockchain to help personal trainers.” Nearby was Chante Eliaszadeh, 22, a law student at the University of California, Berkeley, who started the Berkeley Law Blockchain group. “Obviously the bubble’s going to burst and everyone’s going to need a lawyer,” she said. At the annual San Francisco Bitcoin Meetup Party, hundreds gathered under the fluorescent lights of a co-working space, and there was a line out the door. The waiting list had to be told not to show up. Many there wore Bitcoin- and Ethereum-themed clothes from  , which sells unisex cryptocurrency sweaters. Those closest to the technology are the most cautious. Pieter Wuille, 33, a Bitcoin core developer, kept his backpack on as he wandered the party. He’s part of the team working to develop the Bitcoin technology. “The technology still needs time to evolve,” Mr. Wuille said. "This infusion of interest is bringing the wrong kind of attention. Some people believe Bitcoin can’t fail or this technology solves many more problems than it does. It can. And it does not.” He said everyone is asking him whether to buy Bitcoin. “I tell them I have no idea,” he said. “I don’t know!” “There’s so many people rushing into the space, if it’s a bit of speculation, I’m O.K. with that,” said the Coinbase C.E.O., Brian Armstrong, whose company has become the de facto portal for casual investors. “But we can’t guarantee the website’s going to be up exactly when you need it. Everyone needs to take a deep breath.” As the holiday party filled up, a cryptocurrency rapper called CoinDaddy — Arya Bahmanyar, 28 — was getting ready to perform. Formerly a commercial real estate agent, Mr. Bahmanyar works full time at CoinDaddy after becoming a self-described crypto-millionaire (“you think I would dress up like this if I wasn’t?”). “Right now all our entertainers come from outside crypto culture — not inside crypto, and we’ve got to change that,” he said. He pointed to his outfit — a long white fake mink coat, gold-heeled shoes — and said, “It’s gold, right? It’s gold. It’s a niche, and I’m going to fill it.” He says he is going to shoot a music video soon for a song called “Lambo Party” and another called “Cryptomom,” about “all these moms are pumping in their children’s savings accounts.” Maria Lomeli, 56, came to the party to find the people she had put a lot of trust in. A housekeeper from Pacifica, Calif., she said she had invested $12,000 in cryptocurrencies over the last few weeks after reading about it in the news. She wore running shoes and a zip-up jacket that said, “Cinemark, the best seats in town.” She worked there cleaning out theaters. Now she cleans houses. Banks, she said, were designed to steal. Taxes left her supporting a government that she felt didn’t support her. “Charges for sending money to my daughter, interest on our loans,” she said. "And then the money we pay in taxes goes to wars and whatever else they want.” She found a Bitcoin event in the city and asked people there how to buy Bitcoin on her phone. She invested $1,000. It went up. So she put in $10,000 more, she said, along with $1,000 in a currency called Litecoin. Both her children have discouraged this. “And maybe I’m going to lose it,” she said. “Maybe I’m going to keep cleaning houses. But something is telling me I can trust this generation. My instinct is telling me this is the future.” She had to leave the party early because parking downtown is expensive, she said. She zipped up her jacket and left on her own.
Five years ago, I wrote   about virtual currencies, documenting the sizable stockpile of Bitcoins that the Winklevoss twins, Cameron and Tyler, had amassed. At the time, I figured Bitcoin would be a flash in the pan, with roughly the life span of pet rocks or Furbys. But neither Bitcoin nor the Winklevii, as they’re known, has withered under the unending stream of skepticism. The value of a single Bitcoin is now up more than 11,000 from when I wrote that first story, and  , at least on paper. I have continued writing about Bitcoin throughout its remarkable rise, but I could have never anticipated the way the technology has broken out over the past year, with everyone from Vladimir Putin to mom-and-pop investors in South Korea looking at how to use and profit from the technology. (Most recently, I wrote about the enormous   supporting Bitcoin, which now uses as much energy as some medium-sized countries.) These developments have been enough to turn me, over the last year, into essentially a full-time cryptocurrency reporter. It’s safe to say that’s a first for The Times. Before this all began, I was covering financial markets and banks from New York. That gave me a grounding to begin understanding this, but Bitcoin has turned into a very different kind of financial market. At the banks, I kept hearing about how they were taking this technology seriously as something that might change their business in the long run. That is because beneath the digital tokens, Bitcoin introduced a new kind of crowdsourced financial infrastructure, known as the blockchain, that allows for the creation of money and financial records that aren’t maintained by any central authority like a bank or a government. Claims about Bitcoin’s longevity differ dramatically. If you listen only to virtual currency aficionados, you would think that digital money is certain to dethrone the dollar as the global reserve currency and kill Wall Street, to boot. I get dozens of emails every day from entrepreneurs who tell me how they are going to use the technology introduced by Bitcoin to revolutionize the music industry, or shipping business, or even democracy itself. Meanwhile, very smart people like Warren Buffett and Joseph Stiglitz have continued to say that the whole thing is just a bubble waiting to burst. How is a single journalist supposed to work through it all? It can feel a bit like being there at the invention of the stock market, but with no certainty that stocks would actually work as promised — and with everything hinging on software that few people understand. Certainly one part of this requires understanding the technical details of  . The time I’ve spent grappling with the inner workings of virtual currencies has given me a sense of why so many computer scientists see the Bitcoin network as real technological innovation and not just a token that people buy and sell. I have a good stable of geeks who help walk me through the details when I get confused. And when I go to dinner parties it comes in handy — everyone these days wants to talk about how Bitcoin works and whether it is a bubble. But from that first article about the Winklevoss twins, I have tried to focus, whenever possible, on the real people who are buying and using Bitcoin and other virtual currencies, and what is motivating them. That has taken me to Argentina, where I saw how people are using virtual currencies to escape the inflation their local currency is experiencing. It has also led me to the online black markets, where virtual currencies have made it easier for addicts to buy deadly drugs from China and for criminals to collect ransom payments. It is also the real-world usage that tests whether Bitcoin and other virtual currencies are able to live up to the big promises that they are making. With most virtual currency projects, I’ve found that there are relatively few real-world transactions to back up the big, speculative bets that investors are making. Perhaps most fascinating is how these new currencies draw communities around them. It’s a potent reminder that all money is a social construct: The more people who believe a Bitcoin or dollar will retain its value in a week, the greater the value the currency will have. But these are still early days. The death of Bitcoin has been wrongfully proclaimed many times already. For my part, The Times’s rules against investing in what we write about has allowed me to be equally open to this going up or down. Beyond that, these virtual currencies are all living economics experiments, testing how different sorts of incentives create different behaviors. Bitcoin has an elaborate system of carrots and sticks designed to attract followers and to increase the cybersecurity of the Bitcoin network. But these incentives don’t always work as expected. That uncertainty is what makes it so interesting to watch — and to report on.
Until last week, the comedian and television creator Donald Glover was working on an animated series for FX about the Marvel superhero Deadpool, a violent mercenary character known for his wisecracks and toilet humor. By this week, the project had been canceled and Mr. Glover was on Twitter publicly raising more questions about what led to his departure from the show. The project, planned as a 10-episode run for the FXX channel and announced in May, was to have been a collaboration with Mr. Glover’s brother Stephen, another pairing of the siblings behind the show “Atlanta,” which airs on FX. (FXX is FX’s sister channel, and both are owned by 21st Century Fox.) But on Saturday, FX, citing “creative differences,” announced that the project had been canceled. Its statement said the Glovers had agreed to part ways with the network and with Marvel television. In an article about the announcement,   the show “may have been a casualty of Donald Glover’s packed schedule.” Mr. Glover, who also releases music under the name Childish Gambino, disputed that characterization in a tweet thread on Wednesday: “For the record: I wasn’t too busy to work on ‘Deadpool,’” he said. He then posted pages of a script that used the Deadpool character — who is known for speaking to readers or moviegoers directly — to think through the cancellation. In the script, which is filled with pop culture references, including several that allude to events from the last few days, Deadpool considers whether racism was a factor in the cancellation and remarks upon specific scripts that may have alienated the Glovers’ collaborators. Mr. Glover’s tweet thread was a remarkable way to shed a light upon industry drama that does not often reach social media, a public statement in the form of a puzzle in the form of a script that both confounded and intrigued his fans. The actor had recently   in which he commented extensively on his relationship with FX while working on “Atlanta,” a critically acclaimed show that has won two Golden Globes and two Emmys. In it, he suggested that the network did not understand the show’s characters and that he had to mislead the network to get his vision on the air. But John Solberg, a network spokesman for FX, said that no one at the network had taken issue with those comments and that the unraveling of the Deadpool project had nothing to do with the interview. He said that the network had supported the brothers’’s vision for the show but that Marvel owned the intellectual property rights to the Deadpool character and had decided to go a different way. He also emphasized that there was no acrimony between FX and Marvel, and said that creative differences often led to projects falling apart. The 14-page script Mr. Glover posted to Twitter was labeled if it were the series finale of the canceled show. Halfway through the story, Deadpool, who seems throughout as if he may be speaking for Mr. Glover, addresses the show’s cancellation directly. “You know, I’m not mad about this whole ‘canceled thing,’” the script reads. “I actually think it’s a good thing. I mean, is it even a good time to have a violent, gun loving white man ranting on TV?” There is a brief pause, and the script continues: “Other than the PRESIDENT!” Deadpool then considers the factors that may have led to the show’s cancellation. He wonders whether it could have been canceled because of racism. He then begins to mention what may have been specific episodes written by the Glovers, including one about goat yoga ( ), another that included the singer Taylor Swift, and a third in which a character makes a rude joke about people who buy Marvel toys. Marvel declined to comment. Mr. Glover did not respond to emails. The script, which says it was written by Mr. Glover, includes several references to recent news events: jokes about the rise of bitcoin and  , as well as digs at Ben Carson and President Trump. It takes mild shots at the rappers Rich the Kid and 6ix9ine. (A recurring gag is that the characters to whom Deadpool is speaking do not understand his references to black culture.) Deadpool also refers   and to   published Monday that related a story about an anonymous female celebrity said to have bitten Beyoncé.
The Winklevoss twins have carved an unorthodox path toward fame in the American business world. They went to Harvard University and then on to the Olympics as rowers. Along the way, they fought a legal battle with Mark Zuckerberg over the ownership of Facebook. In the Oscar-nominated movie “The Social Network,” they were portrayed as uptight gentry, outwitted by Mr. Zuckerberg, the brilliant, budding tech mogul. Cameron, the left-handed Winklevoss brother, and Tyler, the right-handed one, followed that with a risky bet: They used money from a $65 million settlement with Mr. Zuckerberg to load up on Bitcoin. That turned them into  , back when Bitcoin was primarily known as a currency for online drug dealers. More than a few people in Silicon Valley and on Wall Street saw the towering twins as the naïve — if chiseled — faces of the latest tulip bulb mania. Many still do. But the soaring value of Bitcoin in recent months is giving the brothers a moment of vindication, and quite a bit more than that: Their Bitcoin stockpile was worth around $1.3 billion on Tuesday. “We’ve turned that laughter and ridicule into oxygen and wind at our back,” Tyler Winklevoss said in an interview last week. It is unclear how fleeting their vindication, or their fortune, will be. Many Bitcoin aficionados are expecting a major correction to the  , which has gone from $1,000 for one coin at the beginning of the year to around $18,500 on Tuesday. If nothing else, the growing fortune of the 36-year-old Winklevoss twins is a reminder that for all the small investors   this year, the biggest winners have been a relatively small number of early holders who had plenty of money to start with and have been riding a price roller coaster for years. (The mysterious creator of Bitcoin, Satoshi Nakamoto, is believed by researchers to  ) Some of these new Bitcoin millionaires are cashing out and buying  ,   or even low-risk bond funds. The Winklevoss twins, though, said they had no intention to diversify. “We still think it is probably one of the best investments in the world and will be for the decades to come,” Tyler Winklevoss said. “And if it’s not, we’d rather live with disappointment than regret.” They have collected an additional $350 million or so of other virtual currencies, most of it in the Bitcoin alternative called Ethereum. The brothers are also majority owners of the virtual currency exchange they founded, Gemini, which most likely takes their joint holdings to a value well over $2 billion, or enough to make each of them a billionaire. They have sold almost none of their original holdings. While they both have apartments in downtown Manhattan, they say they live relatively spartan lives with few luxuries. Cameron drives an old S.U.V.; Tyler doesn’t have a car at all. The Winklevoss twins’ financial rise began during their settlement with Mr. Zuckerberg in 2008. Their lawyers urged them to take the $45 million (after lawyers’ fees) in cash. But they wanted to be paid in shares of Facebook. “The lawyers thought we were crazy,” Cameron Winklevoss said last week. “We thought they were crazy for taking cash.” By the time Facebook went public in 2012, their stock was worth around $300 million, their rowing careers were over, and they were looking for something new. When they began buying Bitcoin in late 2012, the price of an individual coin was below $10. Few people in Silicon Valley or on Wall Street had publicly expressed interest in the virtual currency. Over a few months, the brothers bought 1 percent of all the outstanding Bitcoin at the time — some 120,000 tokens. As they did, the price soared, making their Bitcoin portfolio worth around $11 million by the time they went public with it in April 2013. Their buying spree was mocked at the time, and a few of their early decisions fueled that derision. They also invested in Bitinstant, one of the first companies to trade Bitcoins online. Bitinstant’s executives, in fact, had tutored the brothers in the basics of Bitcoin. The chief executive of Bitinstant, Charlie Shrem, was arrested in 2014, accused of helping to supply Bitcoins to users of online drug markets. Mr. Shrem pleaded guilty to lesser charges and was sentenced to a year in jail. The Winklevosses were never implicated in the wrongdoing, which happened before they became investors. While that drama was unfolding, the twins applied to create the first Bitcoin exchange traded fund, or E.T.F., an investment product that would hold Bitcoins but be traded on stock exchanges. That brought more criticism from people who wondered why someone would buy a fund rather than Bitcoin itself. In March, regulators  . On top of all that, until last year the price of Bitcoin was sliding and the virtual currency concept was looking wobbly. But the Winklevosses, who once bet that years of punishing rowing practices would take them to the Olympics, held their ground. “We are very comfortable in very high-risk environments with absolutely no guarantee of success,” Tyler Winklevoss said. “I don’t mean existing in that environment for days, weeks or months. I mean year after year.” They sold  , a name that means twins in Latin. Like the Bitcoin E.T.F., their investment in Gemini was driven by their experience with the difficulty of buying and securely storing Bitcoin. Every Bitcoin sits in an address that can be accessed only with the corresponding password, or private key. The problem with this system is that anyone who gets hold of a private key can easily take the Bitcoin. And unlike money taken from a bank account, stolen Bitcoin are essentially impossible to retrieve. A number of virtual currency exchanges and wallets have collectively lost billions of dollars’ worth of Bitcoin to thieves. The Winklevosses came up with an elaborate system to store and secure their own private keys. They cut up printouts of their private keys into pieces and then distributed them in envelopes to safe deposit boxes around the country, so if one envelope were stolen the thief would not have the entire key. With Gemini, they have created a high-tech version of this process to hold customer money. Getting into the company’s wallets requires multiple signatures from cryptographically sealed devices that were never linked to the internet. Gemini got a license from New York State regulators that allows them to hold Bitcoins for regulated banks and asset managers — something essentially no other virtual currency companies can do. That has turned Gemini into one of the most trusted destinations for sophisticated investors. “Gemini is an underappreciated exchange, one of the few exchanges I trust as a custodian,” said Ari Paul, a managing partner at the virtual currency hedge fund BlockTower Capital. Gemini is now expanding from its old 5,000-square-foot offices to new, 35,000-square-foot facilities in Midtown Manhattan. This doesn’t mean Gemini or the Winklevosses have ironed out all the kinks. Like many other exchanges, Gemini has struggled to stay online in the deluge of new customers in recent weeks. These growing pains are part of the reason the brothers say they are holding on to their Bitcoin. They believe virtual currencies are still a long way from real mainstream adoption. They said they might look at selling when the value of all the Bitcoin in circulation approaches the value of all gold in the world — some $7 trillion or $8 trillion compared with the $310 billion value of all Bitcoin on Tuesday — given that they think Bitcoin is set to replace gold as a rare commodity. But then Tyler Winklevoss questioned even that, pointing out the ways that he believes Bitcoin is better than gold. “In a funny way, I’m not sure we’d even sell there,” he said. “Bitcoin is more than gold — it’s a programmable store of money. It may continue to innovate.”

Bitcoin may save the internet? Celebrity social media feeds are bunk, and reality TV drag queens can unlock the mysteries of gender? Clearly there’s a lot to discuss. And we (that’s our  ) are here to help, with a few fantastic recent stories about the intersection of pop culture and technology — handpicked for Australian readers. When you’re done reading, come on over to our   for more discussion. ______ Some of us are human, some of us are bots. It sounds dystopian, but really: it’s just your social media feed.  shines a light on social media’s murky black market, where politicians, athletes and celebrities are buying millions of fake followers. Even Australia’s politicians have been scrutinized: Tony Abbott reportedly gained 70,000 followers in 12 hours ahead of the 2013 election. Perhaps more alarmingly, these social drones might be borrowing your identity. Tools like  , although not perfect, can tell you how “real” your followers are – or if you’re just tweeting into the bot-o-sphere. ______ If you think Bitcoin is just about money, you’re missing the point. Bitcoin’s foundation, blockchain,  . It sounds lofty, but disrupters have changed the nature of the internet before. And if you still don’t really get what cryptocurrency is, don’t worry: Mr. Johnson, one of Silicon Valley’s most respected tech writers, breaks it down with refreshing clarity. . There have been a few key moments that flung drag queens into the world’s popular consciousness. One is “Priscilla, Queen of the Desert,” Stephen Elliot’s 1994 colorful and vulgar musical, and most recently: “RuPaul’s Drag Race.” The original Times   of “Priscilla” applauds how willing the film’s cross-dressing characters are to “laugh at themselves.” And 24 years later, reality TV host and drag performer  . Stream Season 3 of “RuPaul’s Drag Race: All Stars” on  . ______ Millions of women around the world have said #MeToo, but the impact of those words can depend on your level of celebrity, wealth, skin color, or just where you are in the world.  like “anti-sexual harassment” on social media, effectively muzzling the movement. One professor suggests it’s partly because “people are not encouraged to speak up against superiors” in Chinese culture. As Australia continues to grapple with  , could international students be less likely to report harassment? We’re glad you asked.   to get weekly missives on gender and sexual harassment news in your inbox each week. Who would have thought painstakingly slow, hand-painted messages would be an incredibly effective way to cut through the digital cacophony? Paul Lindahl didn’t. But he pursued the outmoded career path anyway. Now, as brands are searching for new ways to convey “authenticity” and “meaning,”  , Coca-Cola and Spotify from his paint-spattered Brooklyn studio. By hand-painting your advertisement over a well-loved, 20-year-old community mural, like  last year. It didn’t go down well. “Whoever thought that operational security could be wrecked by a Fitbit?” said Nathan Ruser, 20, in an interview from Thailand. Mr. Ruser, who studies international security at Australian National University, recently   his discovery that a fitness app had revealed the locations of military sites in Syria and elsewhere. .  Check out Mr. Ruser’s  , where he’s commenting and sharing smart takes on the security failure (in between tweets about triple j’s Hottest 100 countdown.)
SAN FRANCISCO — The virtual currency Bitcoin has been swept up in yet another speculative frenzy, pushing its price toward the peak it last reached in late 2013. The price of Bitcoin has been buoyed by increased interest from places like Venezuela, where  , and India, where the government   from circulation. More broadly, a tilt toward isolationism that has emerged in American and European politics — highlighted by Donald J. Trump’s election victory — has given a new sheen to a currency that can move between countries with little oversight. “The more there is an expectation for new barriers to be erected, the more there is an expectation that Bitcoin will be valuable for moving money across borders,” said Gil Luria, the director of research at Wedbush Securities. Still, most of the people actually buying and selling Bitcoin these days are coming from a single country: China. Some wealthy Chinese have used Bitcoin to evade their government’s strict controls on moving money in and out of the country, according to Bitcoin specialists in China. But the heavy trading on Chinese Bitcoin exchanges, much of it by automated software, suggests that most of the price movement is a result of bets by speculators. In recent days, the price of a Bitcoin has been about 3 percent higher on these exchanges than on dollar denominated exchanges, suggesting more demand in China than outside. The importance of speculators suggests that the value of Bitcoin is still driven by the hope of how it might be used someday, rather than real world use today, which has generally been hard to quantify. In dollar terms, a Bitcoin was going for about $1,025 on Tuesday, or about 140 percent more than what it cost at the beginning of 2016. The volatile price has led many analysts to conclude that is less similar to a currency than to a commodity, like gold, which has a value resulting from its scarcity. In Bitcoin’s case, the rules of the network dictate that only 21 million Bitcoin will ever be created. The recent rise has brought the price of one Bitcoin to within striking distance of the price of an ounce of gold, which was about $1,150 on Monday. The price has increased in the last year despite the lack of interest in Bitcoin from banks and a majority of more sophisticated investors. After showing early interest in the currency, most big banks have moved on to make investments in the  , the new type of ledger technology introduced by Bitcoin, while eschewing Bitcoin itself. Some   on some sort of blockchain inspired by but unrelated to the blockchain that Bitcoin uses. Bitcoin and the blockchain were introduced in late 2008 by a mysterious coder who used the name Satoshi Nakamoto. Anyone with a computer and internet access can open a Bitcoin wallet and help maintain the blockchain ledger where all Bitcoin transactions are recorded. Because it is run by a decentralized network of computers around the world, Bitcoin does not require a central authority like a central bank or financial institution. That has made it attractive to people who hope to do financial transactions anonymously, such as the drug dealers who have sold illicit goods for Bitcoin on the   website and its successors. New Bitcoins are released at regular intervals to computers helping to support the Bitcoin network, and previously released Bitcoins can be bought and sold on exchanges around the world. Since 2009, the price of Bitcoin has generally been defined by long periods of stability marked by short periods of speculative excitement. The only other time the price of Bitcoin has exceeded $1,000 was in late 2013, when the demand was driven by a surge of interest from Chinese investors and traders. The price soon crashed when one of the largest Bitcoin exchanges, Mt. Gox, which was based in Tokyo and went bankrupt, announced that it had lost most of the Bitcoins held by its customers (the cause remains in dispute). The Bitcoin price fell to its low — under $200 — in early 2015. Since then, the price has risen in fits and starts, in part because of continuing hacking and fraud, and because of fights over the direction of the Bitcoin network. Many Bitcoin businesses have   to change the number of transactions that can move through the network every day. But the proposed changes have run into opposition from the team of coders responsible for maintaining the basic Bitcoin software. Many Chinese Bitcoin companies have  . That disagreement has led to slowdowns on the Bitcoin network, with some transactions taking days to be processed. The slowdowns have made it harder to use Bitcoin for everyday payments. But through the controversy the security of the basic Bitcoin wallets and transaction software has held up, making it a potential alternative for people in countries with less secure currencies and financial institutions. In November,   after the government announced moves to quickly ban the largest Indian bank notes, in an effort to crack down on corruption. The continued fall in the value of the Venezuelan currency, the bolívar, has led to reports about   for Bitcoin. But despite the new demand, the total value of all outstanding Bitcoin, about $16 billion, is still only that of a medium-size American company, and is not large enough to sustain the demand of even a moderate number of Indians or Venezuelans looking to store their wealth in the virtual currency. That points back to the importance of speculators, who are betting that someday soon people worldwide will turn to Bitcoin for their daily financial needs, and push the price much higher. “I ascribe only 10 percent of the value of Bitcoin to current day usage, and more like 90 percent of it to the expectation of future usage,” Mr. Luria of Webush Securities said.
Good morning, readers! It was an interesting week in the tech world. Let’s get to the news. One thread in the yearlong backlash against the tech industry concerns inequality. Many tech giants are built on scale — the idea that they can serve billions of customers while employing far fewer people than corporate giants of yore. Those dynamics are good for business, but they don’t make for great optics. There’s a danger that tech C.E.O.s come to be seen as out-of-touch coastal elites. Well, they want you to know they aren’t. Amazon is so all-in on America that it wants to open another headquarters here; on Thursday,   the 20 cities that made its cut as possible locations. There’s one city in Canada — Toronto — and several coastal enclaves (New York, Washington, Los Angeles), but there’s oh-so-much Middle America here, too. Wherever it ends up is, at this point, almost beside the point; Amazon has won so much positive coverage from the selection process that it can already count the story as a big win. Meanwhile, in its own , Apple announced this week that it would bring a historic pile of cash back to America. The company has about $270 billion in cash, but it had parked most of it overseas for tax reasons. Under the new tax code signed into law last year by President Trump, Apple said, it will pay $38 billion in taxes on that money — the largest tax bill ever paid — and invest billions in new facilities and people  . The company is also giving many of its employees  . Apple’s announcement made  . And the president’s victory lap is, I think, somewhat deserved. Trump and the tech industry have not had the warmest relationship, but it’s clear that his campaign — in which he constantly harangued Apple and Amazon for perceived slights — has shaken the industry from its presumption that everyone in the country loves it. Just a few weeks ago, people brave enough to enter the market for Bitcoin and its many rival electronic currencies looked like lucky geniuses.  , even billions — and you were kicking yourself for overlooking the crypto boom. Well, now you’re the genius (if still poor). Much of the cryptocurrency market  , with Bitcoin falling below $10,000 at one point, more than 50 percent off its December peak.  was flooded with panicked crypto lovers, but, as it usually does, the market leveled off by the end of the week, and crypto-heads were professing to be back on board for the long haul. Godspeed, I guess. There wasn’t so much else in tech news this week, so take some time to read some great magazine stories. In Bloomberg Businessweek, Eric Newcomer and Brad Stone have   at how Travis Kalanick, Uber’s co-founder and former hard-charging C.E.O., fell from grace. Among the details: During one harrowing Kalanick-caused scandal, he fell to “his hands and knees and began squirming on the floor.” Also, Steven Johnson has   about the uses for the blockchain, the technology undergirding cryptocurrencies.  , there’s a lovely ode to blogging and The Awl, a much-beloved Brooklyn web magazine that sadly called it quits this week. Speaking of quits: See you next week!
• The markets and Trump’s tariffs. • Jared Kushner is criticized for meetings with business moguls who later helped his family’s company. • Stephen Schwarzman had a good 2017. • Walmart is the latest business to wade into the gun debate. • And Spotify opens its books ahead of its direct listing. Investors might be tempted to take a trade skirmish in stride. When President George W. Bush slapped high tariffs on steel imports 16 years ago, the stock market slipped a bit but recovered in the following days. Likewise, stocks may bounce back from the decline that followed the news on Thursday that President Trump will soon introduce tariffs on steel and aluminum. In recent years, the global economic order appeared to be under threat a number of times. But stock markets rebounded from Britain’s vote to leave the European Union, Europe’s sovereign debt crisis, and the debt-ceiling clashes in the United States. And there is a good chance that President Trump’s tariffs won’t cause a great deal of collateral economic damage. They may end up being softer than Thursday’s headlines suggest, as globalists push back. And like President Bush’s tariffs, President Trump’s may be quite narrow in focus and exist for a relatively short period. Investors could learn to live with those, just as they’ve mostly shrugged off possible changes to the North American Free Trade Agreement. But vulnerabilities exist right now that could magnify any negative impact of President Trump’s tariffs. The stock market is still highly valued after a searing rally that took it to an all-time high in January. The Federal Reserve expects to increase interest rates multiple times this year. Compare that with March 2002, when President Bush introduced his trade restrictions: The Fed was cutting interest rates, a policy stance that can help support the economy and the stock market; stocks were nowhere near their peak of two years earlier; and President Bush’s administration was, overall, globalist in its outlook and didn’t want to become isolated ahead of the Iraq war. Importantly, the United States economy is less dominant than it was 16 years ago. Last year, the United States accounted for an estimated 24 percent of the world’s gross domestic product, using data from the International Monetary Fund. In 2002, the share was 32 percent. If other countries retaliate, and tariffs broaden, the United States’ economy may be less resilient than some in the Trump administration may believe. We asked yesterday if his family’s real estate business was his biggest liability. Our colleagues’ latest story shows  . • Josh Harris of Apollo Global Management, an adviser on infrastructure issues, met with Mr. Kushner several times last year. In November, Apollo lent $184 million to Kushner Companies, triple the size of the investment firm’s average property loan. • Citigroup’s C.E.O., Michael Corbat, met with Mr. Kushner in the spring, and shortly afterward the bank lent Kushner Companies $325 million. Mr. Kushner, his family business, Apollo and Citi all said that nothing improper had happened. But the meetings raise questions about how the Kushner Companies is weighing down the political fortunes of President Trump’s son-in-law. Mr. Kushner has already had his interim security clearance downgraded amid a feud with the White House chief of staff, John Kelly. The  , “Mr. Kushner and Ivanka have to decide if they’d serve themselves and the president better by walking away from their formal White House roles.” • The White House is set to announce new tariffs on steel and aluminum imports, according to unidentified sources. ( ) • Hope Hicks, the White House communications director and one of Mr. Trump’s closest aides, plans to step down. ( ) • Mr. Trump publicly criticized Attorney General Jeff Sessions as “DISGRACEFUL” for not ordering his own investigation into the handling of the Russia inquiry. ( ) U.S. stock markets slipped around the time Mr. Trump made his comments about tariffs, with declines in the industrial sector outpacing the overall market. The Standard & Poor’s 500 industrial sector was down more than 2 percent, compared to the overall benchmark index which was down a bit less than 1 percent as of around 1:30 p.m. Automakers, large consumers of steel and aluminum, fell sharply. Another large consumer of those materials, aircraft maker Boeing also declined. As the country’s largest exporter, Boeing would also likely be affected by rising global trade tensions if other nations responded to tariffs from the United States. The comments also come on the same day as Bill Dudley, president of the New York Federal Reserve,   about protectionism: The co-founder and chief executive of Blackstone raked in $786.5 million last year, his biggest take-home ever,  . • Apollo’s Leon Black took home $191.3 million • Carlyle co-founders David Rubenstein, Bill Conway and Dan D’Aniello divvied up a combined payout of $193 million. • KKR’s Henry Kravis and George Roberts received a combined $343 million. Jerome Powell, the new chairman of the Federal Reserve,  : Mr. Powell said the House Financial Services Committee on Tuesday  for the United States economy had brightened in recent months. He added that the Fed expected to continue raising rates gradually and could even pick up the pace. The markets seemed to interpret the remarks as signaling the Fed would be more aggressive than expected in raising rates. Here are the   from the Commerce Department: • Consumer prices as measured by the personal consumption expenditures (PCE) price index, rose 0.4 percent. • That was the biggest increase since September.In the 12 months through January, the PCE price index rose 1.7 percent. • So-called core PCE, which excludes food and energy, the PCE advanced 0.3 percent in January — the largest gain since January 2017. • Year-over-year core PCE, the Federal Reserve’s preferred inflation measure, rose at 1.5 percent in January. • The core PCE price index has undershot the U.S. central bank’s 2 percent target since mid-2012. Just as the company isn’t holding a traditional I.P.O., it isn’t holding the usual kind of marketing road show either. On March 15, the music streaming giant will — what else? — live-stream a presentation for potential investors. Here’s what to expect, from  : Spotify adds that it will hold additional “investor education meetings,” which would likely be reserved for the most important investors. While traditional I.P.O.s generally post video versions of their road show presentations on sites like  , the company looks like it’s trying something different. DoorDash, the food delivery startup,  from a group of investors led by SoftBank’s Vision Fund and that included Sequoia Capital and Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund. The amount is almost triple what the company had raised in the last five years,   and values the company at $1.4 billion DoorDash uses a courier model popularized by Uber, meaning that it sends independent contractors to pick up and deliver orders. The company said it has partnered with nearly 90 percent of the top 100 restaurant chains, including Wendy’s, Chick-Fil-A, IHOP, PF Chang’s, the Cheesecake Factory and Five Guys. It was one thing for Dick’s Sporting Goods to set an age requirement for firearms sales. It’s another for the country’s biggest gun seller to  . What each is doing: Walmart: Raising the minimum age for purchases of guns or ammunition to 21, and eliminating products that look like assault-style rifles. (The company stopped selling AR-15s two years ago.) Dick’s: Requiring buyers to be at least 21 and dropping AR-15s from its 35 Field and Stream outlets. The NYT notes that Walmart explicitly linked the new rules to the school shooting in Parkland, Fla. The company said in  , “In light of recent events, we’ve taken an opportunity to review our policy on firearm sales.” The gun control debate remains a tricky one to navigate, though more C.E.O.s feel compelled to speak up. Michael Dowling of Northwell Health  , “We are people that other people look up to.” While some capitalist activists are urging big mutual funds to sell stocks in gun companies, Stephen Gandel of Gadfly argues that such divestment campaigns  . President Trump   for tougher gun regulations and urged Republicans to push back against the National Rifle Association. The group   “great TV” but “bad policy.” • Meet Martin Gilbert, whose investment fund could help decide whether the satellite broadcaster Sky sells itself to Comcast or Fox. ( ) • Bayer is willing to sell more assets to win regulatory approval of its $62.5 billion takeover of Monsanto. ( ) • Saudi Arabia’s sovereign wealth fund has invested more than $200 million in Penske Media, the owner of Rolling Stone and Variety, according to an unidentified source. ( ) • The British insurer Equitable Life has hired Goldman Sachs to examine a possible sale. ( ) The hedge fund mogul finally called quits on his five-year campaign against the supplements company Herbalife, which he called a pyramid scheme and whose stock he once declared would go down to zero.  at the famous short bet, from Matthew Goldstein of the NYT: Herbalife’s shares closed yesterday at $92.10, a record high. Herbalife was at the center of Mr. Ackman’s   with Carl Icahn, who was (and still is) betting on the company’s ability to grow. , the subject of rumors that the conglomerate may break itself up. Brooke Sutherland of Gadfly applauded the  . David Einhorn  . Viking Global Investors is the latest firm to wade into  . The British retailer Whitbread   against an activist campaign by Sachem Head. David Rubenstein, the Carlyle Group co-founder, told CNBC at the SuperReturn conference in Berlin that, over all, businesses  : Why? Largely the tax cuts, for which both Republicans and Democrats are   to support their political arguments.  Liu He, Beijing’s top economic adviser,   like Jamie Dimon of JPMorgan Chase and David Solomon of Goldman Sachs amid heightening trade tensions between China and the U.S. . Viking Global Investors is the latest firm to wade into  . The British retailer Whitbread   against an activist campaign by Sachem Head. The commission   to people and companies who have arranged initial coin offerings, signaling that tighter regulations may be in the offing. More from Jean Eaglesham and Paul Vigna of  : • How productive is spending money and natural resources on … buying digital money? ( ) • Could your internet-connected security camera be hijacked to mine virtual currencies? ( ) • Bitcoin is at $10,666.90 this morning, according to  . • As Brexit looms, not everyone wants Britain’s Serious Fraud Office to be completely successful in cracking down on corporate crime. ( ) • A former fraud investigator for Wells Fargo said the bank fired him in retaliation for his internal complaints about mishandled inquiries. ( ) • Bank of America has fired two employees for interfering in an investigation into Omeed Malik, a former executive accused of sexual misconduct, according to unidentified sources. ( ) • Goldman Sachs and Société Générale have submitted final bids for the Commerzbank unit that houses the lender’s exchange-traded fund business, unnamed sources said. ( ) • Two experts debate the merits of rolling back banking regulations. ( ) • How low can unemployment go? Economists have no idea, and their uncertainty has huge consequences. ( ) • Auto-parts suppliers have called for cleaner cars, splitting with their main customers: automakers. ( ) • Exxon Mobil is abandoning its joint exploration ventures with Rosneft, retreating from what was one of its most promising investments until Western sanctions got in the way. ( ) • The tech entrepreneur Susan Wu has started a school in Australia, but critics worry about Silicon Valley overreach. ( ) • Everything that made Warren Buffett the celebrated investor he is lines up with what we’ve learned about the tendencies of female investors. ( ) • Fosun International is looking for more deals abroad, and its chairman says there are no financial or political barriers in its way. ( ) • The Microsoft co-founder Paul Allen said he was investing an additional $125 million into his nonprofit computer research lab for an effort to teach machines “common sense.” ( )



Hackers using the name “Mr. Smith” posted a fresh cache on Monday of stolen   files online, and demanded that the network pay a ransom of several million dollars to prevent further such releases. The data dump included what appear to be scripts from five “Game of Thrones” episodes, including one coming episode, and a month’s worth of email from the account of Leslie Cohen, HBO’s vice president for film programming. There were also internal documents, including a report of legal claims against the network and job offer letters to top executives. HBO, which previously   of “proprietary information,” said it was continuing to investigate and was working with the police and security experts. The network said on Monday that it still did not believe that its email system as a whole had been compromised. This is the second data release from the hack. So far, the leaks at HBO have been limited, falling well short of the chaos inflicted on   in 2014. In that attack, hackers   and released personal information, including salaries and   numbers, of nearly 50,000 current and former Sony employees. In the aftermath of the attack, the Sony Pictures chief,  , was ousted. Those behind the HBO theft claim to have more data, including scripts, coming episodes of HBO shows and movies, and information damaging to HBO. “Game of Thrones,” currently in its penultimate season, is   and has long been  . In a video directed to HBO’s chief executive, Richard Plepler, “Mr. Smith” used white text on a black background to threaten further disclosures if HBO did not pay the ransom. To stop the leaks, the hackers demanded “our 6 month salary in bitcoin,” which they implied is at least $6 million.
• Why Walmart is raising its hourly wage. • South Korea spooks the market for digital money. • Bond market investors feel some fear, but will stock market bulls? • And what will happen next with the Trump administration’s plans to reopen offshore drilling? : • Raising the starting wage for all hourly workers to  , starting next month and costing an extra  • Expanding maternity leave to   and paid parental leave to  • Adding a new benefit for adoption expenses of  • Giving out bonuses of   for eligible workers, determined by tenure, up to a total of  Walmart said in its most recent annual report that it had   That’s much bigger than any other company that has   to date. (AT&T, for instance, has roughly 200,000 employees who will likely benefit from that company’s $1,000-per-worker bonus.) : Walmart said in its most recent annual report that it had   That’s much bigger than any other company that has   to date. (AT&T, for instance, has roughly 200,000 employees who will likely benefit from that company’s $1,000-per-worker bonus.) The retailer’s efforts to keep workers  , which has led companies to fight to keep workers. (The current unemployment rate is at just  .) More from Matthew Boyle of Bloomberg: Dropbox has filed confidentially with the Securities and Exchange Commission to go public,  The closely-held file-sharing company with a valuation of $10 billion is among a group of high-profile tech start-ups that investors have been waiting for to go public. The offering would follow the disappointing debut of another of those companies, Snap, in March. Shares of Snap are down 15 percent from their initial public offering price. Goldman Sachs and JPMorgan will be the lead underwriters on the I.P.O. Dropbox had   of more than $1 billion, its chief executive, Drew Houston, told Bloomberg in January last year.  “A timing quirk in the tax overhaul that President Donald Trump signed last month may be good news for companies such as Apple Inc., Microsoft Corp. and Cisco Systems Inc., all of which began their fiscal years before Jan. 1.” The provision at issue, “in effect, gives a company until the end of its fiscal year to measure what’s cash and what isn’t for tax purposes,” That means companies, which began their fiscal years before Jan. 1, have more time “to reduce foreign cash they’ll accumulate this year.” Apple, for one, “may be able to lop more than $4 billion off a future tax bill,” according to Stephen Shay, a tax and business law professor at Harvard Law School, who wrote the “potential loophole” last month. Shares in the money-transfer services provider were up as much as 8 percent this morning after the company said that it was  . It’s not quite the same as becoming Long Blockchain, but it still reflects the enthusiasm among investors that arises when a company associates itself with the virtual currency industry. From Moneygram’s C.E.O., Alex Holmes: Here’s what the veteran Wall Street consigliere  : As of this morning, Bitcoin was down 4.5 percent, Ethereum was down 9 percent and Ripple was down 13 percent, according to  . Thank the South Korean government, which may   in what has been the third-largest market. Officials have been concerned about  . More from Song Jung-a and Bryan Harris of the FT: A spokesman for President Moon Jae-in played down the comments, saying  . But investors remained spooked. Bitcoin fever shows no other signs of stopping, however. Binance.com, a big virtual currency exchange, said that it had   yesterday. And strategists at Goldman Sachs wrote that virtual currencies may  , particularly in developing countries. • Matt Levine writes that a pump-and-dump mentality that has taken hold of some Bitcoin trading. ( ) • The answer to Bitcoin’s energy-use problem could be a 23-million-digit prime number. ( ) • The North American Bitcoin Conference no longer takes Bitcoin for ticket payments. ( ) The S. & P. 500 closed down slightly yesterday at 2,748.23. The Dow did the same, at 25,369.13. As Barron’s writes, “Stocks slid on Wednesday, because sometimes they do that.” But is there cause for fear? Bond investors appear to think so. The yield for 10-year Treasuries   of almost 2.6 percent yesterday. • Central banks’ continuing withdrawal from crisis-era bond purchases • Investor worry that inflation will edge up • That Bloomberg report about   (although a Chinese government agency   on it) That China will use its central bank to   at the U.S. Here’s what Brad Setser of the Council on Foreign Relations told the NYT: Analysts at the Eurasia Group   in a recent note. • Bill Gross declared that we’re now in a bond bear market. ( ) • Richard Barley asks, “Is the great bond blowout finally happening?” ( ) Interior Secretary Ryan Zinke has already removed Florida from his department’s plan to reopen oil drilling off U.S. coastlines — which pleased the state’s governor, Rick Scott, but  . Here’s  : • South Carolina, New Jersey and Maryland, all led by Republicans • New York, North Carolina, Delaware and California, all led by Democrats , from Timothy Puko of the WSJ: “The Rockefellers vs. the Company that Made Them Rockefellers,”  . • The naming of Ajit Jain and Greg Abel as vice chairmen of Berkshire Hathaway, as part of a dispersal of Warren Buffett’s responsibilities, “might sound like a fudge — but it’s also a sensible division of labor,” John Foley writes. ( ) • Tara Lachapelle appears to be in the “Greg Abel is the next Berkshire C.E.O.” camp. ( ) • The Oracle of Omaha himself said that his health was fine and he was staying as C.E.O. He added of the two men: “They both have Berkshire in their blood. They love the company.” ( ) As President Trump negotiates with lawmakers over a deal to protect the undocumented immigrants known as Dreamers, corporate leaders aren’t letting up. An   from 141 signatories — including   of IBM,   of Amazon,   of Facebook,   of Uber and   of Blackstone — demanded a “permanent bipartisan solution.” More from the letter: Several House Republicans have put forth an immigration proposal   for a bipartisan deal. One of them, Representative Raúl Labrador of Idaho, warned, “This is the only bill that’s going to unify the conference, and it’s going to get us to a majority of the conference.” • Mr. Trump declined to commit to being interviewed by Robert Mueller, backing away from a statement last year. And Mr. Mueller  , a veteran cybercrimes prosecutor. ( ) • Mr. Trump’s companies sold more than $35 million worth of real estate last year, 70 percent of it to shell companies that obscured the buyers’ identities. ( ) • During a meeting about immigration, Mr. Trump suggested bringing back earmarks, the practice of stuffing funding for pet projects into legislation. ( ) • Lawmakers in at least six states have introduced bills to forbid internet providers from blocking or slowing down sites or online services, a response to the F.C.C.’s repeal of net neutrality rules. ( ) • The Trump administration plans to unveil a revision to banking rules that mandate lending to poor borrowers. ( ) The showstopper at the American Economic Association’s conference was a panel stocked with women, presenting research that   arrayed against them in the field — and prompting pledges from leaders to do better. More from Jim Tankersley and Noam Scheiber of the NYT:  of the movie “All the Money in the World,” for which Michelle Williams was paid scale and Mark Wahlberg an additional $1.2 million. • The creator of the anonymous “Shitty Media Men” spreadsheet revealed herself amid controversy over whether Harper’s Magazine would do so. ( ) • James Rosen, a former correspondent for Fox News, and Joel Achenbach, a reporter at the WaPo, face allegations of workplace misconduct. ( ,  ) , who’s living in exile in a penthouse in Central Park after lobbing hard-to-verify accusations at China’s elite. Here’s what he said of the anti-corruption czar Wang Qishan, according to Lauren Hilgers of the NYT Magazine: • Lazard has hired  , most recently the co-head of French investment banking at Credit Suisse,   in Paris, Reuters reports. • HSBC has hired  ,   and   for  , Bloomberg reports. • Uber had a system called Ripley to remotely shut down computers and lock up data when police raided its overseas offices, according to three people with knowledge of the system. ( ) • Ferrero of Italy is close to formalizing a $2.8 billion deal for Nestlé’s U.S. candy business. ( ) • Blackstone agreed to pay about $1.1 billion for a luxury resort on the Hawaiian island of Maui, according to a person with knowledge of the deal. ( ) • Google bought Redux, a British start-up whose technology lets phone displays double as speakers. ( ) • Bain Capital, Blackstone Group and Silver Lake have expressed interest in Li Tong Group, an iPhone recycling business that could be worth as much as $1 billion, according to people familiar with the matter. ( ) • SS & C Technology Holdings, which provides tech infrastructure for finance, is in advanced talks to buy DST Systems, a rival also active in the health care market, for more than $5 billion, according to people familiar with the matter. ( ) • Intel released test results showing that its chip security fixes would slow personal computers by no more than 10 percent. Initial reports suggested a larger impact. ( ) • The Federal Reserve’s economic stimulus campaign turned a big profit again in 2017, but the windfall is showing signs of slowing. ( ) • Chinese-born, U.S.-trained tech talent is increasingly returning to China, drawn by plentiful venture capital and government incentives for research. ( ) • How (and why) the former Disney chairman Michael Eisner won over the fan-owners of a fourth-tier English soccer club. ( ) • Private debt collectors brought the Internal Revenue Service $6.7 million in the last fiscal year — at a cost of $20 million. ( ) • Canada has filed a sweeping World Trade Organization case against U.S. tariffs. ( ) • Advisers at some of the biggest discount brokerage firms make more money if they steer clients toward more expensive products, according to disclosures from the firms and former employees. ( )
Initial coin offerings have come out of nowhere in 2017 to become the talk of Silicon Valley and Wall Street. Programmers have raised over $3.2 billion this year by selling their own virtual currencies to investors. That is 3,000 percent more than the amount raised using coin offerings in 2016. Coin offerings are a way for start-ups or online projects to raise money without selling stock or going to venture capitalists — essentially a new form of crowdfunding. The programmers raise money by creating and selling their own virtual currency, generally with rules similar to well-known virtual currencies like Bitcoin. The new tokens are usually designed so that they can be used only on a computing service the programmers are building. Filecoin, which raised $257 million in the largest coin offering to date, is being designed to pay for storage on a global cloud storage network that the creators of Filecoin are promising to build. BET, another coin, is being designed to serve as the chips in an online casino its programmers are promising to build. “Promising to build” is the operative phrase here, because in almost every case the services that will supposedly make these coins valuable have not yet been finished. These coins are generally inspired by older virtual currency systems like Bitcoin or Ethereum, with a cap on the number of coins that will exist — to provide a sense of goldlike scarcity — and a structure that allows them to operate entirely outside the existing financial and regulatory ecosystem. Investors generally buy the new coins by sending the programmers Bitcoin or Ether (the virtual currency inside the Ethereum network). What’s more, many of the coins are stored, moved around and enabled by other Ethereum technology. But the coins sold in coin offerings are meant to exist independent of Bitcoin and Ethereum, with their own free-floating value. (For a more complete explanation of  ,  , and for an   explainer,  .) The name for coin offerings was clearly inspired by the initial public offerings that companies do to sell stock to investors. But unlike stock offerings, coin offerings are generally designed so that investors don’t get an ownership stake in the start-ups. If the coin does provide an ownership stake, the Securities and Exchange Commission has said, the companies must comply with all securities law. A few coins have done this, but most have tried to avoid it. Investors can contribute as much or as little money as they want in these offerings, which are generally more like crowdfunding campaigns that new projects do on Kickstarter or Indiegogo. In principle, people buy these coins because they want to use the services on which the coin will be used. So far, though, almost none of the services have been completed. In the meantime, people are buying coins because they are hoping the value will go up. When the Stratis token was released in July 2016, it was worth seven-tenths of a penny. In the fall of 2017, each of those tokens was trading for around $2.95, a 42,000 percent increase. After the initial coin offering, when the programmers sell their tokens for a set price, coins are traded on third-party exchanges through open-market bidding — similar to the way stocks are traded and priced after an I.P.O. The programmers who created the coins generally keep a large stash of coins so that they also benefit if the price goes up. The people betting on the price of these tokens are generally betting that the services promised by the programmers will be completed, creating demand for the coins in the future. The most obvious reason to do a coin offering is that you can raise more money than you ever could from venture capitalists. The most valuable virtual-currency company that was funded with venture capital, Coinbase, raised $100 million this year, five years after it was founded. The same day that was announced, Filecoin, which doesn’t even have a working product, announced that it had raised over $200 million. Another plus: Start-ups that raise money through coin offerings don’t have to give away ownership of their technology to outside investors. Some programmers look to coin offerings because they can raise money for projects that venture capital won’t fund. Specifically, coin offerings can provide funding to build open-source projects that in the end no one will own, the way that no one owns Bitcoin or Ethereum. Filecoin’s cloud storage network, for instance, would be operated by its users rather than any central company. It is easier than it seems. The software behind Bitcoin and Ethereum is open source, which means that anyone can take the computer code and tweak it to create a virtual currency with slightly different characteristics. There are companies that will do this for you if you are not technologically adept. Convincing people that your new coin will have value is the harder part, and many coins that are released never grow to be worth anything. Some companies have gone the more complicated route of creating their own new software for their coins, with qualities that are very different from Bitcoin and Ethereum. Anyone who has Bitcoin or Ether and is willing to send their money to the creators of a coin offering. China and South Korea have said it is illegal. In the United States and many other countries, regulators have said some coins should be categorized as securities, like stocks and bonds. If a coin is categorized as a security, it has to follow all relevant securities law, such as registering with the authorities and ensuring that people buying the coins are properly accredited and vetted. Suffice to say, essentially no coin offerings have followed these rules. Many people are waiting for regulators to crack down. Some are expecting that the first targets will be the exchanges where the coins are traded. Investors don’t have much recourse. The most likely outcome will be that the investors will lose the money they put into the project, though people may try to sue. A number of prominent Silicon Valley investors have argued that coin offerings could provide a way to build open-source projects that would not have otherwise received support. Some big names think this will lead to a new generation of open-source internet protocols and loosen the control of big companies like Google and Facebook. Chris Dixon, a partner at Andreessen Horowitz,   that “by enabling the development of new open networks, tokens could help reverse the centralization of the internet, thereby keeping it accessible, vibrant and fair, and resulting in greater innovation.” But even sophisticated enthusiasts believe that almost all of the companies currently raising money through coin offerings will fail and lose money for their investors — and probably should not happen in the first place. “Right now, with all of the enthusiasm for crypto assets out there, I am very concerned that nobody is being careful about anything,” Fred Wilson, a partner at Union Square Ventures,  .
 in a major subway corridor during New York City’s Monday morning rush, echoing through tunnels just off Times Square.   injured a handful of people, sent floods of   and disrupted the travel of tens of thousands. Here’s what we have  . Officials rapidly identified the suspect as Akayed Ullah, a 27-year-old immigrant from Bangladesh now living in the city. He is in custody and has been hospitalized for burns. Officials said the bomb was strapped to his body with “Velcro and zip ties” — suggesting the troubling possibility of a suicide bombing in a city known for thrumming multicultural energy. _____ pushed back against an exhaustively researched Times article on how the office has and hasn’t changed him. In particular, he insisted via Twitter that he  . “We stand by our reporting,” a Times spokeswoman responded. And in Alabama,   in Tuesday’s too-hard-to-call special Senate election. The race has revolved almost entirely around Mr. Moore’s divisive views and allegations of improper behavior toward teenage girls. _____    are teaming up for a military drill to  . The two-day exercise follows news reports suggesting that North Korea is rapidly progressing toward such launches. Underscoring fears of a possible crisis on the Korean Peninsula, a document possibly leaked from China’s state-owned telecom firm shows that a county along the   that could hold thousands of people. _____    of Russia took a   underscoring the extension of Russia’s influence in the region and the continuing shrinkage of the U.S.’s role. Regional and international anger has greeted President Trump’s unilateral decision to recognize Jerusalem as Israel’s capital. In Brussels,  ’s request for the same endorsement. _____  has come under scrutiny for infiltrating other countries’ social media. German intelligence services said that 10,000 citizens were approached   posing as think-tank leaders and headhunters, but the quest was actually for insights and secrets from the government’s business and foreign policy arms. A Chinese official angrily denounced the findings as “complete hearsay and groundless.” _____    seized territory in Iraq and Syria in 2014, it had the time and space to  . Records and documents viewed by The Times show a system of arms production that combined research and development, mass production and organized distribution to amplify the terrorist group’s power, endurance and cruelty. Mosul, a city left in ruins when the Islamic State was finally driven out in July,  . _____ to drive out rural laborers has also  : educated and ambitious white-collar workers drawn to the city’s new economy of tech, finance and hospitality industries. said its     had been successful and that it expected charges related to lapses on money laundering controls to be dropped. The bank paid a $1.9 billion settlement for the deal five years ago. providers have already pushed the boundaries of internet protections, offering a glimpse at what U.S. consumers may face once  .  is expected to raise interest rates this week.  . our columnists   the Bitcoin boom is. (Bitcoin futures hit $17,540 this morning, from an opening of $15,000.)  begins its   today. . Here’s a snapshot of  . the celebrity chef, apologized and stepped away from his food empire and ABC’s “The Chew” after four unnamed women accused him of sexual harassment. [ ]  of Australia denied that he or his government is anti-Chinese in a televised interview that also included testy exchanges with an asylum-seeker and Indigenous Australians. [ ] the party of President Nicólas Maduro dominated municipal elections, aided by an opposition boycott. [ ]  named Rahul Gandhi as its president, setting up a challenge to Prime Minister Narendra Modi in 2019 polls. [ ] Moon Jae-in, starts a four-day visit to China this week aimed at “recovering mutual trust.” [ ] will allow commercial movie theaters to open for the first time in more than 35 years, the latest transformative move by the crown prince, Mohammed bin Salman. [ ] proved — after a 14-year quest — that a catfish he discovered in remote Myanmar was a new species. [ ] , men need  . got you stressed?  . Hot sauce livens up  .  nominations are out, led by Guillermo del Toro’s fantasy “The Shape of Water,” above, with seven. Here are the   and a look at the  .   highlights the danger extremist Hindu politicians now pose to  . of our most viewed stories at the moment: Amid the racial tensions of the 1970s, an American family decided to return  . This is what happened decades later, when the two met. Long before there were  , there were meatless Tuesdays, wheatless Wednesdays and porkless Saturdays. One hundred years ago, during World War I, the U.S. government   to help its allies in Europe avoid starvation. Americans were already encouraged to give up meat (red meat, preserved meat and lard) on Tuesdays and wheat on Wednesdays. The new instructions also excluded pork on Saturday and recommended one meal without meat or wheat each day. “In this emergency, only the simplest of living is patriotic,” said Herbert Hoover, food administrator and a future president. In that crucial winter, he said, “lies the period when there will be tested in this great free country of ours the question as to whether or not our people are capable of voluntary individual self-sacrifice to save the world.” The guidelines were  , and  . Another plea to help those struggling in Europe came after World War II. President Harry Truman, in the first televised address from the White House, asked Americans  . “We must not fail them,” he said.
Cryptocurrencies like Bitcoin and Ether have seeped into the public consciousness. Colleges including Duke and the Massachusetts Institute of Technology   in the blockchain technology that undergirds these virtual currencies to crowds of eager students. The mania has also gotten the attention of regulators at the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission. But both can only look on — perhaps in horror — at what is happening. Laws adopted decades ago give the two regulators little authority to engage in oversight of the burgeoning market in cryptocurrencies. That may change if Congress can muster the political will to extend the oversight responsibilities of two agencies it has been rather hostile to in recent years. A better way may be to create a new agency — one that does not carry the baggage that the S.E.C. and C.F.T.C. do on Capitol Hill and that does not try to put the square peg of cryptocurrencies in the round holes of securities and commodities trading. At a recent hearing of the Senate Banking, Housing and Urban Affairs Committee, Jay Clayton, the chairman of the S.E.C., and J. Christopher Giancarlo, the chairman of the C.F.T.C., spoke about their limited power to regulate the use of cryptocurrencies. Mr. Clayton   posed by cryptocurrency trading platforms that call themselves “exchanges,” which gives the impression that they are regulated like the New York Stock Exchange and the Nasdaq. But investors using such platforms “do not receive many of the market protections that they would when transacting through broker-dealers on registered exchanges,” Mr. Clayton said. Instead, the cryptocurrency exchanges are considered “money transmission” businesses, subject to a hodgepodge of state and federal rules that provide little protection to those who use their services. There are distinctions between cryptocurrencies like Bitcoin, which are not tied to a single company but instead operate more like regular money, and tokens issued by firms to help raise money in initial coin offerings, or I.C.O.s. Mr. Clayton announced a much tougher stand on that second form of virtual assets. “The structures of I.C.O.s that I have seen involve the offer and sale of securities and directly implicate the securities registration requirements,” he said. The S.E.C. has filed cases against companies making coin offerings for selling unregistered securities, and more are certainly on the way. Mr. Giancarlo   does regulate futures contracts that are tied to cryptocurrencies, and it can police firms executing transactions involving the contracts. But he pointed out that the C.F.T.C. “does not have regulatory jurisdiction over markets or platforms conducting cash or ‘spot’ transactions in virtual currencies, or over participants on those platforms.” To reach actual trading in cryptocurrencies, Congress would have to extend its authority to cover a cash commodity market, something lawmakers have not done. Investors need protection. Virtual currency firms have seen a rash of large-scale thefts from customer accounts. An Italian cryptocurrency exchange called BitGrail   on Saturday that tokens called Nano worth approximately $170 million had gone missing in unauthorized transactions. An exchange in Japan called Coincheck   in late January that hackers had stolen $530 million from the accounts of cryptocurrency investors. Any theft can be prosecuted under a range of federal laws, including   and   because cryptocurrencies are a form of property, even though they are intangible. But criminal prosecution is not a particularly effective weapon for battling hackers who plunder cryptocurrency wallets. Many of the exchanges are outside the United States, so finding those responsible is a challenge. Regulating the exchanges would be a significant step toward ensuring there is at least some protection for those buying and selling cryptocurrencies. That comes at a substantial cost, however, because the compliance requirements and reporting obligations for an exchange would be substantial. Operating with little government oversight has been a selling point for adherents of cryptocurrencies, but the growth in the market that has given rise to large-scale thefts and fraudulent schemes is fueling greater demand for some measure of accountability. Whether the S.E.C. or the C.F.T.C. are the best venues for this type of regulation is something Congress will have to decide. Neither agency has experience in overseeing virtual currencies, so assigning responsibility to one (or both) will require increased appropriations to develop rules and effective oversight. Perhaps a new agency is needed. The S.E.C. was created by Congress in 1934 to implement greater federal regulation of the securities markets. The creation of, say, a Cryptocurrency Exchange Commission, or C.E.C., could address a rapidly developing product that defies easy categorization without having to deal with the demands — and foibles — of an entrenched bureaucracy.
If you find the concept of Bitcoin confusing, you are not alone. The virtual currency has been a constant source of controversy, but it is still not well understood. No. Those coins are novelty items that newspapers used in photographs because they couldn’t find anything else to illustrate their stories about Bitcoin. A Bitcoin is a digital token — with no physical backing — that can be sent electronically from one user to another, anywhere in the world. A Bitcoin can be divided out to eight decimal places, so you can send someone 0.00000001 Bitcoins. This smallest fraction of a Bitcoin — the penny of the Bitcoin world — is referred to as a Satoshi, after the anonymous creator of Bitcoin. This all gets confusing, because Bitcoin is also the name of the payment network on which the Bitcoin digital tokens are stored and moved. Unlike traditional payment networks like Visa, the Bitcoin network is not run by a single company or person. The system is run by a decentralized network of computers around the world that keep track of all Bitcoin transactions, similar to the way Wikipedia is maintained by a decentralized network of writers and editors. The record of all Bitcoin transactions that these computers are constantly updating is known as the blockchain. Criminals have taken to Bitcoin because anyone can open a Bitcoin address and start sending and receiving Bitcoins without giving a name or identity. There is no central authority that could collect this information. Bitcoin first took off in 2011 after drug dealers began taking payments in Bitcoin on the black-market website known as the Silk Road. Although the Silk Road was shut down in 2013,  . More recently, Bitcoin has become a method for   — for example, when your computer is taken over by so-called ransomware. The records of the Bitcoin network, including all balances and transactions, are stored on every computer helping to maintain the network — about 9,500 computers in late 2017. If the government made it illegal for Americans to participate in this network, the computers and people keeping the records in other countries would still be able to continue. The decentralized nature of Bitcoin is also one of the qualities that have made it popular with people who are suspicious of government authorities. Anyone helping to maintain the database of all Bitcoin transactions — the blockchain — could change his or her own copy of the records to add more money. But if someone did that, the other computers maintaining the records would see the discrepancy, and the changes would be ignored. Only a small percentage of all transactions on the Bitcoin network are explicitly illegal. Most transactions are people buying and selling Bitcoins on exchanges, speculating on future prices. A whole world of high-frequency traders has sprung up around Bitcoin. People in countries with high inflation, like Argentina and Venezuela, have bought Bitcoin with their local currency to avoid losing their savings to inflation. One of the most popular business plans is to use Bitcoin to move money over international borders. Large international money transfers can take weeks when they go through banks, while millions of dollars of Bitcoin can be moved in minutes. So far, though, these practical applications of Bitcoin have been slow to take off. There are companies in most countries that will sell you Bitcoins in exchange for the local currency. In the United States, a company called   will link to your bank account or credit card and then sell you the coins for dollars. Opening an account with Coinbase is similar to opening a traditional bank or stock brokerage account, with lots of identity verification to satisfy the authorities. For people who do not want to reveal their identities, services like   will connect people who want to meet in person to buy and sell Bitcoins for cash, generally without any verification of identity required. The price of Bitcoin fluctuates constantly and is determined by open-market bidding on Bitcoin exchanges, similar to the way that stock and gold prices are determined by bidding on exchanges. Bitcoin mining refers to the process through which new Bitcoins are created and given to computers helping to maintain the network. The computers involved in Bitcoin mining are in a sort of computational race to process new transactions coming onto the network. The winner — generally the person with the fastest computers — gets a chunk of new Bitcoins, 12.5 of them right now. (The reward is halved every four years.) There is generally a new winner about every 10 minutes, and there will be until there are 21 million Bitcoins in the world. At that point, no new Bitcoins will be created. This cap is expected to be reached in 2140. So far, about 16 million Bitcoin have been distributed. Every Bitcoin in existence was created through this method and initially given to a computer helping to maintain the records. Anyone can set his or her computer to mine Bitcoin, but these days only people with specialized hardware manage to win the race. Plenty. But these other virtual currencies do not have as many followers as Bitcoin, so they are not worth as much. As in the real world, a currency is worth only as much as the number of people willing to accept it for goods and services. Bitcoin was introduced in 2008 by an unknown creator going by the name of Satoshi Nakamoto, who communicated only by email and social messaging. While several people have been identified as likely candidates to be Satoshi, as the creator is known in the world of Bitcoin, no one has been confirmed as the real Satoshi, and the search has gone on. Satoshi created the original rules of the Bitcoin network and then released the software to the world in 2009. Satoshi largely disappeared from view two years later. Anyone can download and use the software, and Satoshi now has no more control over the network than anyone else using the software.
Last week, I announced the beginning of a semiregular “ ” service. Send me your questions, but not just any questions. I want to explore the deep, dark conversations that we don’t hear on the financial pornography network, like how we feel about money and how money makes us feel. To kick off things, Shawn Cook from San Diego asked a question about Bitcoin. (For an explainer on Bitcoin, see   by Nathaniel Popper of The New York Times, who literally wrote   on the topic.) His hipster friend is constantly bugging him to invest in the cryptocurrency. It’s making Shawn wonder: Should he ditch his boring old index fund? Shawn, this is a great question because who among us doesn’t have a hipster friend who is always talking about how he is killing it with his investments in Bitcoin, Apple and Tesla? Those people have all the fun! They seem to know exactly what’s going to happen in whatever market they’re investing in and have this aura of self-assurance that is really annoying. It’s enough to cause even the most rational, non-hip among us to doubt our boring, old-style investing. In fact, I remember feeling a bit this way back in 1999. I was surrounded by tech people with their BlackBerries and Hotmail accounts. I resisted the siren call of the Nasdaq and the technology bubble — until I finally gave in. Then, I took some hard-earned money out of a boring diversified investment and bought Infospace. Remember that? If you do, it may not be pleasant. In fact, I can’t remember the exact details because they’re too painful, but I know I invested a lot of money (for me) back then. When I sold, I didn’t have enough to pay for a burrito and a Coke. I even considered buying more on “the dip.” Except I didn’t have any more money to invest, and this wasn’t a dip. The stock never recovered to anything close to what I had paid to buy it. Today, I still have the stock certificate as a reminder of that valuable lesson. So, Shawn, the moral of the story is that your friend just might be right. But then again, he might be flat-out wrong. What he is talking about is speculation at best, and it’s probably closer to gambling. If you have some spare money and you feel like gambling, fire away. But here’s an alternative idea. Keep your low-cost, boring, diversified investments, and have a T-shirt made (black, with white text) that says: “I own Bitcoin. How you like me now?” I’ll even provide the sketch. Keep the questions coming  !

Bitcoin was created by libertarian-minded programmers with a deep suspicion of central banks and the national currencies they issue. Yet it is central banks that are doing some of the most ambitious work of late in trying to harness the technology introduced by Bitcoin. The central bankers do not want their institutions to own or use Bitcoin itself. Instead, they hope they can use the decentralized method of record-keeping introduced by Bitcoin — known as the blockchain or distributed ledger — to complete and record transactions in the real economy more efficiently, quickly and transparently. The most enthusiastic central banks — including the   and the People’s Bank of China — have discussed issuing their national currencies onto some sort of distributed ledger, a name that comes from the concept of several parties keeping records simultaneously. Blockchains allow several players to keep a shared spreadsheet using cryptography and so-called consensus mechanisms that provide a way to agree on which transactions happened at what time. For the central banks, the promise of the technology is that it would allow them to track every pound or renminbi on every step of its travels through the financial system in real time — something that is impossible now. The goal would be to make the financial system more transparent, fast, efficient and secure. If the central banks succeed, it would be one of the greatest unexpected twists in new technology: An invention aimed at dethroning central banks and making it harder for money to be tracked instead ends up empowering those central banks and making money more easily traceable. The Bank of England has produced several research papers on the topic. One suggests that the economic benefits of issuing a digital currency on a distributed ledger could   to a country’s economic output, thanks to the efficiency it could offer. A deputy governor at the People’s Bank of China, Fan Yifei,   that “the conditions are ripe for digital currencies, which can reduce operating costs, increase efficiency and enable a wide range of new applications.” And in  n ,   governor overseeing new technology, Lael Brainard, said the technology had the potential to transform multiple aspects of the financial system. “We are paying close attention to distributed ledger technology, or blockchain, recognizing this may represent the most significant development in many years in payments, clearing and settlement,” Ms. Brainard said. Even the central bank officials who are most enthusiastic about these experiments say it will be years before any central bank issues its own currency onto a live distributed ledger. Some critics say the public interest in the blockchain has been all talk and no substance — an easy way for stuffy central bankers to appear hip and relevant. David Andolfatto, a researcher at the Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis, said many of the central banks looking at blockchain technology would be better served by spending time and energy in updating the current software that underlies the financial system. “If you take a snapshot of the existing plumbing, it looks a bit ugly,” Mr. Andolfatto said. “There’s nothing magical about a blockchain in solving this problem.” Even within the Fed, though, other researchers and officials have expressed more excitement about the technology. A week before Ms. Brainard of the Fed gave her speech on distributed ledgers, the chairwoman of the Fed, Janet L. Yellen, was asked about the technology at a congressional hearing. She said that “innovation using these technologies could be extremely helpful and bring benefits to society.” The Fed has been pushed to act by the big banks that it regulates, many of which are experimenting with distributed ledgers as a way to settle trades and record data and transactions. Just last week, JPMorgan Chase said it was moving toward a public release this year of its “enterprise grade” blockchain. Most financial institutions and central banks are looking at distributed ledgers that would be maintained on the computers of all the major players in the financial system, including the central bank and the biggest financial institutions. In the systems being discussed, each player in the system would communicate with all the others anytime money moved in the system, allowing everyone to update the ledgers on their computer systems simultaneously. This would provide multiple backups if the central bank’s computers came under attack. It would also hypothetically allow them to complete transactions much more quickly, and would make it easier to spot rogue actors. Eric Piscini, who oversees work on blockchain by the consulting firm Deloitte, said that a year ago, central banks were looking at the technology mostly because they wanted to understand what private banks were talking about. Now, he says, the central banks are embracing the technology to revamp their own infrastructures. At the headquarters of the Netherlands’ central bank in Amsterdam, Ron Berndsen set up five laptops to run an experimental virtual currency, derived from the Bitcoin software. The coins issued in the system were nicknamed Dukatons, after a 17th-century silver coin used in the time when the Netherlands was a part of the Spanish Empire. Mr. Berndsen operated the Dukaton system for three months to see what would happen if the central bank were setting the rules and did not have the same limits as Bitcoin. While the experiment was a success, he is now thinking much bigger and is in constant conversation with other central bank officials who are looking at ways to put their own currencies on distributed ledgers. “There are so many things going on that it is hard to keep track of all the contacts,” said Mr. Berndsen, the head of market infrastructure at the Dutch central bank. “I hear from other central bank colleagues that it is the same everywhere.” The experimentation so far has taken on many different forms and contemplated many different roles for distributed ledgers to play in the financial system. The Russian national bank   that it had worked with a consortium of Russia’s biggest banks to develop its own distributed ledger, which it called Masterchain. The Russian institutions have been sending messages on the system but are also looking at it as a potential “component of the new-generation financial infrastructure in the future.” The Bank of Canada teamed up with the nation’s five largest banks — and the blockchain consulting firm R3 — for what was known as Project Jasper. In a simulation run this summer, the central bank issued so-called CAD-Coins onto a blockchain similar to the one that underlies the Bitcoin alternative known as Ethereum. The banks used the CAD-Coins to exchange money — in this case fictional money — the way they do at the end of each day to settle their master accounts. Carolyn Wilkins, senior deputy governor of the Bank of Canada, said in an interview that while the experiment was a success, a great deal of testing is still necessary before the bank can decide whether distributed ledger technology is ready for the real world. Critics of blockchain technology have noted the apparent contradiction in central banks’ looking to distributed ledgers. The blockchain was created to allow Bitcoin transactions to be recorded communally so that a central authority, such as a central bank, would not be necessary. If a central bank is involved and keeping track, why go to the trouble of keeping records communally? The distributed ledgers being discussed by central bankers also generally lack the openness that has been one of the most attractive attributes of the Bitcoin network. With Bitcoin, anyone can join the network and help support it, which has helped it win a following. The distributed ledgers being considered by the financial industry and central banks would generally allow only a small number of registered entities to join in and take part in the network. Mark Carney, the head of the Bank of England, and perhaps the most prominent champion of distributed ledgers,  that the technology could be worth using for central banks because it would make for a financial system that does not go down even if the central bank’s computer systems are temporarily taken offline. The Bank of England   that it wanted the next version of the bank’s basic software infrastructure to be compatible with distributed ledgers. Ms. Wilkins said the Bank of Canada was interested in the technology as a way to build a single, shared record of all the transactions among several institutions. That could leave much less money sitting idle while banks reconcile their different ledgers, as now happens. It would also create a standardized way of recording transactions that would allow all the players in the system to communicate more seamlessly “There is currently a whole industry set up to reconcile and audit all these separate ledgers, and you can’t easily connect them,” she said. “This comprehensive shared data source could be a real benefit.”
SAN JUAN, P.R. — They call what they are building Puertopia. But then someone told them, apparently in all seriousness, that it translates to “eternal boy playground” in Latin. So they are changing the name: They will call it Sol. Dozens of entrepreneurs,    , are heading en masse to Puerto Rico this winter. They are selling their homes and cars in California and establishing residency on the Caribbean island in hopes of avoiding what they see as onerous state and federal taxes on their growing fortunes, some of which now reach into the billions of dollars. And these men — because they are almost exclusively men — have a plan for what to do with the wealth: They want to build a crypto utopia, a new city where the money is virtual and the contracts are all public, to show the rest of the world what a crypto future could look like. Blockchain, a digital ledger that forms the basis of virtual currencies, has the potential to reinvent society — and the Puertopians want to prove it. For more than a year, the entrepreneurs had been searching for the best location. After   in September and  , they saw an opportunity and felt a sense of urgency. So this crypto community flocked here to create its paradise. Now the investors are spending their days hunting for property where they could have their own airports and docks. They are taking over hotels and a museum in the capital’s historic section, called Old San Juan. They say they are close to getting the local government to allow them to have the first cryptocurrency bank. “What’s happened here is a perfect storm,” said  , the founder of the news site CNET, who is moving his new blockchain company — called Videocoin — from the Cayman Islands to Puerto Rico this winter. Referring to Hurricane Maria and the investment interest that has followed, he added, “While it was really bad for the people of Puerto Rico, in the long term it’s a godsend if people look past that.” Puerto Rico offers an unparalleled tax incentive: no federal personal income taxes, no capital gains tax and favorable business taxes — all without having to renounce your American citizenship. For now, the local government seems receptive toward the crypto utopians; the governor will speak at their blockchain summit conference, called  , in March. The territory’s go-to blockchain tax lawyer is Giovanni Mendez, 30. He expected the tax expatriates to disappear after Hurricane Maria, but the population has instead boomed. “It’s increased monumentally,” said Mr. Mendez, who has about two dozen crypto clients. “And they all came together.” The movement is alarming an earlier generation of Puerto Rico tax expats like the hedge fund manager Robb Rill, who runs a social group for those taking advantage of the tax incentives. “They call me up saying they’re going to buy 250,000 acres so they can incorporate their own city, literally start a city in Puerto Rico to have their own crypto world,” said Mr. Rill, who moved to the island in 2013. “I can’t engage in that.” The newcomers are still debating the exact shape that Puertopia should take. Some think they need to make a city; others think it’s enough to move into Old San Juan. Puertopians said, however, that they hoped to move very fast. “You’ve never seen an industry catalyze a place like you’re going to see here,” Mr. Minor said. Until the Puertopians find land, they have descended on the Monastery, a 20,000-square-foot hotel they rented as their base and that was largely unscathed by the hurricane. Matt Clemenson and Stephen Morris were drinking beer on the Monastery’s roof one recent evening. Mr. Clemenson had an easygoing affect and wore two-tone aviators; Mr. Morris, a loquacious British man, was in cargo shorts and lace-up steel-toed combat boots, with a smartphone on a necklace. They wanted to make two things clear: They chose Puerto Rico because of the hurricane, and they come in peace. “It’s only when everything’s been swept away that you can make a case for rebuilding from the ground up,” Mr. Morris, 53, said. “We’re benevolent capitalists, building a benevolent economy,” said Mr. Clemenson, 34, a co-founder of Lottery.com, which is using the blockchain in lotteries. “Puerto Rico has been this hidden gem, this enchanted island that’s been consistently overlooked and mistreated. Maybe 500 years later we can make it right.” Other Puertopians arrived on the roof as a pack, just back from a full-day property-hunting bus tour. From the middle,  , 37, the leader of the Puertopia movement, emerged wearing drop crotch capri pants, a black vest that almost hit his knees and a large black felt hat. He and others had arrived on the island in early December. “Compassion, respect, financial transparency,” Mr. Pierce said when asked what was guiding them here. Mr. Pierce, the director of the Bitcoin Foundation, is a major figure in the crypto boom. He co-founded a blockchain-for-business start-up, Block.One, which has sold around $200 million of a custom virtual currency, EOS, in a so-called initial coin offering. The value of all the outstanding EOS tokens is around $6.5 billion. A former child actor, Mr. Pierce got into digital money early as a professional gamer, mining and trading gold in the video game World of Warcraft, an effort  , the former Trump adviser. Mr. Pierce is a controversial figure — he has previously been sued for fraud, among other matters. Downstairs, in the Monastery penthouse, a dozen or so other expats were hanging out. The water was out that night, so the toilets and faucets were dry. Mr. Minor lounged on an alcove chaise. “The U.S. doesn’t want us. It’s trying to choke off this economy,” Mr. Minor said, referring to the difficulties that crypto investors have with American banks. “There needs to be a place where people are free to invent.” Mr. Pierce paced the room with his hands in fists. A few times a day, he played a video for the group on his phone and a portable speaker: Charlie Chaplin’s 1940 “The Great Dictator,” in which Chaplin parodies Hitler rallying his forces. He finds inspiration in lines like “More than machinery, we need humanity.” “I’m worried people are going to misinterpret our actions,” Mr. Pierce said. “That we’re just coming to Puerto Rico to dodge taxes.” He said he was aiming to create a charitable token called ONE with $1 billion of his own money. “If you take the MY out of money, you’re left with ONE,” Mr. Pierce said. “He’s tuned in to a higher calling,” said Kai Nygard, scion of the Canadian clothing company Nygard and a crypto investor. “He’s beyond money.” The force of Mr. Pierce’s personality and his spiritual presence are important to the group, whose members are otherwise largely agnostic. Mr. Pierce regularly performs rituals. Earlier that day while scoping out property, they had stopped at a historic Ceiba tree, known as the Tree of Life. “Brock nestled into the bosom of it and was there for 10 minutes,” Mr. Nygard said. Mr. Pierce walked around the tree and said prayers for Puertopia, holding a rusted wrench he had picked up in the territory. He kissed an old man’s feet. He blessed a crystal in the water, as they all watched. He played the Chaplin speech to everyone and to the tree, Mr. Nygard said. That wrench is now in the penthouse, heavy and greasy. Later on, at a dinner in a nearby restaurant, the group ordered platters of octopus arms, fried cheese, ceviche and rum cocktails. They began debating whether to buy Puerto Rico’s  , which measures 9,000 acres and has two deepwater ports and an adjacent airport. The only hitch: It’s a Superfund cleanup site. Mr. Pierce had fallen asleep by then, his hat tilted down and arms crossed. He gets two hours of sleep many nights, often on a firm grounding mat to stay in contact with the earth’s electric energy. Josh Boles, a tall, athletic man who is another crypto expat, picked him up, and the group headed back to the Monastery. They walked past a big pink building in an old town square, the start of their vision for Puertopia’s downtown. Once a children’s museum, they plan on making it a crypto clubhouse and outreach center that will have the mission “to bring together Puerto Ricans with Puertopians.” Workdays are casual in Puertopia. One morning, Bryan Larkin, 39, and Reeve Collins, 42, were working at another old hotel, the Condado Vanderbilt, where they had their laptops on a pool bar with frozen piña coladas on tap. “We’re going to make this crypto land,” Mr. Larkin said. Mr. Larkin has mined about $2 billion in Bitcoin and is the chief technology officer of Blockchain Industries, a publicly traded company based in Puerto Rico. Mr. Collins, an internet veteran, had raised more than $20 million from an initial coin offering for BlockV, his app store for the blockchain, whose outstanding tokens are worth about $125 million. He had also co-founded Tether, which backs cryptocurrency tied to the value of a dollar and whose outstanding tokens are worth about $2.1 billion, though the company has   in the virtual currency world. “So, no. No, I don’t want to pay taxes,” Mr. Collins said. “This is the first time in human history anyone other than kings or governments or gods can create their own money.” He had moved from Santa Monica, Calif., with just a few bags and was now starting a local cryptocurrency incubator called Vatom Factory. “When Brock said, ‘We’re moving to Puerto Rico for the taxes and to create this new town,’ I said, ‘I’m in,’” Mr. Collins said. “Sight unseen.” They soon went back to work, checking out Coinmarketcap.com, a site that shows the price of cryptocurrencies. “Our market cap’s gone up $100 million in a week,” Mr. Collins said. “Congrats, man,” Mr. Larkin said. All across San Juan, many locals are trying to figure out what to do with the crypto arrivals. Some are open to the new wave as a welcome infusion of investment and ideas. “We’re open for crypto business,” said Erika Medina-Vecchini, the chief business development officer for the Department of Economic Development and Commerce, in an interview at her office. She said her office was starting an ad campaign aimed at the new crypto expat boom, with the tagline “Paradise Performs.” Others worry about the island’s being used for an experiment and talk about “crypto colonialism.” At a house party in San Juan, Richard Lopez, 32, who runs a pizza restaurant, Estella, in the town of Arecibo, said: “I think it’s great. Lure them in with taxes, and they’ll spend money.” Andria Satz, 33, who grew up in Old San Juan and works for the Conservation Trust of Puerto Rico, disagreed. “We’re the tax playground for the rich,” she said. “We’re the test case for anyone who wants to experiment. Outsiders get tax exemptions, and locals can’t get permits.” Mr. Lopez said the territory needed something to jump-start the economy. “We have to find a new way,” he said. “Sure then, Bitcoin, why not,” Ms. Satz said, throwing up her hands. Mr. Lopez said he and a childhood friend, Rafael Perez, 31, were trying to set up a Bitcoin mine in their hometown. But  , and mining even a single Bitcoin takes  , he said.

• Andrew is in Davos, Switzerland and will file dispatches from the World Economic Forum. • Charles Kushner speaks about his son and the Russia investigation. • Big deals today by A.I.G. and Celgene show a desire for growth. • The government is still shut down. • Facebook is doing some existential thinking. Here’s a preview of Andrew’s column on Davos and Mr. Trump, assuming that the president will still leave Washington for the Swiss Alps: Meanwhile, Davos Men and Women are thinking about  . • Seven cabinet secretaries, led by  •  and the F.D.A. commissioner,  •  ,   and   (if Mr. Trump goes)  for a populist leader to send to a hotbed of global elitism. • Populism — though, Mr. Trump aside, anxiety is on the wane ( ) • How long the world’s economies can continue to expand ( ) • How to respond to cyberwarfare by the likes of North Korea ( ) • How to improve women’s standing in the world, with several top women leaders in attendance ( ) • Big tech companies’ image woes ( ) • France’s efforts to woo business leaders, including a pre-Davos summit at Versailles that will be attended by Jamie Dimon and Sheryl Sandberg ( )  has agreed to buy   for $5.1 billion,  The deal between the two privately held companies ranks as one of the biggest liquor deals in recent years.  “U.S. volumes of super-premium tequila jumped more than 700% from 2002 to 2016, compared with a 121% rise in all tequila volumes over the same period, according to the Distilled Spirits Council.” • Patrón is the premium tequila market leader with U.S. sales of $1.6 billion in 2016, according to Euromonitor, a market research firm. We here at DealBook will forgive if you don’t. It has been a long time. With Monday’s close, the S&P 500 has now gone 395 sessions without a decline of 5% or more from a record high,   That’s the longest streak on record, surpassing the previous record of 394 trading days set in the mid-1990s. So when was the last time the market fell 5 percent from a recent high? The aftermath of Brexit in June 2016.  that six weeks after firing the former congressman Harold E. Ford Jr. for unspecified misconduct, Morgan Stanley has clarified that the misconduct was not sexual in nature. The statement is part of a legal settlement that Mr. Ford reached over the weekend with Morgan Stanley, according to a person who was briefed on the resolution but was not authorized to speak publicly. The broader contours of the settlement were unclear, including whether there was a financial component. Through a spokesman, Mr. Ford declined to comment. Before his firing last month, Mr. Ford had spent seven years at Morgan Stanley recruiting clients. He joined the investment banking industry after losing a United States Senate race in Tennessee as the Democratic nominee in 2006. Mr. Ford, 47, was fired after a female journalist told Morgan Stanley that he had harassed her at a dinner in 2014. At the time, Morgan Stanley said he had been fired “for conduct inconsistent with our values and in violation of our policies.” Some media reports of his firing said it had been triggered by the harassment allegation. Since Mr. Loeb’s Third Point emerged as an investor in the Swiss food giant, Nestlé has sold off its U.S. confectionary business, named new directors and bought Blue Bottle coffee. All of those have been great moves, according to the hedge fund. But there’s more to be done, Third Point wrote in its latest letter to investors. From the investor letter: • Better demonstrate that the company is focused on “nutrition, health and wellness,” with the implication being to divest products like ice cream and frozen pizza. • Buy back more shares. • Again consider selling the L’Oreal stake, something Nestlé has been loath to do historically. The father of Jared Kushner, who is again working at the family real estate business — this time without a title — told the WaPo in an interview that   of the Russia investigation so far and hasn’t had problems getting financing. More from the article by Michael Kranish of the WaPo: The elder Mr. Kushner also lamented the amount of criticism that his son, a senior presidential adviser, has taken: The insurer’s $5.56 billion deal to   signals that the company is increasingly looking outward, instead of inward, as it had done since its bailout during the global financial crisis. Validus is A.I.G.’s biggest acquisition by far over the past decade, according to Standard & Poor’s Global Market Intelligence. The transaction is expected to bolster the A.I.G.’s general insurance business, by adding a reinsurance platform, an insurance-linked securities asset manager and “a meaningful presence” at the Lloyd’s of London marketplace. Here’s what Brian Duperreault, A.I.G.’s chief executive, said: • Validus shareholders would receive   in cash. • Shares of Validus closed Friday at $46.72, meaning the deal represents a  . • The transaction is expected to close in  . For A.I.G.:  ,   and the law firm  For Validus:   and the law firm  In offering to buy the Juno shares that it doesn’t already own for  , Celgene is adding a maker of blood disease treatments. Perhaps more notably, it shows that the biopharmaceutical company is still on the hunt for more acquisitions. Remember that earlier this month, Celgene agreed to pay up to $7 billion for Impact Biomedicines, which also makes a treatment for a kind of blood cancer. Celgene, which is based in Summit, N.J., already owns about 9.7 percent of Juno’s shares. Here’s what Mark Alles, Celgene’s C.E.O., said: “The acquisition of Juno builds on our shared vision to discover and develop transformative medicines for patients with incurable blood cancers.” • Celgene would pay   for each share of Juno. • Juno’s shares closed on Friday at $67.81, meaning the deal is at a  . • The transaction is expected to close in  . For Celgene:   and the law firms   and  For Juno:   and the law firm  From a recent note by analysts at Pantheon Macroeconomics: Here’s more on   from the NYT. A group of moderate lawmakers is  . The Senate majority leader, Mitch McConnell, has scheduled   for noon E.T. today, though it’s unclear whether it will pass. • Wilbur Ross has fallen from Mr. Trump’s graces because of a perceived inability to strike good trade deals and a propensity to sleep in meetings. ( ) • How Jared Kushner became a focal point for China’s diplomatic outreach to the U.S. — and stirred up the worries of U.S. officials. ( ) • Deutsche Bank has flagged bank accounts tied to the Kushner family for “suspicious transactions” and referred the matter to German authorities — and may send its information to Robert Mueller as well, according to Manager Magazin of Germany. ( ,  ) The tax overhaul signed into law last month is muddying the fourth-quarter earnings picture. Improving corporate profit have been a pillar of the current rally, and analysts have forecast robust earnings growth in the coming months as the global economy gained momentum. Yet with 11 percent of S&P 500 companies having reported four-quarter results, profits have slipped 0.2 percent from a year ago. That’s well below the 10 percent analysts expected ahead of earnings season. So what gives? The tax law. Large financial firms, which have made up the bulk of companies reporting thus far, have taken big one-time, tax-related charges. Profits for financial firms in the S&P 500 fell $29.2 billion, or 57 percent. Citigroup accounted for 73 percent of that decline. John Butters, a senior earnings analyst at FactSet, writes: Exclude Citi, and the earnings growth rate for the S&P 500 would improve to 7.9 percent from -0.2 percent.  “While some of the biggest banks are reporting fourth-quarter earnings hits stemming from the new tax law, they see rich benefits over the long term, including effective tax rates that are even lower than the new 21 percent corporate rate,”  .  As the fourth-quarter earnings growth rate has fallen over the last week for S&P 500 companies, profit expectations for 2018 have risen. Here’s what Samidh Chakrabarti, a product manager at the tech giant, wrote  : Mr. Chakrabarti added that while the company was slow to address Russian interference in the 2016 presidential election, it’s working to prevent it happening again. • It spooked some publishers again by saying it would let users rank the trustworthiness of news outlets. ( ) • And its recent News Feed changes may reflect its video ambitions, some ad agencies said. ( ) • SoFi is courting Anthony Noto, Twitter’s chief operating officer, who is its most senior full-time employee. ( ,  ) • Inside Amazon Go, the e-commerce giant’s cashierless Seattle store, where our colleague tried unsuccessfully to shoplift in the name of journalism. ( ) • Marc Benioff of Salesforce said of noxious cultures at start-ups, “When I see that product is the number-one thing, the only thing that matters, that’s a real red flag.” ( ) • Tim Cook, visiting a school in Britain, told pupils he wouldn’t let his nephew use social media. ( ) • The luxury goods maker Richemont offered as much as $3.4 billion to buy the rest of Yoox Net-a-Porter. ( ) • Archer Daniels Midland has made a takeover approach to the agriculture trader Bunge, potentially creating a showdown with Glencore, according to unidentified sources. ( ) • Elliott Management is pushing for a higher takeover price for Starz than the $4.4 billion Lionsgate agreed last year. ( ) • The French drug maker Sanofi will buy Bioverativ, which makes a hemophilia drug, for more than $11.5 billion. ( ) • Carl Icahn has teamed up with Xerox’s third-biggest investor, Darwin Deason, to push for a sale, according to unidentified sources. ( ) • Ferrero’s $2.8 billion deal to buy Nestlé’s U.S. confectionary brands is a clear sign of a generational and cultural change at the Italian company. ( ) It’s Tiger Global. The American hedge fund has quietly  , worth more than $1 billion, according to the FT. More from the FT’s Martin Arnold and Miles Johnson: The Swiss bank reported 488 million Swiss francs ($508 million) in fourth-quarter pretax income,  . Omeed Malik, one of Bank of America’s top liaisons to the hedge fund world and a confidant of Jon Corzine,   after an internal investigation into a young female analyst’s accusation of inappropriate sexual conduct. More from Jessica Silver-Greenberg and Matt Goldstein of the NYT: Arbitration, primarily. But a discrimination lawyer told the WSJ, “  ever since Harvey Weinstein.” • How to practice so-called gender-lens investing and support women in the workplace. ( ) • The Sundance Film Festival, Harvey Weinstein’s old stomping ground, is now a showcase for women. ( ) • Representative Patrick Meehan, a Pennsylvania Republican who has taken a leading role in fighting sexual harassment in Congress, used taxpayer money to settle a misconduct complaint of his own. ( ) Right now, the computation to “produce” a new Bitcoin   as an American household consumes in two years, according to analysts at Morgan Stanley and the economist Alex de Vries. Some in the virtual currency community are looking for ways to reduce that figure. Here’s what Vitalik Buterin, the creator of Ethereum, told Nathaniel Popper of the NYT: Some, however, say an independent, decentralized monetary system is worth the cost. • Louis Dreyfus has teamed up with ING and ABN Amro of the Netherlands and Société Générale of France to create a blockchain platform for agricultural trading. ( ) • Bitcoin could lose 90 percent of its current value, predicts Peter Boockvar, a veteran Wall Street investor. ( ) to to sale
(Reuters) - Atlanta is still struggling with its ability to collect online payments of bills and fees, officials said on Monday, four days after a ransomware attack snarled the computer system of Georgia's capital city. Hackers caused outages of services offered through the city's website and broader computer system while demanding a ransom of $51,000 paid in bitcoin to unlock the system. "This is much bigger than a ransomware attack, this really is an attack on our government," Mayor Keisha Lance Bottoms told a news conference. "We are dealing with a (cyber) hostage situation." She did not say whether Atlanta would pay the ransom. Atlanta officials said they have determined the hackers' identity but declined to elaborate. City representatives were not immediately available for further comment. Bottoms said only that the hackers entered the city's digital system remotely as opposed having had internal access. Ransomware is a type of malware that infects computers or computer networks and then freezes them, with the attackers demanding a ransom in order to restore services. The initial assault often comes via a phishing link that someone within the network opens on their email. As the disruption in Atlanta persists, the city is losing out financially, Bottoms told an earlier news conference on Friday. It was unclear how much it stands to lose or when the city expects to get its computer system fully operational again. (Reporting by Laila Kearney in New York; Editing by Matthew Lewis)
he sequence of words is meaningless: a random array strung together by an algorithm let loose in an English dictionary. What makes them valuable is that they’ve been generated exclusively for me, by a software tool called MetaMask. In the lingo of cryptography, they’re known as my seed phrase. They might read like an incoherent stream of consciousness, but these words can be transformed into a key that unlocks a digital bank account, or even an online identity. It just takes a few more steps. On the screen, I’m instructed to keep my seed phrase secure: Write it down, or keep it in a secure place on your computer. I scribble the 12 words onto a notepad, click a button and my seed phrase is transformed into a string of 64 seemingly patternless characters: This is what’s called a “private key” in the world of cryptography: a way of proving identity, in the same, limited way that real-world keys attest to your identity when you unlock your front door. My seed phrase will generate that exact sequence of characters every time, but there’s no known way to reverse-engineer the original phrase from the key, which is why it is so important to keep the seed phrase in a safe location. That private key number is then run through two additional transformations, creating a new string: That string is my address on the Ethereum blockchain. Ethereum belongs to the same family as the cryptocurrency Bitcoin, whose value has increased more than 1,000 percent in just the past year. Ethereum has its own currencies, most notably Ether, but the platform has a wider scope than just money. You can think of my Ethereum address as having elements of a bank account, an email address and a Social Security number. For now, it exists only on my computer as an inert string of nonsense, but the second I try to perform any kind of transaction — say, contributing to a crowdfunding campaign or voting in an online referendum — that address is broadcast out to an improvised worldwide network of computers that tries to verify the transaction. The results of that verification are then broadcast to the wider network again, where more machines enter into a kind of competition to perform complex mathematical calculations, the winner of which gets to record that transaction in the single, canonical record of every transaction ever made in the history of Ethereum. Because those transactions are registered in a sequence of “blocks” of data, that record is called the blockchain. The whole exchange takes no more than a few minutes to complete. From my perspective, the experience barely differs from the usual routines of online life. But on a technical level, something miraculous is happening — something that would have been unimaginable just a decade ago. I’ve managed to complete a secure transaction without any of the traditional institutions that we rely on to establish trust. No intermediary brokered the deal; no social-media network captured the data from my transaction to better target its advertising; no credit bureau tracked the activity to build a portrait of my financial trustworthiness. And the platform that makes all this possible? No one owns it. There are no venture investors backing Ethereum Inc., because there is no Ethereum Inc. As an organizational form, Ethereum is far closer to a democracy than a private corporation. No imperial chief executive calls the shots. You earn the privilege of helping to steer Ethereum’s ship of state by joining the community and doing the work. Like Bitcoin and most other blockchain platforms, Ethereum is more a swarm than a formal entity. Its borders are porous; its hierarchy is deliberately flattened. Oh, one other thing: Some members of that swarm have already accumulated a paper net worth in the billions from their labors, as the value of one “coin” of Ether rose from $8 on Jan. 1, 2017, to $843 exactly one year later. You may be inclined to dismiss these transformations. After all, Bitcoin and Ether’s runaway valuation looks like a case study in irrational exuberance. And why should you care about an arcane technical breakthrough that right now doesn’t feel all that different from signing in to a website to make a credit card payment? But that dismissal would be shortsighted. If there’s one thing we’ve learned from the recent history of the internet, it’s that seemingly esoteric decisions about software architecture can unleash profound global forces once the technology moves into wider circulation. If the email standards adopted in the 1970s had included public-private key cryptography as a default setting, we might have avoided the cataclysmic email hacks that have afflicted everyone from Sony to John Podesta, and millions of ordinary consumers might be spared routinized identity theft. If Tim Berners-Lee, the inventor of the World Wide Web, had included a protocol for mapping our social identity in his original specs, we might not have Facebook. The true believers behind blockchain platforms like Ethereum argue that a network of distributed trust is one of those advances in software architecture that will prove, in the long run, to have historic significance. That promise has helped fuel the huge jump in cryptocurrency valuations. But in a way, the Bitcoin bubble may ultimately turn out to be a distraction from the true significance of the blockchain. The real promise of these new technologies, many of their evangelists believe, lies not in displacing our currencies but in replacing much of what we now think of as the internet, while at the same time returning the online world to a more decentralized and egalitarian system. If you believe the evangelists, the blockchain is the future. But it is also a way of getting back to the internet’s roots.  for utopian dreams of infinite libraries and global connectivity, the internet has seemingly become, over the past year, a universal scapegoat: the cause of almost every social ill that confronts us. Russian trolls destroy the democratic system with fake news on Facebook; hate speech flourishes on Twitter and Reddit; the vast fortunes of the geek elite worsen income equality. For many of us who participated in the early days of the web, the last few years have felt almost postlapsarian. The web had promised a new kind of egalitarian media, populated by small magazines, bloggers and self-organizing encyclopedias; the information titans that dominated mass culture in the 20th century would give way to a more decentralized system, defined by collaborative networks, not hierarchies and broadcast channels. The wider culture would come to mirror the peer-to-peer architecture of the internet itself. The web in those days was hardly a utopia — there were financial bubbles and spammers and a thousand other problems — but beneath those flaws, we assumed, there was an underlying story of progress. Last year marked the point at which that narrative finally collapsed. The existence of internet skeptics is nothing new, of course; the difference now is that the critical voices increasingly belong to former enthusiasts. “We have to fix the internet,” Walter Isaacson, Steve Jobs’s biographer, wrote in an essay published a few weeks after Donald Trump was elected president. “After 40 years, it has begun to corrode, both itself and us.” The former Google strategist James Williams told The Guardian: “The dynamics of the attention economy are structurally set up to undermine the human will.” In a blog post, Brad Burnham, a managing partner at Union Square Ventures, a top New York venture-capital firm, bemoaned the collateral damage from the quasi monopolies of the digital age: “Publishers find themselves becoming commodity content suppliers in a sea of undifferentiated content in the Facebook news feed. Websites see their fortunes upended by small changes in Google’s search algorithms. And manufacturers watch helplessly as sales dwindle when Amazon decides to source products directly in China and redirect demand to their own products.” (Full disclosure: Burnham’s firm invested in a company I started in 2006; we have had no financial relationship since it sold in 2011.) Even Berners-Lee, the inventor of the web itself, wrote a blog post voicing his concerns that the advertising-based model of social media and search engines creates a climate where “misinformation, or ‘fake news,’ which is surprising, shocking or designed to appeal to our biases, can spread like wildfire.” For most critics, the solution to these immense structural issues has been to propose either a new mindfulness about the dangers of these tools — turning off our smartphones, keeping kids off social media — or the strong arm of regulation and antitrust: making the tech giants subject to the same scrutiny as other industries that are vital to the public interest, like the railroads or telephone networks of an earlier age. Both those ideas are commendable: We probably should develop a new set of habits governing how we interact with social media, and it seems entirely sensible that companies as powerful as Google and Facebook should face the same regulatory scrutiny as, say, television networks. But those interventions are unlikely to fix the core problems that the online world confronts. After all, it was not just the antitrust division of the Department of Justice that challenged Microsoft’s monopoly power in the 1990s; it was also the emergence of new software and hardware — the web, open-source software and Apple products — that helped undermine Microsoft’s dominant position. The blockchain evangelists behind platforms like Ethereum believe that a comparable array of advances in software, cryptography and distributed systems has the ability to tackle today’s digital problems: the corrosive incentives of online advertising; the quasi monopolies of Facebook, Google and Amazon; Russian misinformation campaigns. If they succeed, their creations may challenge the hegemony of the tech giants far more effectively than any antitrust regulation. They even claim to offer an alternative to the winner-take-all model of capitalism than has driven wealth inequality to heights not seen since the age of the robber barons. That remedy is not yet visible in any product that would be intelligible to an ordinary tech consumer. The only blockchain project that has crossed over into mainstream recognition so far is Bitcoin, which is in the middle of a speculative bubble that makes the 1990s internet I.P.O. frenzy look like a neighborhood garage sale. And herein lies the cognitive dissonance that confronts anyone trying to make sense of the blockchain: the potential power of this would-be revolution is being actively undercut by the crowd it is attracting, a veritable goon squad of charlatans, false prophets and mercenaries. Not for the first time, technologists pursuing a vision of an open and decentralized network have found themselves surrounded by a wave of opportunists looking to make an overnight fortune. The question is whether, after the bubble has burst, the very real promise of the blockchain can endure.  of modern technological history, the internet’s fall from grace follows an inevitable historical script. As Tim Wu argued in his 2010 book, “The Master Switch,” all the major information technologies of the 20th century adhered to a similar developmental pattern, starting out as the playthings of hobbyists and researchers motivated by curiosity and community, and ending up in the hands of multinational corporations fixated on maximizing shareholder value. Wu calls this pattern the Cycle, and on the surface at least, the internet has followed the Cycle with convincing fidelity. The internet began as a hodgepodge of government-funded academic research projects and side-hustle hobbies. But 20 years after the web first crested into the popular imagination, it has produced in Google, Facebook and Amazon — and indirectly, Apple — what may well be the most powerful and valuable corporations in the history of capitalism. Blockchain advocates don’t accept the inevitability of the Cycle. The roots of the internet were in fact more radically open and decentralized than previous information technologies, they argue, and had we managed to stay true to those roots, it could have remained that way. The online world would not be dominated by a handful of information-age titans; our news platforms would be less vulnerable to manipulation and fraud; identity theft would be far less common; advertising dollars would be distributed across a wider range of media properties. To understand why, it helps to think of the internet as two fundamentally different kinds of systems stacked on top of each other, like layers in an archaeological dig. One layer is composed of the software protocols that were developed in the 1970s and 1980s and hit critical mass, at least in terms of audience, in the 1990s. (A protocol is the software version of a lingua franca, a way that multiple computers agree to communicate with one another. There are protocols that govern the flow of the internet’s raw data, and protocols for sending email messages, and protocols that define the addresses of web pages.) And then above them, a second layer of web-based services — Facebook, Google, Amazon, Twitter — that largely came to power in the following decade. The first layer — call it InternetOne — was founded on open protocols, which in turn were defined and maintained by academic researchers and international-standards bodies, owned by no one. In fact, that original openness continues to be all around us, in ways we probably don’t appreciate enough. Email is still based on the open protocols POP, SMTP and IMAP; websites are still served up using the open protocol HTTP; bits are still circulated via the original open protocols of the internet, TCP/IP. You don’t need to understand anything about how these software conventions work on a technical level to enjoy their benefits. The key characteristic they all share is that anyone can use them, free of charge. You don’t need to pay a licensing fee to some corporation that owns HTTP if you want to put up a web page; you don’t have to sell a part of your identity to advertisers if you want to send an email using SMTP. Along with Wikipedia, the open protocols of the internet constitute the most impressive example of commons-based production in human history. To see how enormous but also invisible the benefits of such protocols have been, imagine that one of those key standards had not been developed: for instance, the open standard we use for defining our geographic location, GPS. Originally developed by the United States military, the Global Positioning System was first made available for civilian use during the Reagan administration. For about a decade, it was largely used by the aviation industry, until individual consumers began to use it in car navigation systems. And now we have smartphones that can pick up a signal from GPS satellites orbiting above us, and we use that extraordinary power to do everything from locating nearby restaurants to playing Pokémon Go to coordinating disaster-relief efforts. But what if the military had kept GPS out of the public domain? Presumably, sometime in the 1990s, a market signal would have gone out to the innovators of Silicon Valley and other tech hubs, suggesting that consumers were interested in establishing their exact geographic coordinates so that those locations could be projected onto digital maps. There would have been a few years of furious competition among rival companies, who would toss their own proprietary satellites into orbit and advance their own unique protocols, but eventually the market would have settled on one dominant model, given all the efficiencies that result from a single, common way of verifying location. Call that imaginary firm GeoBook. Initially, the embrace of GeoBook would have been a leap forward for consumers and other companies trying to build location awareness into their hardware and software. But slowly, a darker narrative would have emerged: a single private corporation, tracking the movements of billions of people around the planet, building an advertising behemoth based on our shifting locations. Any start-up trying to build a geo-aware application would have been vulnerable to the whims of mighty GeoBook. Appropriately angry polemics would have been written denouncing the public menace of this Big Brother in the sky. But none of that happened, for a simple reason. Geolocation, like the location of web pages and email addresses and domain names, is a problem we solved with an open protocol. And because it’s a problem we don’t have, we rarely think about how beautifully GPS does work and how many different applications have been built on its foundation. The open, decentralized web turns out to be alive and well on the InternetOne layer. But since we settled on the World Wide Web in the mid-’90s, we’ve adopted very few new open-standard protocols. The biggest problems that technologists tackled after 1995 — many of which revolved around identity, community and payment mechanisms — were left to the private sector to solve. This is what led, in the early 2000s, to a powerful new layer of internet services, which we might call InternetTwo. For all their brilliance, the inventors of the open protocols that shaped the internet failed to include some key elements that would later prove critical to the future of online culture. Perhaps most important, they did not create a secure open standard that established human identity on the network. Units of information could be defined — pages, links, messages — but   did not have their own protocol: no way to define and share your real name, your location, your interests or (perhaps most crucial) your relationships to other people online. This turns out to have been a major oversight, because identity is the sort of problem that benefits from one universally recognized solution. It’s what Vitalik Buterin, a founder of Ethereum, describes as “base-layer” infrastructure: things like language, roads and postal services, platforms where commerce and competition are actually assisted by having an underlying layer in the public domain. Offline, we don’t have an open market for physical passports or Social Security numbers; we have a few reputable authorities — most of them backed by the power of the state — that we use to confirm to others that we are who we say we are. But online, the private sector swooped in to fill that vacuum, and because identity had that characteristic of being a universal problem, the market was heavily incentivized to settle on one common standard for defining yourself and the people you know. The self-reinforcing feedback loops that economists call “increasing returns” or “network effects” kicked in, and after a period of experimentation in which we dabbled in social-media start-ups like Myspace and Friendster, the market settled on what is essentially a proprietary standard for establishing who you are and whom you know. That standard is Facebook. With more than two billion users, Facebook is far larger than the entire internet at the peak of the dot-com bubble in the late 1990s. And that user growth has made it the world’s sixth-most-valuable corporation, just 14 years after it was founded. Facebook is the ultimate embodiment of the chasm that divides InternetOne and InternetTwo economies. No private company owned the protocols that defined email or GPS or the open web. But one single corporation owns the data that define social identity for two billion people today — and one single person, Mark Zuckerberg, holds the majority of the voting power in that corporation. If you see the rise of the centralized web as an inevitable turn of the Cycle, and the open-protocol idealism of the early web as a kind of adolescent false consciousness, then there’s less reason to fret about all the ways we’ve abandoned the vision of InternetOne. Either we’re living in a fallen state today and there’s no way to get back to Eden, or Eden itself was a kind of fantasy that was always going to be corrupted by concentrated power. In either case, there’s no point in trying to restore the architecture of InternetOne; our only hope is to use the power of the state to rein in these corporate giants, through regulation and antitrust action. It’s a variation of the old Audre Lorde maxim: “The master’s tools will never dismantle the master’s house.” You can’t fix the problems technology has created for us by throwing more technological solutions at it. You need forces outside the domain of software and servers to break up cartels with this much power. But the thing about the master’s house, in this analogy, is that it’s a duplex. The upper floor has indeed been built with tools that cannot be used to dismantle it. But the open protocols beneath them still have the potential to build something better.  persuasive advocates of an open-protocol revival is Juan Benet, a Mexican-born programmer now living on a suburban side street in Palo Alto, Calif., in a three-bedroom rental that he shares with his girlfriend and another programmer, plus a rotating cast of guests, some of whom belong to Benet’s organization, Protocol Labs. On a warm day in September, Benet greeted me at his door wearing a black Protocol Labs hoodie. The interior of the space brought to mind the incubator/frat house of HBO’s “Silicon Valley,” its living room commandeered by an array of black computer monitors. In the entrance hallway, the words “Welcome to Rivendell” were scrawled out on a whiteboard, a nod to the Elven city from “Lord of the Rings.” “We call this house Rivendell,” Benet said sheepishly. “It’s not a very good Rivendell. It doesn’t have enough books, or waterfalls, or elves.” Benet, who is 29, considers himself a child of the first peer-to-peer revolution that briefly flourished in the late 1990s and early 2000s, driven in large part by networks like BitTorrent that distributed media files, often illegally. That initial flowering was in many ways a logical outgrowth of the internet’s decentralized, open-protocol roots. The web had shown that you could publish documents reliably in a commons-based network. Services like BitTorrent or Skype took that logic to the next level, allowing ordinary users to add new functionality to the internet: creating a distributed library of (largely pirated) media, as with BitTorrent, or helping people make phone calls over the internet, as with Skype. Sitting in the living room/office at Rivendell, Benet told me that he thinks of the early 2000s, with the ascent of Skype and BitTorrent, as “the ‘summer’ of peer-to-peer” — its salad days. “But then peer-to-peer hit a wall, because people started to prefer centralized architectures,” he said. “And partly because the peer-to-peer business models were piracy-driven.” A graduate of Stanford’s computer-science program, Benet talks in a manner reminiscent of Elon Musk: As he speaks, his eyes dart across an empty space above your head, almost as though he’s reading an invisible teleprompter to find the words. He is passionate about the technology Protocol Labs is developing, but also keen to put it in a wider context. For Benet, the shift from distributed systems to more centralized approaches set in motion changes that few could have predicted. “The rules of the game, the rules that govern all of this technology, matter a lot,” he said. “The structure of what we build now will paint a very different picture of the way things will be five or 10 years in the future.” He continued: “It was clear to me then that peer-to-peer was this extraordinary thing. What was not clear to me then was how at risk it is. It was not clear to me that you had to take up the baton, that it’s now your turn to protect it.” Protocol Labs is Benet’s attempt to take up that baton, and its first project is a radical overhaul of the internet’s file system, including the basic scheme we use to address the location of pages on the web. Benet calls his system IPFS, short for InterPlanetary File System. The current protocol — HTTP — pulls down web pages from a single location at a time and has no built-in mechanism for archiving the online pages. IPFS allows users to download a page simultaneously from multiple locations and includes what programmers call “historic versioning,” so that past iterations do not vanish from the historical record. To support the protocol, Benet is also creating a system called Filecoin that will allow users to effectively rent out unused hard-drive space. (Think of it as a sort of Airbnb for data.) “Right now there are tons of hard drives around the planet that are doing nothing, or close to nothing, to the point where their owners are just losing money,” Benet said. “So you can bring online a massive amount of supply, which will bring down the costs of storage.” But as its name suggests, Protocol Labs has an ambition that extends beyond these projects; Benet’s larger mission is to support many new open-source protocols in the years to come. Why did the internet follow the path from open to closed? One part of the explanation lies in sins of omission: By the time a new generation of coders began to tackle the problems that InternetOne left unsolved, there were near-limitless sources of capital to invest in those efforts, so long as the coders kept their systems closed. The secret to the success of the open protocols of InternetOne is that they were developed in an age when most people didn’t care about online networks, so they were able to stealthily reach critical mass without having to contend with wealthy conglomerates and venture capitalists. By the mid-2000s, though, a promising new start-up like Facebook could attract millions of dollars in financing even before it became a household brand. And that private-sector money ensured that the company’s key software would remain closed, in order to capture as much value as possible for shareholders. And yet — as the venture capitalist Chris Dixon points out — there was another factor, too, one that was more technical than financial in nature. “Let’s say you’re trying to build an open Twitter,” Dixon explained while sitting in a conference room at the New York offices of Andreessen Horowitz, where he is a general partner. “I’m @cdixon at Twitter. Where do you store that? You need a database.” A closed architecture like Facebook’s or Twitter’s puts all the information about its users — their handles, their likes and photos, the map of connections they have to other individuals on the network — into a private database that is maintained by the company. Whenever you look at your Facebook newsfeed, you are granted access to some infinitesimally small section of that database, seeing only the information that is relevant to you. Running Facebook’s database is an unimaginably complex operation, relying on hundreds of thousands of servers scattered around the world, overseen by some of the most brilliant engineers on the planet. From Facebook’s point of view, they’re providing a valuable service to humanity: creating a common social graph for almost everyone on earth. The fact that they have to sell ads to pay the bills for that service — and the fact that the scale of their network gives them staggering power over the minds of two billion people around the world — is an unfortunate, but inevitable, price to pay for a shared social graph. And that trade-off did in fact make sense in the mid-2000s; creating a single database capable of tracking the interactions of hundreds of millions of people — much less two billion — was the kind of problem that could be tackled only by a single organization. But as Benet and his fellow blockchain evangelists are eager to prove, that might not be true anymore. So how can you get meaningful adoption of base-layer protocols in an age when the big tech companies have already attracted billions of users and collectively sit on hundreds of billions of dollars in cash? If you happen to believe that the internet, in its current incarnation, is causing significant and growing harm to society, then this seemingly esoteric problem — the difficulty of getting people to adopt new open-source technology standards — turns out to have momentous consequences. If we can’t figure out a way to introduce new, rival base-layer infrastructure, then we’re stuck with the internet we have today. The best we can hope for is government interventions to scale back the power of Facebook or Google, or some kind of consumer revolt that encourages that marketplace to shift to less hegemonic online services, the digital equivalent of forswearing big agriculture for local farmers’ markets. Neither approach would upend the underlying dynamics of InternetTwo.  of a meaningful challenge to the closed-protocol era arrived in 2008, not long after Zuckerberg opened the first international headquarters for his growing company. A mysterious programmer (or group of programmers) going by the name Satoshi Nakamoto circulated a paper on a cryptography mailing list. The paper was called “Bitcoin: A Peer-to-Peer Electronic Cash System,” and in it, Nakamoto outlined an ingenious system for a digital currency that did not require a centralized trusted authority to verify transactions. At the time, Facebook and Bitcoin seemed to belong to entirely different spheres — one was a booming venture-backed social-media start-up that let you share birthday greetings and connect with old friends, while the other was a byzantine scheme for cryptographic currency from an obscure email list. But 10 years later, the ideas that Nakamoto unleashed with that paper now pose the most significant challenge to the hegemony of InternetTwo giants like Facebook. The paradox about Bitcoin is that it may well turn out to be a genuinely revolutionary breakthrough and at the same time a colossal failure as a currency. As I write, Bitcoin has increased in value by nearly 100,000 percent over the past five years, making a fortune for its early investors but also branding it as a spectacularly unstable payment mechanism. The process for creating new Bitcoins has also turned out to be a staggering energy drain. History is replete with stories of new technologies whose initial applications end up having little to do with their eventual use. All the focus on Bitcoin as a payment system may similarly prove to be a distraction, a technological red herring. Nakamoto pitched Bitcoin as a “peer-to-peer electronic-cash system” in the initial manifesto, but at its heart, the innovation he (or she or they) was proposing had a more general structure, with two key features. First, Bitcoin offered a kind of proof that you could create a secure database — the blockchain — scattered across hundreds or thousands of computers, with no single authority controlling and verifying the authenticity of the data. Second, Nakamoto designed Bitcoin so that the work of maintaining that distributed ledger was itself rewarded with small, increasingly scarce Bitcoin payments. If you dedicated half your computer’s processing cycles to helping the Bitcoin network get its math right — and thus fend off the hackers and scam artists — you received a small sliver of the currency. Nakamoto designed the system so that Bitcoins would grow increasingly difficult to earn over time, ensuring a certain amount of scarcity in the system. If you helped Bitcoin keep that database secure in the early days, you would earn more Bitcoin than later arrivals. This process has come to be called “mining.” For our purposes, forget everything else about the Bitcoin frenzy, and just keep these two things in mind: What Nakamoto ushered into the world was a way of agreeing on the contents of a database without anyone being “in charge” of the database, and a way of compensating people for helping make that database more valuable, without those people being on an official payroll or owning shares in a corporate entity. Together, those two ideas solved the distributed-database problem and the funding problem. Suddenly there was a way of supporting open protocols that wasn’t available during the infancy of Facebook and Twitter. These two features have now been replicated in dozens of new systems inspired by Bitcoin. One of those systems is Ethereum, proposed in a white paper by Vitalik Buterin when he was just 19. Ethereum does have its currencies, but at its heart Ethereum was designed less to facilitate electronic payments than to allow people to run applications on top of the Ethereum blockchain. There are currently hundreds of Ethereum apps in development, ranging from prediction markets to Facebook clones to crowdfunding services. Almost all of them are in pre-alpha stage, not ready for consumer adoption. Despite the embryonic state of the applications, the Ether currency has seen its own miniature version of the Bitcoin bubble, most likely making Buterin an immense fortune. These currencies can be used in clever ways. Juan Benet’s Filecoin system will rely on Ethereum technology and reward users and developers who adopt its IPFS protocol or help maintain the shared database it requires. Protocol Labs is creating its own cryptocurrency, also called Filecoin, and has plans to sell some of those coins on the open market in the coming months. (In the summer of 2017, the company raised $135 million in the first 60 minutes of what Benet calls a “presale” of the tokens to accredited investors.) Many cryptocurrencies are first made available to the public through a process known as an initial coin offering, or I.C.O. The I.C.O. abbreviation is a deliberate echo of the initial public offering that so defined the first internet bubble in the 1990s. But there is a crucial difference between the two. Speculators can buy in during an I.C.O., but they are not buying an ownership stake in a private company and its proprietary software, the way they might in a traditional I.P.O. Afterward, the coins will continue to be created in exchange for labor — in the case of Filecoin, by anyone who helps maintain the Filecoin network. Developers who help refine the software can earn the coins, as can ordinary users who lend out spare hard-drive space to expand the network’s storage capacity. The Filecoin is a way of signaling that someone, somewhere, has added value to the network. Advocates like Chris Dixon have started referring to the compensation side of the equation in terms of “tokens,” not coins, to emphasize that the technology here isn’t necessarily aiming to disrupt existing currency systems. “I like the metaphor of a token because it makes it very clear that it’s like an arcade,” he says. “You go to the arcade, and in the arcade you can use these tokens. But we’re not trying to replace the U.S. government. It’s not meant to be a real currency; it’s meant to be a pseudo-currency inside this world.” Dan Finlay, a creator of MetaMask, echoes Dixon’s argument. “To me, what’s interesting about this is that we get to program new value systems,” he says. “They don’t have to resemble money.” Pseudo or not, the idea of an I.C.O. has already inspired a host of shady offerings, some of them endorsed by celebrities who would seem to be unlikely blockchain enthusiasts, like DJ Khaled, Paris Hilton and Floyd Mayweather. In a blog post published in October 2017, Fred Wilson, a founder of Union Square Ventures and an early advocate of the blockchain revolution, thundered against the spread of I.C.O.s. “I hate it,” Wilson wrote, adding that most I.C.O.s “are scams. And the celebrities and others who promote them on their social-media channels in an effort to enrich themselves are behaving badly and possibly violating securities laws.” Arguably the most striking thing about the surge of interest in I.C.O.s — and in existing currencies like Bitcoin or Ether — is how much financial speculation has already gravitated to platforms that have effectively zero adoption among ordinary consumers. At least during the internet bubble of late 1990s, ordinary people were buying books on Amazon or reading newspapers online; there was clear evidence that the web was going to become a mainstream platform. Today, the hype cycles are so accelerated that billions of dollars are chasing a technology that almost no one outside the cryptocommunity understands, much less uses.  for the sake of argument, that the hype is warranted, and blockchain platforms like Ethereum become a fundamental part of our digital infrastructure. How would a distributed ledger and a token economy somehow challenge one of the tech giants? One of Fred Wilson’s partners at Union Square Ventures, Brad Burnham, suggests a scenario revolving around another tech giant that has run afoul of regulators and public opinion in the last year: Uber. “Uber is basically just a coordination platform between drivers and passengers,” Burnham says. “Yes, it was really innovative, and there were a bunch of things in the beginning about reducing the anxiety of whether the driver was coming or not, and the map — and a whole bunch of things that you should give them a lot of credit for.” But when a new service like Uber starts to take off, there’s a strong incentive for the marketplace to consolidate around a single leader. The fact that more passengers are starting to use the Uber app attracts more drivers to the service, which in turn attracts more passengers. People have their credit cards stored with Uber; they have the app installed already; there are far more Uber drivers on the road. And so the switching costs of trying out some other rival service eventually become prohibitive, even if the chief executive seems to be a jerk or if consumers would, in the abstract, prefer a competitive marketplace with a dozen Ubers. “At some point, the innovation around the coordination becomes less and less innovative,” Burnham says. The blockchain world proposes something different. Imagine some group like Protocol Labs decides there’s a case to be made for adding another “basic layer” to the stack. Just as GPS gave us a way of discovering and sharing our location, this new protocol would define a simple request: I am here and would like to go there. A distributed ledger might record all its users’ past trips, credit cards, favorite locations — all the metadata that services like Uber or Amazon use to encourage lock-in. Call it, for the sake of argument, the Transit protocol. The standards for sending a Transit request out onto the internet would be entirely open; anyone who wanted to build an app to respond to that request would be free to do so. Cities could build Transit apps that allowed taxi drivers to field requests. But so could bike-share collectives, or rickshaw drivers. Developers could create shared marketplace apps where all the potential vehicles using Transit could vie for your business. When you walked out on the sidewalk and tried to get a ride, you wouldn’t have to place your allegiance with a single provider before hailing. You would simply announce that you were standing at 67th and Madison and needed to get to Union Square. And then you’d get a flurry of competing offers. You could even theoretically get an offer from the M.T.A., which could build a service to remind Transit users that it might be much cheaper and faster just to jump on the 6 train. How would Transit reach critical mass when Uber and Lyft already dominate the ride-sharing market? This is where the tokens come in. Early adopters of Transit would be rewarded with Transit tokens, which could themselves be used to purchase Transit services or be traded on exchanges for traditional currency. As in the Bitcoin model, tokens would be doled out less generously as Transit grew more popular. In the early days, a developer who built an iPhone app that uses Transit might see a windfall of tokens; Uber drivers who started using Transit as a second option for finding passengers could collect tokens as a reward for embracing the system; adventurous consumers would be rewarded with tokens for using Transit in its early days, when there are fewer drivers available compared with the existing proprietary networks like Uber or Lyft. As Transit began to take off, it would attract speculators, who would put a monetary price on the token and drive even more interest in the protocol by inflating its value, which in turn would attract more developers, drivers and customers. If the whole system ends up working as its advocates believe, the result is a more competitive but at the same time more equitable marketplace. Instead of all the economic value being captured by the shareholders of one or two large corporations that dominate the market, the economic value is distributed across a much wider group: the early developers of Transit, the app creators who make the protocol work in a consumer-friendly form, the early-adopter drivers and passengers, the first wave of speculators. Token economies introduce a strange new set of elements that do not fit the traditional models: instead of creating value by owning something, as in the shareholder equity model, people create value by improving the underlying protocol, either by helping to maintain the ledger (as in Bitcoin mining), or by writing apps atop it, or simply by using the service. The lines between founders, investors and customers are far blurrier than in traditional corporate models; all the incentives are explicitly designed to steer away from winner-take-all outcomes. And yet at the same time, the whole system depends on an initial speculative phase in which outsiders are betting on the token to rise in value. “You think about the ’90s internet bubble and all the great infrastructure we got out of that,” Dixon says. “You’re basically taking that effect and shrinking it down to the size of an application.”  have their key nodes. For Ethereum, one of those nodes is the Brooklyn headquarters of an organization called ConsenSys, founded by Joseph Lubin, an early Ethereum pioneer. In November, Amanda Gutterman, the 26-year-old chief marketing officer for ConsenSys, gave me a tour of the space. In our first few minutes together, she offered the obligatory cup of coffee, only to discover that the drip-coffee machine in the kitchen was bone dry. “How can we fix the internet if we can’t even make coffee?” she said with a laugh. Planted in industrial Bushwick, a stone’s throw from the pizza mecca Roberta’s, “headquarters” seemed an unlikely word. The front door was festooned with graffiti and stickers; inside, the stairwells of the space appeared to have been last renovated during the Coolidge administration. Just about three years old, the ConsenSys network now includes more than 550 employees in 28 countries, and the operation has never raised a dime of venture capital. As an organization, ConsenSys does not quite fit any of the usual categories: It is technically a corporation, but it has elements that also resemble nonprofits and workers’ collectives. The shared goal of ConsenSys members is strengthening and expanding the Ethereum blockchain. They support developers creating new apps and tools for the platform, one of which is MetaMask, the software that generated my Ethereum address. But they also offer consulting-style services for companies, nonprofits or governments looking for ways to integrate Ethereum’s smart contracts into their own systems. The true test of the blockchain will revolve — like so many of the online crises of the past few years — around the problem of identity. Today your digital identity is scattered across dozens, or even hundreds, of different sites: Amazon has your credit-card information and your purchase history; Facebook knows your friends and family; Equifax maintains your credit history. When you use any of those services, you are effectively asking for permission to borrow some of that information about yourself in order perform a task: ordering a Christmas present for your uncle, checking Instagram to see pictures from the office party last night. But all these different fragments of your identity don’t belong to you; they belong to Facebook and Amazon and Google, who are free to sell bits of that information about you to advertisers without consulting you. You, of course, are free to delete those accounts if you choose, and if you stop checking Facebook, Zuckerberg and the Facebook shareholders will stop making money by renting out your attention to their true customers. But your Facebook or Google identity isn’t portable. If you want to join another promising social network that is maybe a little less infected with Russian bots, you can’t extract your social network from Twitter and deposit it in the new service. You have to build the network again from scratch (and persuade all your friends to do the same). The blockchain evangelists think this entire approach is backward. You should own your digital identity — which could include everything from your date of birth to your friend networks to your purchasing history — and you should be free to lend parts of that identity out to services as you see fit. Given that identity was not baked into the original internet protocols, and given the difficulty of managing a distributed database in the days before Bitcoin, this form of “self-sovereign” identity — as the parlance has it — was a practical impossibility. Now it is an attainable goal. A number of blockchain-based services are trying to tackle this problem, including a new identity system called uPort that has been spun out of ConsenSys and another one called Blockstack that is currently based on the Bitcoin platform. (Tim Berners-Lee is leading the development of a comparable system, called Solid, that would also give users control over their own data.) These rival protocols all have slightly different frameworks, but they all share a general vision of how identity should work on a truly decentralized internet. What would prevent a new blockchain-based identity standard from following Tim Wu’s Cycle, the same one that brought Facebook to such a dominant position? Perhaps nothing. But imagine how that sequence would play out in practice. Someone creates a new protocol to define your social network via Ethereum. It might be as simple as a list of other Ethereum addresses; in other words,   That way of defining your social network might well take off and ultimately supplant the closed systems that define your network on Facebook. Perhaps someday, every single person on the planet might use that standard to map their social connections, just as every single person on the internet uses TCP/IP to share data. But even if this new form of identity became ubiquitous, it wouldn’t present the same opportunities for abuse and manipulation that you find in the closed systems that have become de facto standards. I might allow a Facebook-style service to use my social map to filter news or gossip or music for me, based on the activity of my friends, but if that service annoyed me, I’d be free to sample other alternatives without the switching costs. An open identity standard would give ordinary people the opportunity to sell their attention to the highest bidder, or choose to keep it out of the marketplace altogether. Gutterman suggests that the same kind of system could be applied to even more critical forms of identity, like health care data. Instead of storing, say, your genome on servers belonging to a private corporation, the information would instead be stored inside a personal data archive. “There may be many corporate entities that I don’t want seeing that data, but maybe I’d like to donate that data to a medical study,” she says. “I could use my blockchain-based self-sovereign ID to [allow] one group to use it and not another. Or I could sell it over here and give it away over there.” The token architecture would give a blockchain-based identity standard an additional edge over closed standards like Facebook’s. As many critics have observed, ordinary users on social-media platforms create almost all the content without compensation, while the companies capture all the economic value from that content through advertising sales. A token-based social network would at least give early adopters a piece of the action, rewarding them for their labors in making the new platform appealing. “If someone can really figure out a version of Facebook that lets users own a piece of the network and get paid,” Dixon says, “that could be pretty compelling.” Would that information be more secure in a distributed blockchain than behind the elaborate firewalls of giant corporations like Google or Facebook? In this one respect, the Bitcoin story is actually instructive: It may never be stable enough to function as a currency, but it does offer convincing proof of just how secure a distributed ledger can be. “Look at the market cap of Bitcoin or Ethereum: $80 billion, $25 billion, whatever,” Dixon says. “That means if you successfully attack that system, you could walk away with more than a billion dollars. You know what a ‘bug bounty’ is? Someone says, ‘If you hack my system, I’ll give you a million dollars.’ So Bitcoin is now a nine-year-old multibillion-dollar bug bounty, and no one’s hacked it. It feels like pretty good proof.” Additional security would come from the decentralized nature of these new identity protocols. In the identity system proposed by Blockstack, the actual information about your identity — your social connections, your purchasing history — could be stored anywhere online. The blockchain would simply provide cryptographically secure keys to unlock that information and share it with other trusted providers. A system with a centralized repository with data for hundreds of millions of users — what security experts call “honey pots” — is far more appealing to hackers. Which would you rather do: steal a hundred million credit histories by hacking into a hundred million separate personal computers and sniﬃng around until you found the right data on each machine? Or just hack into one honey pot at Equifax and walk away with the same amount of data in a matter of hours? As Gutterman puts it, “It’s the difference between robbing a house versus robbing the entire village.”  the blockchain’s architecture is shaped by predictions about how that architecture might be abused once it finds a wider audience. That is part of its charm and its power. The blockchain channels the energy of speculative bubbles by allowing tokens to be shared widely among true supporters of the platform. It safeguards against any individual or small group gaining control of the entire database. Its cryptography is designed to protect against surveillance states or identity thieves. In this, the blockchain displays a familial resemblance to political constitutions: Its rules are designed with one eye on how those rules might be exploited down the line. Much has been made of the anarcho-libertarian streak in Bitcoin and other nonfiat currencies; the community is rife with words and phrases (“self-sovereign”) that sound as if they could be slogans for some militia compound in Montana. And yet in its potential to break up large concentrations of power and explore less-proprietary models of ownership, the blockchain idea offers a tantalizing possibility for those who would like to distribute wealth more equitably and break up the cartels of the digital age. The blockchain worldview can also sound libertarian in the sense that it proposes nonstate solutions to capitalist excesses like information monopolies. But to believe in the blockchain is not necessarily to oppose regulation, if that regulation is designed with complementary aims. Brad Burnham, for instance, suggests that regulators should insist that everyone have “a right to a private data store,” where all the various facets of their online identity would be maintained. But governments wouldn’t be required to design those identity protocols. They would be developed on the blockchain, open source. Ideologically speaking, that private data store would be a true team effort: built as an intellectual commons, funded by token speculators, supported by the regulatory state. Like the original internet itself, the blockchain is an idea with radical — almost communitarian — possibilities that at the same time has attracted some of the most frivolous and regressive appetites of capitalism. We spent our first years online in a world defined by open protocols and intellectual commons; we spent the second phase in a world increasingly dominated by closed architectures and proprietary databases. We have learned enough from this history to support the hypothesis that open works better than closed, at least where base-layer issues are concerned. But we don’t have an easy route back to the open-protocol era. Some messianic next-generation internet protocol is not likely to emerge out of Department of Defense research, the way the first-generation internet did nearly 50 years ago. Yes, the blockchain may seem like the very worst of speculative capitalism right now, and yes, it is demonically challenging to understand. But the beautiful thing about open protocols is that they can be steered in surprising new directions by the people who discover and champion them in their infancy. Right now, the only real hope for a revival of the open-protocol ethos lies in the blockchain. Whether it eventually lives up to its egalitarian promise will in large part depend on the people who embrace the platform, who take up the baton, as Juan Benet puts it, from those early online pioneers. If you think the internet is not working in its current incarnation, you can’t change the system through think-pieces and F.C.C. regulations alone. You need new code.
• How to kill off a bank quietly. • Snap just lost nearly $2 billion in market value. • The new tax law is having implications beyond America’s borders. • The Supreme Court helps define what a whistle-blower must do. • Newell Brands named three new directors as it fights with Starboard Value. • Broadcom and Qualcomm are getting feistier in their deal fight. The Trump administration has mostly taken a softer stance toward Wall Street, but on Wednesday, it suggested a regulatory change designed to make life harder for the big banks. The change,   the Treasury Department, is arcane, but in a financial crisis, it could be hugely consequential.  The tweak aims to increase the likelihood that a failing bank would be forced into bankruptcy, rather than into a resolution process overseen by the government. The difference might seem insignificant, especially since the current regulatory procedures for winding down a bank, introduced by the Dodd-Frank Act of 2010, are stringent and mimic bankruptcy. But the Treasury Department believes that an actual bankruptcy would be preferable. It would make the process of restructuring a failed bank more evenhanded and predictable, according to the Treasury. In turn, investors in the big Wall Street firms, and anyone doing business with them, would become more aware of the losses they could suffer if those firms crashed. The disorderly collapse of Lehman Brothers into bankruptcy set off a panic across the global financial system, according to most analyses of the period. And that is why the Dodd-Frank Act set up a way for regulators to seize a large bank and restructure it in a controlled manner, known as the orderly liquidation authority. As with bankruptcy, it envisions making creditors the new owners of a restructured firm. But it added a feature to limit panic. Under Dodd-Frank, regulators can lend to the failed bank. Such a backstop could prevent a further run on the bank. Its customers and creditors would see that the seized bank had sufficient funds to pay them. The government lending mimics the loans that banks make to bankrupt companies.  Not much at all. It recommends using the Dodd-Frank resolution framework “as an emergency tool for use in extraordinary circumstances.” But that’s how the backers of Dodd-Frank saw the process, too. Crucially, the Treasury also wants to keep the emergency government loan. But the Treasury’s proposal does introduce an important and innovative change. It calls for a special type of bankruptcy regime for large financial firms, called Chapter 14. This new regime envisions having a set of specialist judges, working with regulators in the United States and around the world, who could plan for and oversee the bankruptcies of large banks. Much depends on whether the customers and creditors of the failing bank yank their money, intensifying the run and spreading fear through the system. The Treasury argues that changes since the crisis mean banks have more cash on hand, and banks can now hold off for a short time on paying claims on financial instruments called derivatives (recall, such claims were particularly debilitating for Lehman.) Also, banks must now have detailed plans to put themselves into bankruptcy, though the Treasury last year suggested changes that might make that planning less stringent. Notably, the Treasury hopes to make Chapter 14 effective by deploying a method for restructuring a failed bank that regulators already expect to use under the orderly liquidation authority. This approach rests on turning pre-existing debt owed by a bank’s holding company into new equity at the subsidiaries where the bank does all its business. The theory: If a reassuringly large amount of new equity were created at the subsidiaries, the banks’ creditors and trading partners would feel protected and not withdraw. Indeed, the Treasury says this would eliminate the incentive for counterparties to run. In the heat of a crisis, when the scale of a bank’s losses is not known, making it hard to know how much new equity is needed, creditors and trading partners may just head for the exits, crippling the bank. Even so, Aaron Klein, a fellow at the Brookings Institution, said it made a lot of sense to enshrine this formal wind-down procedure in bankruptcy. “Why wouldn’t you want to make bankruptcy better?” he said. Under post-crisis rules, banks must earmark billions of dollars of debt that would be used for creating new equity in a resolution. Put another way, Dodd-Frank has made it possible for the Trump administration to pursue a favored policy goal. Shares of   Thursday after Kylie Jenner tweeted that she no longer opens Snapchat. The tweet comes as Snap faces growing criticism from users over the redesign of its app. So far nearly 1.5 million people have retweeted a petition asking Snap to revert to the old version,  . Earlier this week analysts at Citi became the latest to downgrade the stock over the negative reaction. Mark May of Citi wrote: European banks with significant operations in New York and other parts of the United States have seen multi-billion dollar hits on their results in the fourth quarter as a result. Changes in corporate tax rates have forced European lenders – and their American counterparts – to recognize so-called deferred tax assets at the end of last year. But, the pain is expected to be short term as most banks, including Barclays and UBS, anticipate the tax rate for their United States operations will be lower future. As earnings season edges toward a close, here is the impact on some of Europe’s largest lenders: • Barclays reported an annual loss of 1.9 billion pounds, or about $2.7 billion after it took a series of charges, including £900 million related to tax changes in the United States. “Given the group’s substantial U.S. operations, this is expected to result in a reduction of the group’s effective tax rate in 2018 and future periods to mid-20 percent,” the bank said on Thursday. • Credit Suisse reported a loss of 2.13 billion Swiss francs, or about $2.3 billion, in the fourth quarter, driven primarily by 2.23 billion francs in income tax expenses related to the reassessment of its deferred tax assets. • Deutsche Bank reported a full-year loss of 497 million euros, or about $612 million. John Cryan, the Deutsche Bank chief executive, said: “Only a charge related to US tax reform at the end of the year meant that we had to post a full-year after-tax loss.” • HSBC reported a pretax profit of $17.2 billion for 2017, but took a charge of $1.3 billion to reflect a reevaluation of its deferred tax balances. • Société Générale said its profit was dragged down in the quarter after it was hit by restructuring charges related to its French retail banking network and the impact of tax reforms in France and in the United States. • UBS fell to a loss in the fourth quarter as a result of a writedown of 2.87 billion francs on deferred tax assets. Keep an eye out for Standard Chartered when it reports its annual results next week. The bank, which is based in Britain, but makes most of its money in Asia, has been recently touting its ability to serve the North American market. According to the Supreme Court, in an opinion written by Ruth Bader Ginsburg, it requires  , not just your bosses. More from Andrew Ackerman of the WSJ: The Supreme Court, in an opinion by Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, rejected that reading of the statute. It applied a simple analysis: “Courts are not at liberty to dispense with the condition — tell the S.E.C. — Congress imposed.” By not reporting his suspicions to the S.E.C., he lost the protection afforded whistle-blowers. The maker of Sharpie markers and Elmer’s glue said today that it was   amid its fight with Starboard. They are: •  , the chairman and former C.E.O. of Church & Dwight, the maker of Arm & Hammer •  , the former C.E.O. of Reynolds American, the tobacco company •  , a former C.E.O. of Transora, a services provider for packaged goods companies (who will be nominated at the company’s upcoming annual meeting)  That this was a response to Starboard, which has criticized Newell’s management team — and is seeking to  . Ray Dalio, the founder of Bridgewater Associates, the world’s biggest hedge fund, thinks so. Last week, Mr. Dalio said: “The risks of a recession in the next 18-24 months are rising.” Now he says there is a 70 percent chance of one before the next presidential election in 2020,  . During an appearance Wednesday at the Harvard Kennedy School’s Institute of Politics, Mr. Dalio said: Broadcom didn’t walk away after Qualcomm raised its takeover bid for NXP Semiconductor, but it did   by $3 a share, to $79. Why? Because the new NXP offer transferred $4.10 per Qualcomm share to NXP investors.  that the move “made an inadequate offer even worse,” and argued that the NXP deal couldn’t have gotten done at the original price of $110 a share. Looks like we’re headed to a showdown at Qualcomm’s annual meeting on March 6. • As online streaming booms and 5G gets closer, is now the time for Charlie Ergen to sell Dish Networks? ( ) • Hedge funds like Verition Partners are trying to save the shareholder appraisal process, meant to wring more money from mergers, from a series of adverse court rulings. ( ) • Britain might block Melrose Industries’s hostile takeover of the aerospace supplier GKN on national security grounds. ( ) • Two big U.S. hospital networks, Bon Secours Health System and Mercy Health, have agreed to merge, amid a surge in deal-making in the industry. ( ) Why has its growth slowed? A   suggests that rising consumer demand, as well as what companies produce and which tech they use, drives productivity improvements. More from   with Jaana Remes of McKinsey, one of the study’s authors:  Prepare for  , Jay Powell said.  , Randal Quarles added. The saving rate is at  . And no one knows why the markets  . • Mississippi granted a tax break worth up to $6 million to a hotel tied to the Trump family business. So could that violate the emoluments clause? ( ) • Sam Nunberg, a Trump campaign adviser, is   with Robert Mueller. And t he special counsel has   — under seal — against Paul Manafort and Rick Gates. • Congress’s next fight over Dreamers may come with   to avert a government shutdown on March 23. Meanwhile, Melania Trump’s parents have become lawful U.S. residents, perhaps  • Senators James Inhofe, Republican of Oklahoma, and Sheldon Whitehouse, Democrat of Rhode Island, called for a bipartisan infrastructure bill. ( ) • Survivors of school shootings shared their stories with President Trump and pleaded for action. ( ) • Representative Trey Gowdy of the House Oversight Committee demanded documents relating to first-class travel by Scott Pruitt, the head of the E.P.A. ( ) The bank’s employees are scattered across Midtown Manhattan. So it’s  , which could be  , to house 15,000 workers. (Its current H.Q. — which, fun fact, is where the pistols from Alexander Hamilton and Aaron Burr’s duel reside — was designed for about 3,500.)  The forthcoming JPMorgan skyscraper is the first major project under New York City’s Midtown East rezoning plan. The bank dropped plans for Manhattan’s Far West Side after failing to secure subsidies from the city.    last year, hit by the U.S. tax overhaul, but promised to  . And José Manuel Barroso, chairman of Goldman Sachs International, has been criticized for  , which he led until 2014. The carmaker didn’t specify what Raj Nair, the head of its North American operations,  , only that his ouster arose out of  . But the move adds to turmoil at the struggling company. The context: Ford already apologized to its workers after the NYT investigated longstanding abuses of women at two of its plants in Chicago. And its operations chief in China left earlier this year for pre-Ford “personal reasons.” • The Dallas Mavericks franchise   to investigate   against its former team president. • A national online survey found sexual harassment and assault to be much more common than previous studies had suggested. ( ) • The former NPR executive Michael Oreskes was warned repeatedly that he was acting inappropriately toward women, and kept doing it, according to an independent investigation. ( ) • Tom Schumacher, the Disney executive who took “Frozen” to Broadway, has been accused of workplace harassment. ( ) • An anonymous chat app is helping lift the lid on sexual harassment in South Korea. ( ) The secure messaging service is holding   before its highly anticipated (and record-breaking) initial coin offering. More from Adrianne Jeffries of The Verge: • The S.E.C. charged the virtual currency exchange BitFunder and its founder with fraud. ( ) • The Justice Department has made gains on a seized Bitcoin hoard, but has had trouble cashing out. ( ) • Some new ways of selling shovels to Bitcoin miners. ( ) • Lawmakers in Britain are examining sympathetic ways to regulate digital currencies. ( ) • New software at big cryptocurrency exchanges could make Bitcoin transactions cheaper. ( ) And Bitcoin’s at   today, according to  . • The latest chatbots are impressive. But they might be even better if their inventors weren’t scared of them saying something vile in public. ( ) • Airbnb is trying to promote its Experiences business as it heads toward an I.P.O., with little success. ( ) • Amazon’s Alexa could be the next great consumer computing platform, says Farhad Manjoo. ( ) • Roger McNamee, an early investor in Facebook, says it could be fixed by charging users for a better News Feed, arranged in cable-style bundles. ( ) • Uber will keep investing in Southeast Asia, despite losing money to local rivals. ( ) • A former Google engineer has sued the company for discrimination and wrongful termination, saying he fired for responding to racist and sexist encounters. ( ) • Naspers of South Africa has become an under-the-radar e-commerce giant and global tech investor. ( ) • One of Twitter’s solutions for bot accounts: limiting automated tweets. ( ) • Facebook is using algorithms to flag expressions of suicidal thoughts. ( ) • Apple wants to patent a way to count calories burned during yoga. ( ) •  , one of Citigroup’s co-heads of M. & A., is leaving. ( ) •   and   are the finalists to become Cisco’s global sales chief and No. 2 executive, unnamed sources say. ( ) • Glassdoor has hired   from Lithium Technologies as its C.F.O. It also named   as its first C.O.O. and   as its vice president of global corporate communications. ( ) • Coinbase is hiring a C.F.O. ( ) “There is a credibility gap between what they say and the reality of what is to come.” • Toys “R” Us plans to close another 200 stores and lay off many of its corporate staff after disappointing holiday sales, unnamed sources say. ( ) • British officials have been holding talks with Unilever amid fears that the Anglo-Dutch consumer group could choose to have one unified headquarters in Rotterdam, not London. ( ) • Hedge funds are buying planes and leasing them to airlines. ( ) • A fund managed directly by Alan Howard, who made his name with impressive profits during the financial crisis in 2008, lost nearly 9 percent net of fees from May through December. ( ) • Greece’s Parliament voted to investigate politicians over allegations of bribery by the Swiss drugmaker Novartis. ( )
• What’s at stake in Alabama • Will Republicans enact their tax plan by year’s end? • What does Apple spend its cash on? Not acquisitions. • Is Broadcom making a jobs promise it can’t fulfill? As Alabamians  , here’s the context: • Republicans have a two-seat majority in the Senate. Alabama hasn’t had a Democratic senator in 25 years, but the controversy around Roy Moore has made a once-safe seat potentially up for grabs. • Even if the tax legislation is signed into law this year — we’ll get to the state of play in a moment, though there’s a chance things don’t get wrapped up before the holidays — Republicans still have plenty of other issues, from health care to infrastructure spending, that will have to get through the Senate. Having Doug Jones, Mr. Moore’s Democratic opponent, in the Senate would make that effort more difficult. (So could having a Republican senator who feuds with Mitch McConnell and other G.O.P. leaders.) Pre-election polls have been incredibly volatile, though   Mr. Moore is in the lead. Polling stations close at 8 p.m. E.T. Odds on prediction markets have slipped to around 66 percent, Goldman noted. The firm, however, put a   by the end of the year. That point was one of six observations that Goldman’s economic team put out Tuesday. Here are a few others:  Goldman thinks the corporate tax rate will be cut to 20 percent, but will not take effect until 2019. That would give companies a reason to move up capital expenditures, or capex. “Given the incentive for companies to pull forward deductible expenses into 2018, the one-year delay combined with full expensing of equipment capex would create a more important incentive for capex in 2018 than prior capex incentives enacted by Congress over the last 15 years.”  Goldman expects limits on interest expense to resemble the Senate’s plan. “Along with limits on the US share of worldwide interest expense and the indirect effects of a 20 percent rate and changes to taxation of foreign profits, companies will have a greater incentive to issue debt abroad than they do under current law.” “  by around 3 percentage points on average over the next ten years.”  “It is difficult to predict how and when states will adapt to the changes, but they have an incentive to do so. As the limitation of SALT deductibility is one of the largest sources of new revenue in the tax reform legislation, the proposed tax cut could turn out to be much larger than expected if states successfully adapt to the changes.” Apple’s purchase of Shazam  , got us to wondering: How acquisitive has Apple been? The answer? Not very, especially for a company with more than $250 billion in cash on its balance sheet and a market value within spitting distance of $1 trillion. Apple has disclosed only 11 acquisitions valued at $4.5 billion in its history, according to Thomson Reuters. To put that into perspective, we asked Thomson Reuters to pull some numbers. (One note on the data below, deal values include completed acquisitions and ones that are currently pending.) • The most acquisitive company? General Electric, which has made 1,206 acquisitions valued at $311 billion. Of course, G.E. has been around for more than a century, while Apple went public in 1980. So how does Apple compare with other tech companies? • Microsoft, Oracle, Cisco, HP and Intel each have made acquisitions valued at more than $50 billion. • Google’s parent, Alphabet, which was founded in 1998, has done 223 deals valued at $29 billion. Facebook? The social media giant, which has been around since 2004, has pulled the trigger on 65 deals with a value of $23 billion. • Apple, in fact, doesn’t even rank in the top 100 most acquisitive tech companies.  What have been the two most acquisitive tech companies? AOL — now a part of Verizon — and Broadcom. Both have been in the news lately. Broadcom made a $105 billion unsolicited offer for Qualcomm last month. Meanwhile, deals for Time Warner and Time Inc. has brought renewed attention to AOL’s $165 billion acquisition of Time Warner. So argues Andrew in  , citing the $1.5 billion in “synergies” — read, “cost-saving layoffs” — that the analysts think the chip maker could reap by buying Qualcomm. Based on Broadcom’s moves with previous takeovers, that could translate into about 5,400 jobs being cut. That runs contrary to what Broadcom’s C.E.O., Hock Tan, told President Trump at a news conference last month announcing that the company would   to the U.S. from Singapore. More from Andrew’s column: With   the $110 a share price that the company agreed to pay for NXP Semiconductors, the chip maker must now wage two deal battles at once. While some analysts and investors think Qualcomm might raise its bid for NXP as a way to deter Broadcom — which doesn’t want the NXP deal to become any more expensive — Qualcomm says that for now it’s sticking by its $110-a-share offer. Under the terms, Interstate will become the exclusive supplier of car batteries to Advance, one of the biggest auto parts sellers in the United States starting this spring. Interstate believes that the partnership could bolster its sales significantly, while Advance is hoping that a product alliance with a well-regarded parts maker would help stanch a 43 percent drop in its stock price over the past year.  The companies view this as a way to help guard against Amazon, which has been moving (among many, many product lines) into the aftermarket car parts business. From a statement by Scott Miller, Interstate’s C.E.O.:   , which is reckoning with e-commerce’s effect on inflation as it decides how quickly to raise interest rates. The department’s long-awaited study of the Senate Republicans’ proposed overhaul runs to about 489 words in length (including the title and footnotes) and, in the reckoning of even conservative commentators, does not actually detail the legislation’s economic effects.  Will the Treasury Department’s paper change any lawmaker’s mind? The NYT quoted a senior Senate aide who said that congressional Republicans were  , especially since it came out so close to the start of formal talks between House and Senate negotiators to reconcile their tax bills. • It’s “an odd way to analyze a tax bill,” said Scott Greenberg at the Tax Foundation. • “I don’t believe in magic,” said David Brockway, a staff director of the Joint Committee on Taxation during the Reagan administration. • Of a 1-percentage-point difference between the Treasury’s economic growth assumptions and that of the Congressional Budget Office, Mark Mazur, an economist who worked for the Obama administration,  , “It’s the equivalent of me being one foot taller and able to dunk a basketball.” • Small investors remain unhappy about the Senate bill’s “first-in-first-out” stock-selling rule. ( ) • Finance ministers from Europe’s largest economies wrote to the White House and the Treasury Department saying that tax cut plans would flout international agreements and undermine trade. ( ) • The proposed tax code changes could make the United States far less friendly than financial centers abroad like Hong Kong and London, write Cliff Asness and Michael Mendelson of the hedge fund AQR Capital Management. ( ) Comcast acknowledged publicly yesterday that  . “We never got the level of engagement needed to make a definitive offer,” the cable giant said in a statement. That clears the path for Disney to buy the Fox television and movie studios, stakes in the international broadcasters Sky and Star and other significant divisions. As we said yesterday, a deal could be struck this week, though it’s unclear whether an announcement would specify a role at Disney for James Murdoch. (If he does get one, it probably would involve overseeing the international broadcast businesses.) , formerly DealBook’s “Jack Flack” columnist. • The FT named Susan Fowler, the former Uber engineer whose blog post helped kick off a reckoning about sexual misconduct by men in the workplace, as its person of the year. ( ) • NFL Network suspended three analysts, including the Hall of Fame running back Marshall Faulk, after a former employee accused the men of sexually harassing and assaulting her. ( ) • Four women who had publicly accused Mr. Trump of sexual misconduct renewed their allegations publicly yesterday, demanding that Congress investigate the president’s actions. ( ) • Representative Blake Farenthold, Republican of Texas, is under scrutiny by the House Ethics Committee amid new allegations of a “frat house” atmosphere in his congressional office. ( ) • Mario Batali has stepped away from his restaurant empire after four women spoke with Eater about being groped and harassed by the celebrity chef. ( ,  ) • The New Yorker fired a prominent political journalist, Ryan Lizza, over what a representative called “improper sexual misconduct.” ( ) • The kind of sexual harassment training that is increasingly spreading in corporate America doesn’t work. ( ) That’s what Chamath Palihapitiya, the former Facebook executive turned venture capitalist said at   last month. Mr. Palihapitiya, who was a vice president of growth at the tech juggernaut, recommended that users take a “hard break” from social media. :  Kevin Roose of the NYT delved into the world of the   and found design that’s reminiscent of the 1990s — and growth prospects that appear similar to the post-dotcom-bust 2000s, since these companies are largely shut off from mainstream sources of funding. As Bitcoin continues its rocket-like ascent — “I don’t think anyone wants to go in and fight the trend,” a brokerage executive   — both the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Commodities Futures Trading Commission are   the frenzy over digital currency. Regulators have already tightened the reins on at least one digital currency matter: The food review app Munchee canceled its initial coin offering yesterday after the S.E.C. issued a warning about the forthcoming deal. • The gap between the futures price and the Bitcoin price has caused some concern. ( ) • Futures tied to Bitcoin are a big deal, but a bigger one would be the emergence of options, according to Andy Mukherjee. ( ) • Jessica Verrilli, the Twitter executive who oversaw the company’s mergers strategy, is leaving at the end of the year. ( ) • Mr. Trump has boasted of cutting more regulations than have other presidents, but government records tell a different story. ( ) • Jim Simons, the billionaire founder of Renaissance Technologies, shares the key to his investing success: He says he “never overrode the model.” ( ) • Carl Icahn has picked another board fight with Xerox. ( ) • SoftBank has agreed to invest another $500 million in the satellite broadband provider OneWeb, according to a person familiar with the matter. ( ) • The French IT services firm Atos is making an unsolicited bid to buy the smartcard maker Gemalto for about $5 billion, adding to a series of deals in the payments sector. ( ) • Westfield, the mall operator based in Australia, agreed to a takeover by the European property company Unibail-Rodamco, which valued it at $15.7 billion. ( ) • The boom in special-purpose acquisition companies is driven by huge sums of money trying to find a home and any half-decent return, which gives it all a peak-of-the-markets feel. ( ) • K.K.R. will replace Blackstone as the manager of a credit vehicle focused on small and medium companies with below-investment-grade credit ratings. ( ) • Steve Cohen’s Point72 Ventures has invested a fraction of his $13 billion fortune in early-stage fintech start-ups, but he’s not looking for VC returns. ( ) • Apple made less than $100 million by selling stock in Dec. 1980. Massachusetts regulators wouldn’t let individual investors touch it because they deemed it “too risky” under rules “aimed at wedding out highfliers that don’t have solid earnings foundations.” ( ) • HSBC said that American authorities were preparing to dismiss criminal charges against the bank, five years after it reached an agreement to avoid prosecution related to lapses in its money-laundering controls. ( )
 Good day to you, Farhad! Are you enjoying holiday party season? I haven’t gone to any so far, but I plan on making up for that by going to three in a row this evening. Is there such a thing as “nog overdose”?  Mike, nobody’s buying your act. “Nog overdose” is practically your middle name at this time of the year. Please nog responsibly.  Right, well, I’ll be sure to pop a few Lactaids before my magical journey this evening. (Also, to be clear, eggnog is disgusting.) O.K., we should get into tech news this week! Let’s start with the obvious: net neutrality. On Thursday, the   for Americans, a sweeping move that basically the entire internet is mad about. Before the vote, researchers found that millions of the comments supporting the  . That did little to stop the agency from moving forward. Pai’s stance is to say it’s pro-competition to unravel regulations. Pretty much everyone in Silicon Valley says that that’s bogus and that consumers will lose, while big corporations like Comcast will have free rein to jack up prices for different types of internet services. I fall in the latter camp. Well, you’re right that everyone in Silicon Valley is against this repeal, but I think it’s interesting to note the shift in intensity. In the past, the tech giants, especially Google, took a much more forceful approach to defend such regulations. , net neutrality is now not very important to the giants. In fact, because it protects start-ups from large companies, the biggest tech companies might be better off under the new neutrality-free rules. And as it turns out, the  , as you and several of our colleagues reported this week. Well, yeah. As an aside, Pai really seems to want to be liked by people, going as far as to create a parody video with a supportive publication.  . So, what say you here? I assume you’re with me, though since you like to be contrarian on occasion perhaps you’re going to go for the pro-Pai argument?   . I don’t think the end of net neutrality will spark an immediate change, but instead it will be a gradual corporatization. Slowly, big internet and telecom companies will have more and more of a say over what we do online, and start-ups will face a tougher time. Over the long run, the internet will become more like cable TV — you’ll pay for different bundles of services.  Yes, well, I’m already starting to throw my spare change in a Mason jar labeled “Netflix fees” in my kitchen. Moving on, I wanted to get into a slightly wonky, somewhat overlooked section of the internet: Patreon and the uproar among its creative community. If you aren’t familiar, Patreon is basically a payments platform used by artists and creative types, where they can charge or offer subscriptions to people for the types of things they produce. It ranges from writers and humorists to artists, journalists, crafty people, gamers — really whatever service you think people will pay to receive. It’s been growing, and has an indie flair to an ancient practice. (“Patrons” were quite common among artists hundreds of years ago.) Anyway, that whole community went nuts when Patreon abruptly changed its fee structure recently, imposing what many called undue fees and really messing up the economics for many artists who came to rely on the platform. It didn’t take long for the company to do an abrupt about-face and  . Who knows if that lasts?  I was watching this closely. I think the rise of Patreon is one of the most interesting things on the internet in the last couple of years. Internet ads have proved to be a terrible business model for most online content; by paying artists directly through services like Patreon, we’re seeing a much more vibrant community of podcasters, video makers and other artists online. But Patreon is also a business that has promised huge gains to its investors, so it’ll be interesting to see how it manages these two audiences. This time it seemed to go too far in the direction of its investors; perhaps now that it’s been burned, it’ll keep a closer eye on its indie artists.  Finally, let’s talk a little more about Bitcoin. I apologize in advance, since it’s pretty much the only thing finance that Twitter can think about these days. There’s even a ticker on CNBC for the price of Bitcoin now! Anyway, I   that revolves around the user interface of Coinbase, one of the most popular exchanges for buying Bitcoin and other digital currencies in the United States. Basically it went like this: The price of one Bitcoin is staggeringly high right now, somewhere around $17,000. My guess is that high price will make the two currencies that you can also buy in Coinbase — Ether and Litecoin — more attractive to casual consumers who really don’t know anything about digital currency except that it’s something that they could make money off of. Since the price of Ether and Litecoin are exponentially lower than Bitcoin at the moment, I predicted people would start buying those en masse. Sure enough, a day later,  . Yes, this is an extended way of saying, “Look how smart I am.” But also, it’s more: Do you think we’re basically creating artificial, overinflated value in these alternative currencies that really has no long-term staying power? And do we think a plethora of other, potentially scam alternative currencies may draft on the surging power of Bitcoin? (Hint: The answer is “yes.”)  Uh, yes. No, seriously, I think for once you have a point. There’s no earthly way that Litecoin becomes something people will use and consider valuable in the future. It’s obviously being run up by bubbly speculation. But Bitcoin? I think it’s got a chance. Anyway, have fun with your nog. See you!  See you later!
BERKELEY, Calif. — While the price of Bitcoin has dropped since Christmas, the virtual currency boom has shown no signs of cooling off in the more august precincts of America’s elite universities. Several top schools have added or are rushing to add classes about Bitcoin and the record-keeping technology that it introduced, known as the blockchain. Graduate-level classes this semester at Carnegie Mellon, Cornell, Duke, the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and the University of Maryland, among other places, illustrate the fascination with the technology across several academic fields, and the assumption that it will outlast the current speculative price bubble. “There was some gentle ribbing from my colleagues when I began giving talks on Bitcoin,” said David Yermack, a business and law professor at New York University who offered one of the first for-credit courses on the topic back in 2014. “But within a few months, I was being invited to Basel to talk with central bankers, and the joking from my colleagues stopped after that.” For a class this semester, Mr. Yermack originally booked a lecture hall that could fit 180 students, but he had to move the course to the largest lecture hall at N.Y.U. when enrollment kept going up. He now has 225 people signed up for the class. A course about virtual currencies created by a Princeton computer science professor, Arvind Narayanan, has been the fifth-most-popular class on Coursera, an online learning site. And last month at the University of California, Berkeley, students were lining the walls and sitting in the aisles for the first lecture of “Blockchain, Cryptoeconomics and the Future of Technology, Business and Law.” “This is a very precious opportunity for you to be able to sit in this class,” Dawn Song, a computer science professor, told the students. “There are a bazillion other students who are waiting for your spot.” Because developments in the field are moving so fast, the business school professor also teaching the class, Greg La Blanc, said the students would have to forgive the teachers if they got things wrong on occasion. “We aren’t waiting until we perfect it,” he said. “Don’t compare it to the perfect blockchain course. Compare it to having no blockchain course at all.” The 75 spots in the Berkeley class were divided evenly among the law school, the business school and the engineering department, and faculty from the three departments are teaching the course together. Ms. Song said she had around 100 students vying for the 25 places set aside for her department. The interest is a fueled by the rising price of virtual currencies over the last year. But they have created a host of issues that are worthy of study even apart from the price, professors in a variety of fields said. For lawyers, virtual currency projects have challenged traditional legal categories and definitions of what constitutes a security or a commodity. Regulators have been caught flat-footed as entrepreneurs have raised billions of dollars by selling virtual currencies without going through the traditional fund-raising channels, taking advantage of the legal fuzziness surrounding them. For economists and business school professors, Bitcoin and other digital tokens have raised questions about the nature of money. The first lecture in the Berkeley class, for example, considered the development of Bitcoin against the history of money. Several business school classes are also focusing on the decentralized methods of record keeping and decision making introduced by Bitcoin. Bitcoin is given credit for creating the first blockchain, a ledger of transactions that is updated by a network of computers without relying on any central company or government. Many big companies are now looking at how blockchains independent of Bitcoin might be used to do things like track music royalties or cargo containers with input from the many parties involved. “The students in my class are from every possible discipline,” said Campbell Harvey, a professor at Duke’s business school, who is teaching a class with 231 students this semester. “They understand that this is going to disrupt many different areas of business, and they want to be the disrupters, not the disruptees.” The computer scientists, meanwhile, are digging into the cryptography that virtual currencies use to secure their wallets and transaction data, as well as the design of the distributed computer networks that make blockchains possible. Last week, Stanford University hosted a   on the architecture and security of blockchain software, part of a new cottage industry in academic conferences and journals that have sprung up. “Let’s assume that tomorrow the price of Bitcoin drops down to $2,” said Nicolas Christin, a computer science professor at Carnegie Mellon, who is teaching a course on “Cryptocurrencies, Blockchains and Applications” this semester. “I still think it’s very cool from a technical standpoint.” Professors and students alike said that aside from the academic possibilities, familiarity with blockchain technology was becoming much more useful on the job market. The job site   has   that mention the blockchain, and there is now an entire site, Crypto Jobs List, dedicated to opportunities in the young industry. Vinny Tuminelli, a business school student sitting at the back of the Berkeley class, said that during an internship at Anheuser-Busch last summer, the blockchain had come up in an “innovation team” he was on. When he met with his supervisor more recently, the topic came up again. “My original understanding was that it was just thrown out there as a buzzword,” Mr. Tuminelli said. “But now it seems like it has some legs behind it, and people are putting real resources toward it.” Students appear to have caught on to the opportunity faster than their professors. Berkeley students have created a campus club that offers multiple courses on blockchain technology, taught by the students themselves. The director of M.I.T.’s Digital Currency Initiative, Neha Narula, said that when it didn’t schedule a course for this semester, she got constant requests from students. So she put one together and is now co-teaching it. “Students are just fascinated with this area,” she said. “They want to learn about it desperately.”
The price of Bitcoin has rocketed to new highs after a long battle over the rules of the software was resolved, at least temporarily. The price of a Bitcoin has risen nearly 50 percent since the beginning of the month, raising the total value of all Bitcoins to more than $70 billion. On Monday afternoon, Bitcoin was trading above $4,290, an increase of about 7 percent. The price of Bitcoin, the virtual currency, has been climbing steadily for the last year as investors around the world have shown an interest in the unusual characteristics of its technology, which allows money to be held and moved on a network of computers without any central authority or bank involved. But the latest price increase occurred after the most important backers of the Bitcoin network agreed on a long-disputed update to the network’s software and rules. As Bitcoin has grown more popular, internal factions have been warring over the best way to update the software and allow more transactions to move through the system. A rule in the original software, released in 2009, limited the number of transactions that could move through the system to about five a second. In the last two years, an outspoken group of Bitcoin aficionados wanted to see the currency expand quickly to compete with Visa and PayPal. But that camp faced opposition from the so-called core developers, a few dozens programmers who maintain the basic Bitcoin software, generally on a volunteer basis. At the end of July, some of the people who wanted Bitcoin to expand quickly  , that can handle more frequent transactions. That new currency has attracted a small following, and retained a relatively stable value around $300. Most Bitcoin investors and companies, however, have stayed with the original Bitcoin network and the core developers who are working on it. The core developers have come up with their own solution to increase the number of transactions running through the system, known as Segregated Witness, or SegWit. While SegWit does not expand the network as quickly as Bitcoin Cash, it makes it easier to build services on top of the Bitcoin network, such as the so-called Lightning Network, that will allow for faster transactions. The biggest backers of the network agreed last week to proceed with SegWit, and it is that agreement, on scaling the network, that is the most obvious reason for the recent surge. “Scaling has been the major catalyst for the price rally,” said Charles Hayter, the founder of the data company CryptoCompare. “The scaling debate has certainly been holding the Bitcoin price back.” Many backers of the core developers have said that Bitcoin is more likely to be a base layer that other services are built atop. In this vision, Bitcoin would be more like gold in the old gold standard than like a payment network. The gold analogy and the scarcity of Bitcoin — the rules of the network dictate that only 21 million will ever be created — have led some investors to believe that the value of the currency will continue to rise as more people look to store their wealth in the system. This vision has caught particular fire in Japan and South Korea, which have accounted for an increasing proportion of all Bitcoin trading this year, taking over from China, which once was responsible for the highest trading volume. The introduction of SegWit does not resolve all of the arguments that have divided the Bitcoin community. Many large Bitcoin companies are still hoping to follow through with an agreement, reached in the spring, that would change the Bitcoin software in November to allow twice as many transactions to flow through the network. The core developers have made it clear in various forums that they do not plan to update the software in November to double the network capacity. When the November deadline is reached, some of the companies hoping to double the network capacity could again split off from the core developers. “There is a history of animosity between Bitcoin factions with vested interests, and these tensions could flare up again,” Mr. Hayter said. For now, though, Bitcoin has been rising steadily, and much faster than any of the competing virtual currencies that have cropped up in recent years. Earlier in the year, the prices of many other virtual currencies were rising faster than the price of Bitcoin,  , a virtual currency that has more programmable features than Bitcoin. The price of Ethereum has been rising this month, but more slowly than Bitcoin and it remains below the record high it reached in June. On Monday, the price stood around $300. Investors are buying Ethereum and Bitcoin to invest in so-called initial coin offerings, a new method of fund-raising in which entrepreneurs create and sell their own virtual currencies. Such offerings have   despite warnings from regulators that some of them may violate securities laws.
A growing number of virtual currency investors are worried that the prices of Bitcoin and other digital tokens have been artificially propped up by a widely used exchange called Bitfinex, which has a checkered history of hacks and opaque business practices. In December, Bitfinex was subpoenaed by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, a United States regulatory agency. The news, first reported by Bloomberg on Tuesday and confirmed by a source familiar with the subpoena but not allowed to publicly discuss an ongoing investigation, led to a sell-off in most virtual currencies. The people behind Bitfinex issue a virtual currency called Tether. Unlike most digitals tokens, every Tether is supposed to be backed by traditional money — the United States dollar. New Tether tokens are issued when investors give them dollars. One dollar is worth one token. Because of the credibility that comes with that tie to the dollar, Tether are often used to buy other virtual currencies like Bitcoin. In recent months, however, many investors have been raising alarm bells about Tether. Hundreds of millions of dollars worth of new Tether were created; almost always when the prices of other virtual currencies were heading down. The Tether were used on the Bitfinex exchange to make big purchases of Bitcoin and other tokens, helping push their prices back up, according to multiple analyses of data from Bitfinex. “This became more and more concerning, because every time the markets went down, you have seen the same thing happen,” said Joey Krug, the co-chief investment officer at Pantera Capital, which runs several virtual currency hedge funds. “It could mean that a lot of the rally over December and January might not have been real.” Long before news of the subpoena, Bitfinex, which is believed to host more trading than any other Bitcoin exchange in the world, had gained a reputation for a  , with European executives, offices in Asia and registration in the Caribbean. It is not yet clear what information the regulators are seeking. Technically, the Tether tokens are issued by a separate company (called Tether) that is owned and operated by the same people who run Bitfinex. The C.F.T.C. subpoenaed that company at the same time that it subpoenaed Bitfinex, according to a person familiar with the matter. Bitfinex has not commented on the subpoena or recent reports about Tether, and company officials did not respond to repeated requests for comment. In the past, the exchange’s executives and spokesman   that its customers are simply using Tether to buy virtual currencies as they might otherwise use United States dollars. Bitfinex had contracted with an American firm, Friedman, to audit its records and prove that its operation of Tether is above board. But last week,   with Friedman, after waiting months for it to finish the audit. That news generated more suspicion. “It’s a signal to the market of what those who have scrutinized the situation already believe: There is a problem here,” said Jill Carlson, a former trader at Goldman Sachs who now consults with a variety of virtual currency companies. “The dissolution of a relationship between an auditor and a company is very rarely a good sign that the company is behaving in accordance with market best practices.” The concern about Bitfinex is one of several issues that have helped depress the value of virtual currencies over the last month, after a roaring, yearlong rally. Regulators in several countries, like South Korea and the United States, have expressed concerns about manipulation and fraud, and hinted at a crackdown. In Japan, a large virtual currency exchange, Coincheck, was hacked in late January and lost nearly $500 million worth of a virtual currency known as NEM, raising questions about the relatively untested security practices of virtual currency exchanges. Still, Japan is one of the few places where virtual currency exchanges are overseen by regulators. Many of the largest virtual currency exchanges, including Bitfinex, operate with essentially no regulatory oversight. Bitfinex was hacked in 2015 and again in 2016, and Tether was hacked at the end of last year — with the combined losses totaling more than $100 million. The company shared few details about these hacks. But after the biggest theft, in 2016, it was cut off by Wells Fargo and its banks in Taiwan. The banking problems have made it hard for customers to get money in and out of Bitfinex, but traders have continued to use the exchange, in part because of Tether. Tether   last year from Friedman, the accounting firm, suggesting that it had bank accounts with dollars corresponding to all the Tether that had been issued. But the report was far from conclusive and Tether has never produced a real audit, leading to suspicions that Bitfinex may be printing virtual money backed by nothing. The Tether currency has been valuable to traders because it allows them to hold a stable token, tied to the value of the dollar, and move it quickly between virtual currency exchanges. But there is a downside. Because the identity of Tether holders is not always clear, the movement of the virtual token between exchanges — and across national borders — has raised concerns among lawyers about money laundering. The spread of Tether beyond Bitfinex has also spread the risk of its failure to other exchanges. Market analysts have grown particularly concerned with the rapid pace at which new Tether have been issued and their timing. In a single week in mid-January, $450 million new Tether were created, bringing the total amount of Tether to more than $2 billion. Several anonymous reports circulating among traders, including  , have pointed to data from Bitfinex itself, showing that the price of Bitcoin has frequently gone up soon after new Tether were created, generally as a result of big trades on Bitfinex. “This absolutely reeks of price manipulation,” a security researcher and market analyst, Tony Arcieri,   in mid-January. Many investors and traders have pushed back against that criticism, noting that smart traders simply may be looking to buy when the markets are down. “My personal biases make me inclined to believe that Bitfinex is not using Tether to manipulate the price of Bitcoin,” said Jeremy Gardner, a managing partner at the investment firm Ausum Ventures. “If they have attempted to do so, which would be deeply concerning, it’s hard to imagine that such fraudulent issuance at its current volume could single-handedly buoy the price of Bitcoin.” But Mr. Krug, at Pantera Capital, said that if Tether were really being used by investors, they would probably also want to buy new Tether when the markets were going up, which has not been the case. Also, they would not always want it in exact increments of $100 million, as has been the case. “After you see this enough times, you just start to wonder what’s really going on here,” Mr. Krug said. The Bitcoin community is sensitive to the possibility of price manipulation because a team of academics   suggesting that the price of Bitcoin was artificially inflated in 2013 by a single player operating on the largest exchange at the time, Mt. Gox. One of the authors of that paper, Tyler Moore, said it could be hard to tell if similar price manipulation were going on today, though he noted that a lack of transparency made it hard for anyone to be certain of anything. “Greater assurances are needed that the trades taking place are in fact legitimate and reflect buying and selling by independent actors,” said Mr. Moore, an assistant professor at the University of Tulsa. “Unless and until such oversight is implemented, we cannot trust the exchange rate to reflect only legitimate sources of supply and demand.”
MILAN — Stephen K. Bannon leaned back in an armchair opposite a copy of a painting by an Italian old master and explained his modest efforts to build a vast network of European populists to demolish the Continent’s political establishment. “All I’m trying to be,” he said, “is the infrastructure, globally, for the global populist movement.” Just that. Only months ago, Mr. Bannon was   and  , the alt-right news empire he helped make into a political force, for the sharp criticisms of President Trump’s children attributed to him in a book. “He’s lost his mind,” Mr. Trump   at the time. But now Mr. Bannon, the architect of Mr. Trump’s populist campaign message and the president’s former chief strategist, has returned with an international mission. On Saturday, he is set to headline the annual conference of France’s far-right National Front in the northern city of Lille, where he will be introduced by its leader, Marine Le Pen. People with knowledge of Mr. Bannon’s itinerary suggested that he might meet later in the weekend with the Hungarian prime minister,   but Mr. Bannon declined to say whether or not he would, only saying that he admired Mr. Orban as a “hero” and “the most significant guy on the scene right now.” In Zurich, Mr. Bannon says, he had a “fascinating” meeting on Tuesday with leaders of Germany’s far-right Alternative for Germany party. They included Alice Weidel and Beatrix von Storch, who recently   to a New Year’s Eve public service announcement by the German police that went out in various languages, including Arabic, by tweeting, “Are they seeking to appease the barbaric, Muslim, rapist hordes of men?” But it is Italy, where populist forces   by combining to win more than half the vote on Sunday, that Mr. Bannon has turned into his de facto headquarters. In a sprawling interview here, he declined to name whom he had met, other than to describe them as a broad array of politicians, operatives and investors. (A spokesman for  , the leader of the anti-immigrant League, said the two would have liked to have met, but did not. A spokesman for the anti-establishment  , which won a third of Italian votes, did not return a request for comment.) Aside from the occasional coffee at Campo de’ Fiori or photo-op at Piazza Navona, Mr. Bannon has been holed up in hotel rooms, taking meeting after meeting. In Rome, he stayed at the luxurious Raphael hotel, where  , the face of Italy’s corrupt establishment and mentor to Silvio Berlusconi, was pelted with coins in 1993 by an angry mob as he departed the political scene. In Milan, he sat in a room at the grand Principe di Savoia, opposite a copy of Titian’s   of the Duke of Mantua, a master of intrigue in Renaissance Italy and a longtime sufferer of syphilis, surrounded by red damask wallpaper. Jams were on a room service cart, and a copy of a book titled “Headlines All My Life” was on the desk. In both cities, he wore a blue and white striped button down over a polo shirt. In Rome the polo was orange. In Milan it was blue. He sipped sparkling water and described a grand vision for a global populist future. In the United States, Mr. Bannon said, he is working on a project to create a think tank to “weaponize” populist economic and social ideas. He sees that work spreading to Europe, where a proliferation of populist websites in the image of Breitbart News, either owned by him or others, will spread those ideas, under his guidance. As a final component, he wants to train an army of populist foot soldiers in the language and tools of social media. Mr. Bannon said that a common message he had received from populists throughout Europe was a desire to establish a media outlet for their views. “They see what Breitbart did and they want it in their own language,” said Mr. Bannon, who slipped into the present tense when talking about the website from which he recently separated. “That’s the key. Right now my sites are in English, they want one in their own language,” he said, calling that “phase two.” He could be forgiven the slip, as the site still seems to be in his thrall. (“Stephen K. Bannon took Zurich by storm Tuesday, addressing a sell-out crowd,” began   on the speech.) But Mr. Bannon, who said he was paying for the trip, said he was weighing whether to buy a name-brand outlet, like Newsweek or United Press International, or to start a new one, or to connect entrepreneurs with capital or invest himself. He imagined a scoop-driven and high-metabolism outlet “like Axios,” he said, referring to the buzzy Washington newsletter, but with a populist bent that would devour Europe’s sleepy legacy papers. “Whether I do it or a local entrepreneur does it,” he said, “there are going to be these populist nationalist news sites that pop up in the next year on line. That will only take these things to the next level.” With Europe more aggressively tackling the migration issue, Mr. Bannon was aiming to move the future battle of populism to other terrains. He said that the reason it was so important to get populist nationalist governments in place was to prepare for a coming great-powers clash with an axis of ancient Turkish, Persian and Chinese civilizations. “Elites can’t fight that fight,” he said. “Because people have to buy into it.” He is also increasingly interested in motivating people to fight media conglomerates like Facebook that monetize their data. And he has become fascinated with crypto currencies and how they can help populist movements, the subject of a speech he gave in Zurich this week. In preparation for the speech, organized by Die Weltwoche, a conservative Swiss magazine, Mr. Bannon said he visited the town of Zug, known as Crypto Valley for its bustling cryptocurrency industry. He was impressed. “If Brussels and the European Central Bank is worried about Italy going to the lira, their concerns should be that all these communities and states are going to crypto,” he said in Milan. In the meantime, he said, he admires Italy’s populist parties for already being on the technological cutting edge. The Five Star Movement, a web-based party that preaches direct, online democracy, and the League, the hard-right, formerly northern-based secessionist party, both dominated social media during the campaign. Often, their critics say, they did it with spurious and inflammatory fake news about migrants and crime. Many of those messages seemed propelled by automated bots rather than real supporters. “You can’t just have just all humans, I’m sure they have some bots,” Mr. Bannon said, unbothered. “The thing is that they are generating enthusiasm on shoestrings.” He said he hoped the two parties would eventually join forces — something not out of the question as the Italians try to form a government after an inconclusive election. But he spoke also almost sympathetically about Matteo Renzi, the now vanquished Italian leader who only years ago seemed to be the future of Italy and the European center-left. Mr. Renzi, he said, was “an object lesson to every rising politician in Europe,” and not a good one. The former prime minister, he said, had tried to play by Brussels’s rules when it came to the migration crisis, and instead the European Union allowed other countries to close their borders, leaving Italy to take the brunt of the burden. “They hung him out to dry,” he said. Mr. Bannon said Italian voters on Sunday also spurned Pope Francis, who has urged tolerance for migrants. “This vote was a rejection of the pope,” said Mr. Bannon, a Catholic who has nonetheless been a longtime critic of the pope’s politics. “The pope likes to see himself as a radical and an anti-establishment revolutionary for the little guy; the little guy put the pope in his place on Sunday.” He said he had intended to return to Rome to  , including the American cardinal  , but then France’s National Front extended its invitation. “They said, ‘Hey would you stay for the weekend?’ ” Mr. Bannon said. “ ‘All our people would love to hear you speak.’ ”
SAN FRANCISCO — As the price of Bitcoin has soared, the virtual currency has edged toward the mainstream. Square, the fast-growing payments company run by the Twitter co-founder Jack Dorsey, has begun selling Bitcoins to ordinary consumers, and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange will soon allow banks to trade on the value of Bitcoin. But if you want to see where the price of Bitcoin is actually determined in round-the-clock bidding, you have to go to a number of unregulated exchanges that often fly in the face of American and European laws. These days, no exchange is bigger than Bitfinex, an opaque operation that provides no information on its website about where it is or who operates the company. Bitfinex, which is officially incorporated in the British Virgin Islands, has been fined by regulators in the United States and cut off by American banks, and it has lost millions of dollars of customer money in two separate hackings, leading critics to question whether it even has the money it claims to hold. In the latest blow, on Tuesday, an alternative virtual currency that is owned and operated by the same people as Bitfinex, known as Tether, announced that it had been hacked and lost around $30 million worth of digital tokens. None of that has been enough to stop customers from pumping billions of dollars worth of virtual currency trades through Bitfinex in recent weeks — on some days, the exchange claimed to be doing more trades, by dollar value, than some stock exchanges in the United States. Even many people who believe in virtual currencies worry that the mixture of loose controls and booming trading at the world’s largest exchange is likely to cause trouble for all the investors piling into virtual currencies, even those who don’t go near Bitfinex. “I’m worried about the systemic risk that this centralized company poses, and I’m worried that if they go down, they will take down the space with them,” said Emin Gün Sirer, an associate professor of computer science at Cornell University, who has a track record of   in the growing virtual currency industry. The chief executive of Bitfinex and Tether, Jan Ludovicus van der Velde, said in an email on Tuesday that “the financial position of the company has never been stronger.” Concerns over virtual currency exchanges are nothing new. The first and largest Bitcoin exchange, Mt. Gox, collapsed in 2014 after losing $500 million of customer money to hackers. This year, law enforcement took down another large Bitcoin exchange, BTC-E, which was accused of being a way station for many of the Bitcoin flowing through online black markets and ransomware attacks. Regulators in the United States and a few other countries have tried to tame the business, and the largest exchanges in the United States and Japan are now under official oversight. Those regulated exchanges, though, are dwarfed by unregulated ones like Bitfinex and several that have popped up in South Korea, where regulators have been slow to act. The liquid nature of the Bitcoin markets, flowing around national borders and laws, is a product of the virtual currency’s unusual structure. Bitcoin is stored and moved through a decentralized network of computers that are not under the control of any single company or government. This structure means that the virtual currency continues to be an easy target for people who want to manipulate its price or use it to launder money. “Unregulated, unregistered exchanges are a very big concern for the industry and the community broadly,” said Kathryn Haun, a former federal prosecutor who is on the board of the American virtual currency company Coinbase. The most frequent face of Bitfinex is its chief strategy officer, Phil Potter. Mr. Potter worked for Morgan Stanley in New York in the 1990s but lost his job after   about his $3,500 Rolex, his opulent lifestyle and his aggressive tactics for making money. Mr. Potter, 45, runs Bitfinex alongside Mr. Van der Velde, a Dutch-speaking man living in Hong Kong, and Giancarlo Devasini, an Italian man who lives on the French Riviera, according to company filings in Hong Kong. The company lost 1,500 Bitcoin, worth around $400,000, to a hacker in 2015. But the most damaging incident happened in August 2016 when a thief got almost 120,000 Bitcoin, worth around $75 million at the time. The company spread out the losses to all customers — even those who were not holding Bitcoin at the time of the hacking — by forcing customers to take a 36 percent haircut or loss on any money at the exchange. The lack of detail that Bitfinex provided about the hacking drove away some large customers like Arthur Hayes, the founder of Bitmex, a Hong Kong-based virtual currency exchange. “There are so many questions about them,” Mr. Hayes said. “All of this could be easily rectified by just showing all the figures.” Mr. van der Velde said the company had “been as public and transparent as possible about the security incident in August 2016 given the ongoing criminal investigations.” Banks have also been put off by Bitfinex’s operations. Wells Fargo said this year that it would no longer move money from Bitfinex accounts. Shortly after, Bitfinex said its main banks in Taiwan were shutting it off. Since then, it has moved between a series of banks in other countries, without telling customers where the exchange’s money is stored. But nothing has drawn more criticism than the operation of Tether, a virtual currency that is supposed to be tied — or tethered — to the value of a dollar. Customers can buy Tether coins on Bitfinex and then transfer them to other virtual currency exchanges, providing a way to move dollars between countries without going through banks. Tether has also become a very popular way to buy Bitcoin. In recent weeks, a few hundred millions dollars’ worth of Tether has changed hands on a daily basis across several exchanges, according to   on CoinMarketCap.com. Tether and Bitfinex have insisted that the two operations are separate. But  , which were made public this month, show that Appleby, an offshore law firm, helped Mr. Potter and Mr. Devasini, the Bitfinex operators, set up Tether in the British Virgin Islands in late 2014. One persistent online critic, going by the screen name Bitfinex’ed, has written   arguing that Bitfinex appears to be creating Tether coins out of thin air and then using them to buy Bitcoin and push the price up. Tether and Bitfinex have countered this criticism in statements on the companies’ websites and promised that every Tether is backed up by a dollar sitting in a bank account. In September, the companies   intended to prove that Tether is financed with real money. Lewis Cohen, a lawyer at the law firm Hogan Lovells who advises many virtual currency projects, said the document, because of the careful way it was phrased, did not prove that the Tether coins are backed by dollars. Even if they are, he said, Tether and Bitfinex appear to be violating laws in the United States and Europe that govern investments like Tether, which has qualities very similar to a money market mutual fund. “There are a long list of reasons that you don’t want to deal with them,” Mr. Cohen said of Tether. On Tuesday, Tether announced that an “external attacker” had taken $30 million worth of Tether from the company’s online wallets. The company said it was working to recover the coins.
Bitcoin action is now available without the Bitcoin. The Chicago Board Options Exchange started offering futures on the cryptocurrency late on Sunday. The new contracts open fresh avenues for trading, but for now they have little utility beyond speculation. The one-month future   from the open to $18,700 before trading below $18,000 Monday morning. With the price of Bitcoin rising two-thirds this month alone, that seems fairly sedate. Volume was roughly $50 million, Breakingviews calculates, less than 0.5 percent of actual Bitcoin trading in the previous 24 hours, according to Coinmarketcap.com. Futures have real-world value, allowing producers or consumers of a commodity to insure themselves against price movements, or helping investors to hedge their positions. In the Bitcoin world, there are so-called miners with investments in processing power and hefty costs like electricity who could use the contracts this way, but that’s about it. And with Bitcoin soaring more than 15-fold in 2017 to well over $16,000 early Monday, selling Bitcoin futures short is likely to be prohibitively expensive. Most market players will be cautious until the contracts settle down. There are, though, other reasons for concern. Bitcoin futures aren’t perfect proxies for the real thing, partly because they will be settled in dollars, not the cryptocurrency, which trades at different dollar prices in different places. Chicago Board Options Exchange settlements, for example, will be based on Bitcoin’s value on the Gemini Exchange, established by Cameron and Tyler Winklevoss of Facebook fame. CME Group’s Bitcoin futures, starting next weekend, will settle at a reference price drawn from multiple exchanges. One opportunity could be arbitrage, exploiting the pricing discrepancies. But it will take time for any patterns to emerge. Proponents reckon that the entry of two big, regulated United States exchanges bolsters the legitimacy of Bitcoin. It certainly broadens the universe of possible investors, and it invites the creation of new exchange-traded funds, which need a liquid benchmark to track. That would bring Bitcoin exposure to retail investors. Yet the Futures Industry Association, which represents clearinghouses and big banks, is apprehensive about the light regulatory scrutiny so far. And making the contracts cash-settled means the exchanges — and their customers — can now ride the Bitcoin bandwagon without touching the cryptocurrency at all.
WASHINGTON — The Trump administration announced on Monday that it was broadening sanctions against Venezuela, blacklisting four government officials and banning a digital currency President Nicolás Maduro created last month to circumvent financial sanctions on his economically strapped nation. The White House said the new measures were intended to send a message to Mr. Maduro’s government, which it has accused of corruption and repression, that the United States remains focused on the economic devastation in Venezuela, and holds the president and his associates directly responsible for creating the conditions there. The nation is in the throes of food and medicine shortages and a collapse of the health system as well as other government services, circumstances that have prompted hundreds of thousands of Venezuelans to flee. The intensification of sanctions comes as President Trump prepares to attend the Summit of the Americas next month in Lima, Peru, where the crisis in Venezuela will be a central issue. Vice President Mike Pence is scheduled to deliver a speech this week at the Organization of American States in Washington, where he plans to call out “the Maduro regime’s lawless actions,” according to a spokeswoman, and urge swift action to address the humanitarian situation and restore political order. The sanctions also come just two months before Mr. Maduro is to stand for re-election in a race he is expected to win given his control of Venezuela’s political and judicial machinery. The United States is among the countries that have declared they will not recognize the results. “President Maduro decimated the Venezuelan economy and spurred a humanitarian crisis,” Steven Mnuchin, the Treasury secretary, said in a statement announcing the newly blacklisted individuals. Mr. Mnuchin cited the individuals for “economic mismanagement and corruption” and blasted an attempt by the Maduro government to evade sanctions  . “Instead of correcting course to avoid further catastrophe, the Maduro regime is attempting to circumvent sanctions through the Petro digital currency — a ploy that Venezuela’s democratically elected National Assembly has denounced and Treasury has cautioned U.S. persons to avoid,” he said. The sanctions brought an angry response from Mr. Maduro, who issued a statement that the Venezuelan Embassy in Washington “rejects and strongly condemns the alleged and unilateral new sanctions of the Donald Trump regime against the Venezuelan people and our financial and economic system.” The administration’s announcement came a few hours after Mr. Trump signed an executive order barring the use of any digital currency issued by the Maduro government since Jan. 9. Mr. Maduro announced last month that his country had begun a presale of the Petro, backed by the nation’s vast petroleum reserves. The Venezuelan government called the launch a response to a financial crisis that has prompted a profound devaluation of the national currency, the bolívar, and quadruple-digit inflation. Senior Trump administration officials said the sanctions were meant to apply to the Petro or any other currency issued by or on behalf of Venezuela. One official said the Petro should be viewed as directly supporting the Maduro dictatorship and its attempts to undermine democratic order in Venezuela, calling it a scam to defraud international investors. The officials spoke on the condition of anonymity to describe the sanctions and their purpose. Whether the sanctions will achieve their intended effect of destabilizing the government remains to be seen, but some experts cautioned that the moves could actually hurt Venezuelans in the short term. “It’s part of a pattern of escalating sanctions on the Maduro government in advance of the presidential elections later this year, with the idea that that will produce the collapse of the government,” said Cynthia J. Arnson, the director of the Wilson Center’s Latin American Program. “But it’s usually the case that governments dig in their heels all the more when they feel that sanctions are aimed at removing them from power instead of producing a change in behavior, and what this will do is certainly increase the suffering and the shortages that are happening now.” Mr. Mnuchin, who is attending a gathering of finance ministers in Argentina, said he and his counterparts had discussed “how to achieve our shared objectives of restoring Venezuelan democracy, combating the kleptocracy of the Maduro regime, and responding to the humanitarian crisis caused by Maduro’s economic policy.” “We urge Maduro to distribute humanitarian aid and stop blocking much-needed foreign assistance to the suffering people of Venezuela, and we again call upon the Venezuelan military to respect and uphold the Constitution,” Mr. Mnuchin said. The four people sanctioned by the Treasury Department on Monday are current and former officials who played key roles in Mr. Maduro’s government and political network. Américo Alex Mata García is a Venezuelan state bank director who allegedly solicited and funneled $35 million from Odebrecht, a Brazilian construction company involved in a worldwide corruption scandal, to Mr. Maduro’s presidential campaign in 2013, the department said. Willian Antonio Contreras heads the agency responsible for imposing price controls in Venezuela. Nelson Reinaldo Lepaje Salazar is the acting chief of the Office of the National Treasury of Venezuela, which has been the subject of previous corruption allegations, including that Mr. Maduro stole nearly $10 million from the agency. The department also designated Carlos Alberto Rotondaro Cova, the former president of the board of directors of the Venezuelan Institute of Social Security, the government agency in charge of providing patients with drugs for chronic conditions. The four will have any assets subject to United States jurisdiction frozen, and Americans are generally barred from engaging in financial transactions with the individuals. The sanctions announced on Monday notably did not include any restrictions on the oil sector in Venezuela, a drastic step that senior Trump administration officials say is still under consideration. Rex W. Tillerson, the departing secretary of state, has suggested that Mr. Trump is considering a ban on imports of Venezuelan crude to American refineries. That would be a crippling blow to the national oil company, Petróleos de Venezuela, or PDVSA, since the United States is its biggest customer and few refineries outside the United States have the capacity to process Venezuelan heavy crude. One Trump administration official said on Monday that the step required further study because it would have serious ramifications not only for the Maduro government, but for the people of Venezuela and the American economy. The official said the administration was exploring both broad and surgical sanctions against Venezuelan oil interests. Venezuela is the first country to issue its own digital currency, and the government appears to view the Petro as its best hope for reaching the international markets at a time when most investors have turned their back on the country. The Treasury Department had already warned that buying the Petro could “expose U.S. persons to legal risk.” The executive order, with its explicit ban, is likely to serve as a warning for other countries that have been looking at issuing virtual currencies to work around international sanctions. Russian government officials   for similar purposes, but have not moved ahead with the plan so far. Risa Grais-Targow, the director for Latin America at the Eurasia Group, a political risk analysis consultancy, said given that the Petro has not yielded significant benefits in Venezuela — the currency has not proved profitable despite Mr. Maduro’s grandiose claims, she said — the sanctions are unlikely to have a major economic impact. “It’s more symbolic,” Ms. Grais-Targow said of Monday’s measures. “The Trump administration’s desire here is to continue to gradually ratchet up sanctions on the Maduro government, and this is something that is lighter, maybe lower-hanging fruit as they consider sanctions on the oil sector that would be more politically controversial and produce a sharper economic bite,” both in Venezuela and in the United States.
SAN FRANCISCO — The air has been swiftly leaking out of the virtual currency bubble. A decline in virtual currency prices that began before Christmas has picked up pace in recent days as concern has grown that governments could crack down on the new industry. For a time on Wednesday, the price of Bitcoin dipped below $10,000 — taking it down to about half what it was at its peak last month. Other virtual currencies have been falling even faster. Ripple, which was briefly second in value after Bitcoin, has lost more than two-thirds of its value from the high it hit early this month. The falling prices have been serious enough to   for virtual currency investors in despair. The declines are likely to be particularly painful for people who took out debt to buy virtual currencies at high prices. Even the lows hit on Wednesday are still well up — some 1,000 percent — from where Bitcoin began 2017. But that is little comfort for the people who purchased late last year. One person on Reddit wrote about persuading family members to buy digital tokens late in 2017 and regretting it. “Fast forward to today,” the user, going by the screen name PM_ME_UR_ROOM_VIEW, wrote. “I opened my phone and I find a barrage of messages from them accusing me of scamming them and tricking them into crypto because they lost money, I tried to explain to them that this is normal and it will bounce back soon and it’s just a correction and don’t sell but they aren’t listening.” For skeptics of virtual currencies, the falling prices have provided some vindication. “Most people are buying Bitcoin, not because of a belief in its future as a global currency, but because they expect it to rise in value,” a note from economists at Capital Economics said on Wednesday. “Accordingly, it has all the hallmarks of a classic speculative bubble, which we expect to burst.” The pessimism in recent days has been fed by several reports that governments around the world were planning to tighten the reins on virtual currency trading. South Korean officials have said they were   that have popped up over the past year. South Korea has   throwing their savings into Bitcoin and other digital tokens. The Chinese government has already shut down exchanges in China, but it was   to be taking even further measures against new forms of online trading as well as Bitcoin mining operations in the country. Regulators in the United States have continued to crack down on  , which has been described as a Ponzi scheme by many in the industry. Bitcoin, which began in 2009, has been through these sorts of wild swings before. The price spiked in late 2013 to above $1,000, before moves by the Chinese government sent the price sliding. It was only last year that the price again recovered to the same levels. Since that recovery, an array of virtual currencies have been on a nearly uninterrupted tear. With Bitcoin, investors have been betting that it could be a new kind of asset, outside the control of any government, something like digital gold. Investors have also been putting money into newer virtual currencies like Ethereum and Ripple, which were designed to do more sophisticated types of transactions than Bitcoin. The excitement has been amplified by hedge funds that were created in the last year to invest in virtual currencies and by Wall Street institutions that have expressed an interest. But investments in these new tokens have far outstripped their real-world use in the types of transactions for which they are intended. Ripple, for example, is supposed to help financial institutions transfer money across international borders. But only a few institutions have said they are using the currency, known as XRP, for that purpose. Some longtime virtual currency investors have said that a major price pullback was necessary after the hype had gotten so far ahead of the reality. “This is the ecosystem purging the ‘easy money’ crowd that arrived in past couple months,” Spencer Bogart, a partner with the hedge fund Blockchain Capital, wrote on Twitter. Prominent individual investors echoed that sentiment. “I usually recommend people to buy during dips like these if they were hesitant to enter the market before because you can get in on a discount,” said James Spediacci, who with his brother Julian runs an investment club for virtual currency investors. Monica Quaintance, lead engineer at a company working on technology related to digital currencies and an organizer of events for women interested in them, said investors should expect price volatility until there is strong government regulation. “People want to know that if they make a lot of money from Bitcoin they’re going to be able to keep the money,” Ms. Quaintance said. But for those less enamored of the technology, the declines are viewed as the beginning of an even steeper fall. “The latest price falls suggest that the bubble is bursting — although with prices still ten times higher than a year ago, they have a lot further to fall yet,” Capital Economics wrote.
• Theranos shows private companies can be held to account t.oo • Was Bear a bad deal for JPMorgan? • The failed Qualcomm bid portends a new front in potential global trade wars. • How Boeing has the most to lose from the metals tariffs. • Bear Stearns was a decade ago. Could it happen again? • And R.I.P.  . The Securities and Exchange Commission on Wednesday  , the founder of Theranos, with fraud for raising money from investors on the back of false claims about the company’s blood-testing technology. One of Theranos’s main products, called a miniLab, could not perform all the tests the company said it could, the commission asserted. That, according to  , didn’t stop Theranos from claiming that it had a bright future ahead. Here are some of the things the commission says Theranos, a private company, did to pull the wool over investors’ eyes. There is an old adage that if it sounds too good to be true, it isn’t. The case filed by the Securities and Exchange Commission against Theranos and Elizabeth Holmes   about a claimed revolutionary method to conduct blood tests that turned out to be pure fiction. Ms. Holmes and the company settled the case, although the former president, Ramesh “Sunny” Balwani,  . She will pay a $500,000 penalty, return her shares in Theranos, and agreed to a ban on serving as an officer or director of a public company for 10 years. What makes this case interesting is that Theranos was one of the original unicorns, a private company with a value of more than $1 billion. We usually see the S.E.C. pursue charges against public companies and their executives, while private firms operate largely free from scrutiny – at least until they prepare for an I.P.O. The antifraud provisions of  , however, apply to any transaction in a security in which there is a misstatement of material fact. Thus, when Theranos raised millions of dollars by selling shares to hedge funds and venture capitalists, the false claims about the viability of its blood-testing labs ended up being a scheme to defraud. For Ms. Holmes, the settlement means that she will be cut off from raising money for any new venture for a long time. The complaint shows a systemic effort to deceive investors over a number of years, no doubt in a desperate hope that somehow the technology could be made to work. It is unlikely anyone in Silicon Valley or on Wall Street will trust her again. Mr. Kudlow,  , said that Mr. Trump offered him the job as director of the National Economic Council and that he immediately accepted. Mr. Kudlow told The Journal that an announcement could come as early as Thursday. Mark Hamrick,  ’s senior economic analyst: Ten year’s ago almost to the day, JPMorgan Chase acquired Bear Stearns, a troubled investment bank, for what looked like a steal. But Jamie Dimon, JPMorgan’s C.E.O.,   said   like it again, citing the high legal costs that came later. While we don’t have all the numbers necessary for a full accounting, there is much in the public domain that can help answer this question. And this information suggests that, while the Bear Stearns acquisition probably wasn’t as profitable as expected in March 2008, JPMorgan may still have benefited from it — even after taking into account the legal expenses.  The payouts were made mostly to settle allegations that Wall Street firms had stuffed loans into mortgage-backed bonds that did not meet agreed upon standards. How big were those costs? In his 2015 letter to shareholders, Mr. Dimon said that some 70 percent of JPMorgan’s nearly $19 billion in mortgage-related legal costs were related to Bear Stearns and Washington Mutual, the thrift JPMorgan also bought during the crisis. For the sake of argument, let’s assume that 35 percent of that $19 billion stemmed from Bear Stearns’ mortgages. The cost to JPMorgan then would be around $6.7 billion. That’s a lot, but when JPMorgan did the deal, it agreed to terms that gave it a lot of financial protection against nasty surprises like this. , far below the $11.8 billion of shareholders’ equity that Bear Stearns reported on its balance sheet at the end of 2007. This wide margin for error would have helped the bank absorb the $6 billion of merger-related costs that  in March 2008. True, JPMorgan almost certainly ended up marking down Bear Stearns’ riskier assets by more than expected in the months after the deal, when market conditions got even worse. But many of these assets could have recovered in the next few years as the financial system stabilized. After 2008, “principal transactions” at JPMorgan’s investment bank, the business line that included the performance of many of Bear Stearns’ assets,  , far more than the $4.4 billion that JPMorgan on its own generated in 2007. Let’s also not forget that the Federal Reserve took a large slug of the risk in the deal. The Fed made an extraordinary loan to a special entity that bought some $30 billion of Bear Stearns’ assets. According to Kate Kelly’s book on  , JPMorgan was reluctant to buy Bear Stearns without assistance from the Fed. JPMorgan did provide a $1.2 billion loan to the Fed’s entity, in theory exposing it to some losses on the assets. But in the end, that   for JPMorgan in 2012. The Bear Stearns deal also came with some straightforward positives. JPMorgan, for instance, got Bear Stearns’ leading prime brokerage unit, a business that provided brokerage services to hedge funds. That and other Bear Stearns operations were expected  , the bank’s executives said at the time. And, of course, JPMorgan scooped up Bear Stearns’ trophy tower in Midtown Manhattan. At the time of the deal, the building, at 383 Madison Ave., . According to the estimates of developers in the New York real estate market, the building is now worth at least $1.8 billion. Jun Ying, the former chief information officer of Equifax’s core United States consumer reporting division,   on Wednesday with insider trading for selling nearly $1 million in company stock after he learned about a major data breach in 2017 but before it was publicly announced. The commission’s   against Mr. Ying describes a step he took to estimate what he might lose on his Equifax stock. He took to the internet to find out what had happened to the shares of Experian, a rival credit bureau, after it revealed that hackers had breached its system. When he killed Broadcom’s pursuit of Qualcomm, President Trump put his administration in uncharted territory. The White House has made no secret of its concerns about Beijing, and seems to have been motivated by the prospect of Qualcomm losing its lead in 5G. Some now worry that this could be   in a potential global trade war. Here’s Jason Furman, a senior economic adviser in the Obama White House, talking to  : Of note: Qualcomm  . Broadcom   this morning. What’s next for Qualcomm: The chip maker’s   — petitioning the government for a national-security review of Broadcom’s bid — paid off handsomely. But now it   that it can fix its business. Peter Eavis’s take: National champions have to deliver. Will Qualcomm become less efficient under the government’s protection? If so, U.S. tax payers may feel taken advantage of. The industry largely ignored a short seller’s report on purported security flaws in AMD chips. ( ) President Trump announced his metals tariffs to protect American makers of aluminum and steel. But that could   — America’s top exporter, which employs nearly as many people as the U.S. steel and aluminum industries combined. More from Natalie Kitroeff of the NYT: And Mr. Trump’s attacks on Chinese metal production are in some ways  , as Beijing moves away from basic commodities.  Marco Rubio argues in an NYT Op-Ed that the U.S. should   to punish China for unfair trade practices. And our columnist Eduardo Porter explains the ways countries — and companies like Ford — have  . • With Mike Pompeo due to replace Rex Tillerson at the State Department, the future of the Iran nuclear deal is in doubt, and renewed sanctions are more likely. ( ) • The Democrat Conor Lamb   in the congressional special election in Pennsylvania; here’s the  . • Elizabeth Warren’s attacks on fellow Democrats who support a loosening of Dodd-Frank regulations are annoying   and  . • The Republican leader of the House Intelligence Committee’s inquiry into Russian electoral meddling   that Russia did not work to undermine Hillary Clinton. Representative Trey Gowdy  . Today is the 10-year anniversary of the investment bank, on the verge of bankruptcy,  . These days, however, there’s little appetite for an extraordinary government-assisted of a bailout of a troubled financial firm — and post-crisis regulations are meant to eliminate the need for one. Here’s what Rodge Cohen, Wall Street’s longtime favorite consigliere, told Justin Baer and Ryan Tracy of  : The problem: Wall Street’s new defenses haven’t been tested. And today’s algorithm-dominated markets give embattled firms far less time to work out their problems, as the WSJ points out. More trivia: Yesterday was the 10-year anniversary of David Solomon of Goldman Sachs  . Mr. Solomon is now the heir apparent at Goldman. A deregulation-minded businessman in the White House was supposed to be a huge positive for the M. & A. community. Yet investment banks have already  . And then consider: • The blocking of the Qualcomm bid has raised uncertainty over cross-border acquisitions. • The battle between the Justice Department and AT&T over the $85.4 billion takeover of Time Warner is heating up, with the first day of the trial set for Monday. As   in Bloomberg View, “One area where Donald Trump is more economically populist than I had expected is: He really does seem interested in blocking big mergers.” Announced deals so far this year are up 55 percent from the same time a year ago, according to Thomson Reuters. And the Republican tax overhaul has led other deal makers to feel better about opening their wallets. A   by EY found that 42 percent of respondents intended to use their tax savings on M.&A., and 73 percent said that they planned to accelerate their deal strategies this year. “At the end of the day, tax is not a driver of M. & A., but it certainly is a key element,” Bill Casey, EY’s Americas vice chair of transaction advisory services, told Michael. • China’s sovereign wealth fund has sold out of Blackstone, severing a longstanding relationship as tensions rise between the U.S. and China. ( ) • Elliott Management will use Prosperity Life, which it bought for just over $500 million, to strike more life insurance deals. ( ) • Two months after Jared Kushner joined the White House, Kushner Companies sold a stake in a Brooklyn building to a company controlled by the Japanese government. ( ) • Bill Ackman sold about $125 million worth of ADP shares as its stock rose. ( ) • Prince Alwaleed bin Talal sold his stake in the Four Seasons hotel in Damascus to a businessman linked to President Bashar al-Assad, unnamed sources said. ( ) • The Finnish government has acquired a stake in Nokia. ( ) • The real estate investment trust SL Green has been selling real estate assets into the private market at high values and using the proceeds to buy back its own shares at a discount. ( ) • HNA Group is selling its 25 percent stake in Hilton Grand Vacations. ( ) • K.K.R. is considering a sale or an I.P.O. for Cognita schools, which could be valued at about $2.8 billion, according to unnamed sources. ( ) The ad giant has joined Facebook in  . (Together the two companies account for most internet advertising.) One problem: “crypto-jacking,” in which scammers   of those who view their ads and use it to mine digital money. Google removed 130 million such ads last year.  Blythe Masters of Digital Asset Holdings   that gender diversity in the sector is even worse than in banking (she used to be at JPMorgan). And Coinbase has a  , which will simplify things for British customers. • U.N. human rights experts investigating the possible genocide in Myanmar said that hate speech  . The investor Roger McNamee, a Facebook shareholder,   about fighting misinformation. • YouTube is trying to combat misinformation by   and other “fact-based websites” on videos that promote conspiracy theories. Its announcement  . • Amazon is recalling about 260,000 AmazonBasics battery packs because of potential fire and chemical burn risks. ( ) • Walmart promises delivery groceries in 100 cities this year, using companies like Uber and Deliv. ( ) • Companies that use A.I. are trying to set ethical standards, but skeptics say they’re just trying to pre-empt regulation. ( ) • How Walmart and Google are challenging Amazon’s Audible. ( ) • G.M. is planning a pilot program letting car owners rent out their vehicles, unnamed sources said. ( ) • The architect Richard Meier has taken a six-month work leave after the NYT contacted him about accusations of sexual misconduct by five women. ( ) • Producers of “The Crown” conceded that Claire Foy, its Queen Elizabeth II, was paid less than Matt Smith, playing her husband. ( ) • Anti-harassment training videos are a booming business. ( ) •  , the former GlaxoSmithKline C.E.O., will head UnitedHealth’s Optum division, which focuses on pharmacy benefit management. ( ) •  , Tesla’s corporate treasurer and V.P. of finance, has left to become C.F.O. at another company, an unnamed source said. ( ) • Remington Outdoor, the gun maker that Cerberus spent more than a decade building into an industry giant, is planning to file for bankruptcy protection as early as March 18. ( ) • Dick’s Sporting Goods said its stance on guns  , but it faces  . • Former staffers for The Onion, which once published “Elon Musk Offering $1.2 Billion in Grants to Any Project That Promises to Make Him Feel Complete,” are working on a secret project financed by Mr. Musk. ( ) • A commodity investor backed by a Russian billionaire is stockpiling cobalt. ( ) • The political compromise that kept Angela Merkel in power could end Germany’s boom. ( ) • Britain’s M. & A. watchdog is celebrating its 50th birthday. ( ) • More than half the fresh fruit and almost a third of the fresh vegetables Americans buy now come from other countries. ( )
ATLANTA — The City of Atlanta’s 8,000 employees got the word on Tuesday that they had been waiting for: It was O.K. to turn their computers on. But as the city government’s desktops, hard drives and printers flickered back to life for the first time in five days, residents still could not pay their traffic tickets or water bills online, or report potholes or graffiti on a city website. Travelers at the world’s busiest airport still could not use the free Wi-Fi. Atlanta’s municipal government has been brought to its knees since Thursday morning by a ransomware attack — one of the most sustained and consequential cyberattacks ever mounted against a major American city. The digital extortion aimed at Atlanta, which security experts have linked to a shadowy hacking crew known for its careful selection of targets, laid bare once again the vulnerabilities of governments as they rely on computer networks for day-to-day operations. In a  , malicious software cripples a victim’s computer or network and blocks access to important data until a ransom is paid to unlock it. “We are dealing with a hostage situation,” Mayor Keisha Lance Bottoms said this week. The assault on Atlanta, the core of a metropolitan area of about six million people, represented a serious escalation from other recent cyberattacks on American cities, like one last year in Dallas where hackers gained the ability to   in the middle of the night. Part of what makes the attack on Atlanta so pernicious are the criminals behind it: A group that locks up its victims’ files with encryption, temporarily changes their file names to “I’m sorry” and gives the victims a week to pay up before the files are made permanently inaccessible. Threat researchers at Dell SecureWorks, the Atlanta-based security firm helping the city respond to the ransomware attack, identified the assailants as the SamSam hacking crew, one of the more prevalent and meticulous of the dozens of active ransomware attack groups. The SamSam group is known for choosing targets that are the most likely to accede to its high ransom demands — typically the Bitcoin equivalent of about $50,000 — and for finding and locking up the victims’ most valuable data. In Atlanta, where officials said the ransom demand amounted to about $51,000, the group left parts of the city’s network tied in knots. Some major systems were not affected, including those for 911 calls and control of wastewater treatment. But other arms of city government have been scrambled for days. The Atlanta Municipal Court has been unable to validate warrants. Police officers have been writing reports by hand. The city has stopped taking employment applications. Atlanta officials have disclosed few details about the episode or how it happened. They have urged vigilance and tried to reassure employees and residents that their personal information was not believed to have been compromised. Dell SecureWorks and Cisco Security, which are still working to restore the city’s systems, declined to comment on the attacks, citing client confidentiality. Ms. Bottoms, the mayor, has not said whether the city would pay the ransom. The SamSam group has been one of the more successful ransomware rings, experts said. It is believed to have extorted more than $1 million from some 30 target organizations in 2018 alone. It is not ideal to pay up, but in most cases, SamSam’s victims have said that they can more easily afford the $50,000 or so in ransom than the time and cost of restoring their locked data and compromised systems. In the past year, the group has taken to attacking hospitals, police departments and universities — targets with money but without the luxury of going off-line for days or weeks for restoration work. Investigators are not certain who the SamSam hackers are. Judging from the poor English in the group’s ransom notes, security researchers believe they are probably not native English speakers. But they cannot say for sure whether SamSam is a single group of cybercriminals or a loose hacking collective. Ransomware emerged in Eastern Europe in 2009, when cybercriminals started using malicious code to lock up unsuspecting users’ machines and then demanding 100 euros or similar sums to unlock them again. Over the past decade, dozens of online cybercriminal outfits — and even some nation states, including North Korea and Russia — have taken up similar tactics on a larger scale, inflicting digital paralysis on victims and demanding increasing amounts of money. Cybersecurity experts   that criminals made more than $1 billion from ransomware in 2016, according to the F.B.I. Then, last May, came the  : North Korean hackers went after tens of thousands of victims in more than 70 countries around the world, forcing Britain’s public health system to reject patients, paralyzing computers at Russia’s Interior Ministry, at FedEx in the United States, and at shipping lines and telecommunications companies across Europe. A month later, Russian state hackers deployed similar ransomware to   on the eve of the country’s independence day. That attack shut down automated teller machines in Kiev, froze government agencies and even forced workers at the Chernobyl nuclear power plant to monitor radiation levels manually. Collateral damage from that attack affected computers at Maersk, the Danish shipping conglomerate; at Merck, the American-based pharmaceutical giant; and even at businesses in Russia. Attempted ransomware attacks against local governments in the United States have become unnervingly common. A 2016   of chief information officers for jurisdictions across the country found that obtaining ransom was the most common purpose of cyberattacks on a city or county government, accounting for nearly one-third of all attacks. The survey, conducted by the International City/County Management Association and the University of Maryland, Baltimore County, also found that about one-quarter of local governments reported that they were experiencing attacks of one kind or another, successful or not, at least as often as once an hour. Yet less than half of the local governments surveyed said they had developed a formal cybersecurity policy, and only 34 percent said they had a written strategy to recover from breaches. Experts said government officials needed to be more aggressive about preventive measures, like training employees to spot and sidestep “phishing” attempts meant to trick them into opening the digital door for ransomware. “It’s going to be even more important that local governments look for the no-cost/low-cost, but start considering cybersecurity on the same level as public safety,” said David Jordan, the chief information security officer for Arlington County, Va. “A smart local government will have fire, police and cybersecurity at the same level.” Ms. Bottoms, who took office as mayor of Atlanta in January, acknowledged that shoring up the city’s digital defenses had not been a high priority before, but that now “it certainly has gone to the front of the line.” “As elected officials, it’s often quite easy for us to focus on the things that people see, because at the end of the day, our residents are our customers,” Ms. Bottoms said. “But we have to really make sure that we continue to focus on the things that people can’t see, and digital infrastructure is very important.” During the ransomware attack, local leaders have sometimes been able to do little but chuckle at a predicament that was forcing the city to turn the clock back decades. Asked on Monday how long the city might be able to get by doing its business strictly with ink and paper, Ms. Bottoms replied: “It was a sustainable model until we got computer systems. It worked for many years. And for some of our younger employees, it will be a nice exercise in good penmanship.” Security researchers trying to combat ransomware have noticed a pattern in SamSam’s attacks this year: Some of the biggest have occurred around the 20th of the month. Allan Liska, a senior intelligence analyst at Recorded Future who has been tracking the group, said in an interview that he believed that SamSam gains access to its victims’ systems and then waits for weeks before encrypting the victims’ data. That delay, Mr. Liska said, makes it harder for responders to figure out how the group was able to break in — and easier for SamSam’s hackers to strike twice. The Colorado Department of Transportation was able to restore its systems on its own after a SamSam attack, without paying SamSam a dime. But a week later, the hackers struck the department again, with new, more potent ransomware. “They are constantly learning from their mistakes, modifying their code and then launching the next round of attacks,” Mr. Liska said.
LONDON —  A growing number of internet companies are banning cryptocurrency advertising, fearing reputational damage if their users are duped or left penniless, even as regulators struggle to get to grips with the fast-emerging industry. Twitter on Tuesday began blocking crypto ads, becoming the latest internet giant to crack down after moves by Alphabet's Google  and Facebook earlier this year. Once restricted to small online chatrooms for early bitcoin backers, cryptocurrencies have since exploded in popularity and the industry has grown rapidly. Huge billboards promoting the latest coin hang over Tokyo's streets, ads touting crypto-trading dot the London underground network, and social media platforms are full of start-ups looking to raise capital through "initial coin offerings" (ICOs), as the selling of new virtual tokens is known. While regulators have stepped up their warnings about the risks to consumers of investing in cryptocurrencies and the potential for scams, in most jurisdictions they are only beginning to discuss publicly how they might regulate the industry, let alone frame advertising rules. Last week, the G20 group of nations failed to agree on specific regulatory action. So companies are taking matters into their own hands. "If internet companies were not already under pressure from regulators for their loose control of data privacy, they probably would not ban advertising from cryptos, which are still a gray area for many regulators," said Arnaud Masset, a crypto-currency analyst at Swissquote Bank. Snapchat in February started removing adverts for ICOs - which regulators say lack transparency and are susceptible to fraud - a spokesperson told Reuters. The company declined to comment on whether it would widen the ban to include individual cryptocurrencies, crypto-wallets and unregistered exchanges, as other technology giants have done. LinkedIn is blocking crypto-related ads, a spokesman said, although owner Microsoft does allow adverts on its other platforms. AROUND THE WORLD Across Asia, where the crypto frenzy is at its most feverish, firms are also restricting advertising. China outlawed cryptocurrency exchanges and ICOs last year. Chinese internet titans Baidu, Tencent, and Weibo followed suit by curbing ads shortly after. While Japan's government and regulators have embraced cryptocurrencies as a phenomenon that is here to stay, sentiment was hit by a $530 million cyber heist of an exchange in January. Prime time TV advertising subsequently fell, billboards on Tokyo's transport network were cut back and online companies are responding with changes to their advertising policies. Line, Japan's most popular social media site and messaging app, does not allow crypto-related advertising. The policy is designed to protect customers and avoid legal risks, it says. The country's financial watchdog, meanwhile, has asked the crypto industry's new self-regulatory body to draw up advertising rules. It has not stipulated what it wants to see but it is likely that Japanese exchanges will not be allowed to mention specific currencies when advertising, while TV promotions for ICOs could be banned altogether, a source familiar with the matter told Reuters. A spokesman for Yahoo Japan said the search engine was reviewing its policy in light of the changing environment. Russian search site Yandex said it had not carried crypto ads for "a long time". While online companies are prohibiting ads, there is less evidence that traditional advertising routes are under threat. London's metro system is plastered with advertising promoting crypto-trading. Transport for London did not respond to requests for comment about its policy on advertising. The slump in virtual currency prices this year has not rattled British punters lured in by adverts, however: A spokesman for Britain's Advertising Standards Authority said it had to date received fewer than 10 complaints about crypto ads. LITTLE IMPACT Cryptocurrencies, unlike most securities, do not confer ownership in the underlying business, which is partly why advertising is not currently governed in conjunction with financial authorities. Also, regulators are reluctant to rush to impose rules on cryptocurrencies as they examine the possible benefits of the Blockchain technology underpinning them. Many analysts expect the likes of Google and Facebook to loosen blanket bans once authorities provide guidance on how virtual currencies and the infrastructure around them will be treated. Christie Dennehy-Neil at the Internet Advertising Bureau, a British trade body, said large online platforms often introduce policies that take "a judgment more broadly than advertising" to protect their reputation. She said that the ideal case "would be for a product to be regulated and for there to be sector-specific rules for advertising". But without regulation in place, companies were sensible to act on their own accord, she added. Crypto supporters argue the bans will have little impact. In China, which tried to stamp out crypto trading through a crackdown last year, investing in the sector remains popular. Also, while promotions on Twitter and Facebook may appeal to new would-be buyers, investor conversations have shifted to other platforms and chatrooms where advertising is still permitted or where information on new coins is spread by word of mouth. The price of bitcoin <BTC=BTSP> fell heavily after the Facebook ads ban announcement, but the reaction to similar moves by Google and Twitter since then was muted. "Interest in cryptocurrency and ICOs remains undiminished even in China," said Zennon Kapron at Shanghai-based financial consultancy Kapronasia. "The decentralized nature of cryptocurrencies and investors means that it remains relatively straightforward to access information about, and invest." In an indication of the strength of that interest, while Line may not allow any related advertising, it is currently applying for a license in Japan to operate its own cryptocurrency exchange. (Additional reporting by Thomas Wilson in TOKYO, Maria Kiselyova and Polina Ivanova in MOSCOW and Dahee Kim in SEOUL; Editing by Sujata Rao and Hugh Lawson)
(Reuters) - The European Union's securities watchdog said it will ban 'binary' options sales to retail clients and restrict the sales of Contract for Differences (CFDs) to protect investors from significant losses, knocking shares in Britain's spreadbetters. The European Securities and Markets Authority (ESMA)said on Tuesday it was prohibiting the marketing, distribution and sale of binary options to retail investors, while its restrictions on CFDs would affect the marketing, sale and distribution of them. Binary options and CFDs are financial products that give an investor exposure to price movements in securities without actually owning the underlying assets such as a currency, commodity or stock. "ESMA, along with National Competent Authorities (NCAs), concluded that there exists a significant investor protection concern in relation to CFDs and binary options offered to retail investors," it said in a statement. "This is due to their complexity and lack of transparency." ESMA has said it has been concerned about how these inherently high-risk speculative products are offered to retail investors, potentially leading to significant losses and in December flagged plans to ban their sale, sending shares of spreadbetting firms tumbling. Analysis on trading in the EU showed 74-89 percent of retail accounts typically lose money on their investments, with average losses per client ranging from 1,600-29,000 euros (1,407-25,507 pounds), ESMA said. Shares in IG Group were down 3.2 percent, Plus500 up 3.3 percent, while CMC Markets stock was down 3.4 percent by 0942 GMT. (GRAPHIC - UK spread betters, CFD providers navigate regulation: https://reut.rs/2pJbD1m) IG, which was founded in 1974 as the world's first spread-betting firm, said it was "disappointed" that ESMA had imposed leverage restrictions, adding that this would risk pushing retail clients to providers based outside of the EU, resulting in poor client outcomes. It said, however, that while the measures announced by ESMA only relate to retail clients, IG's client base was dominated by sophisticated traders. IG expects its revenue in the 2019 financial year would be lower than that expected in 2018, primarily reflecting the impact of the regulatory changes in the UK and EU. Despite facing uncertainty from proposed regulation on these products, IG and its rivals have reported revenue growth recently as they signed up record numbers of customers, partly due to the boom in digital currencies such as bitcoin. Investec, which rates IG as a 'Buy', said the changes would imply a cut to 2019 revenue estimates of about 2 percent, with a 5 percent reduction in pretax profit. Liberum analysts expect downgrades to consensus estimates for IG's pretax profit of over 10 percent. CMC said binary products generated 2.1 million pounds ($2.97 million) of revenue from the UK and Europe in the first half of the financial year 2018, and a reduction in revenue would be immaterial for the group. However, the firm, which was founded by Chief Executive Peter Cruddas as a foreign exchange broker with a 10,000-pound investment in 1989, said margin changes were likely to impact on how clients trade, although at this stage it was not possible to quantify the impact. Plus500 has never offered binary options to its customers, and has always offered negative balance protection, a spokesman for the company told Reuters via email, adding Plus500 would issue a statement later on Tuesday. (Reporting by Noor Zainab Hussain and Marc Jones, Editing by Louise Heavens)
• So you want to be Deutsche Bank’s next C.E.O... • Investors are selling tech again. • Will Wall Street’s top regulator keep going after bad bankers? • More potential limits on gun sales • Facebook’s growing political troubles • Uber’s self-driving travails Imagine you are applying to be the C.E.O. of Deutsche Bank now that   a successor to John Cryan, the bank’s current chief. You survey the bank’s numbers to get a sense of the opportunities and challenges you’d face. Staring you in the face is the stock price, down nearly 30 percent this year. Ugly, but it could be a good entry point. It gives you time to try out some tough measures aimed at improving Deutsche Bank’s performance. Even if those moves produce near-term losses, the stock may not dive, given how far it’s already fallen. Then you look at the strength of Deutsche Bank’s capital, as expressed by a regulatory measure called the common equity tier 1 capital ratio. That’s at 14 percent, a solid-looking level, achieved in part by an €8 billion equity raise last year. In theory, you have something to spend on your chosen plans. But then you realize that Deutsche Bank’s share price is now back at the level at which the bank sold those shares. Shareholders must be livid. Not only that, Deutsche Bank’s stock market value is less than 40 percent of its net worth as stated on its balance sheet (its stock price is €11.30 and its book value per share is €30.16.) When a company trades at a hefty discount to its net worth, it either needs to raise a lot of new capital, which doesn’t seem to be the case at Deutsche Bank, or investors have serious doubts about the company’s business model. “So, I’ll rejig the bank’s business model,” you say to yourself, “that’s what new C.E.O.’s do!” You look for ways and stumble upon an unavoidable obstacle. Deutsche Bank is heavily dependent on Wall Street revenue, which can be far more unpredictable than revenue from other businesses. Last year, revenue from Deutsche Bank’s corporate and investment bank, which has struggled to keep up with its peers, accounted for 54 percent of the bank’s overall revenue. Compare that with JPMorgan Chase, whose investment bank accounted for a third of its revenue last year. And you are stuck with the Wall Street operations; no one wants to buy an investment bank with €1.2 trillion in assets. Maybe you can cut costs, another go-to tactic of an incoming C.E.O. Indeed, Deutsche Bank’s investment bank employees seem better paid than their counterparts at other firms. Going by a back of the envelope calculation, the unit’s compensation expense is equivalent to 44 percent of its revenue (excluding the interest the investment bank earns on its assets.) That’s higher than the 39 percent ratio for JPMorgan’s investment bank last year, and 41 percent for Goldman Sachs. Maybe you could slash the pay of bankers and traders. Sorry, Mr. Cryan  . The roller coaster ride in tech continues. The tech-heavy Nasdaq Composite tumbled nearly 3 percent, while the Dow Jones industrial average and the S.&P. 500 fell 1.4 percent and 1.7 percent. Tech companies in the S.&P. 500 tech sector slid 3.4 percent, the steepest decline among the index’s 11 main sectors. Chip makers were among the hardest hit on the day. Shares of Nvidia dropped 7.8 percent after it said it was halting tests on self-driving cars. Nvidia’s slide weighed on the shares of rival chip makers. Micron Technologies fell 5.7 percent, and AMD dropped 4.2 percent. But semiconductor companies were hardly the only ones getting pummeled. The famed FANG stocks, among the biggest gainers over the past year, tumbled Tuesday. Facebook, Amazon, Netflix and Google-parent Alphabet all finished down more than 4.5 percent. Tesla tumbled 8.2 percent on news that the National Transportation Safety Board   this year into a Tesla car crash. The stock is off nearly 20 percent since March 12 on increasing concerns that the electric-car maker will fall short of its production goals for the Model 3. Twitter dropped 12 percent after  it was shorting the social media company. Tuesday’s fall continued the recent volatility in American stocks, and specifically, the shares of tech companies. Enthusiasm about the technology sector had long propelled stock markets to new heights. But the specter of intensifying regulation of the industry has taken the sheen off. Last week tech stocks dragged the broader markets to their worst week in more than two years. The selling took a break on Monday as the S.&P. 500’s tech sector rose 4 percent pushing the index to its best day in almost three years. A vigorous   is taking place over who should become the next head of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, a powerful regulator on Wall Street’s front lines. Contenders for the post should address one question: What will you do to clean up the culture at banks? William C. Dudley, the outgoing president of the New York Fed, had made improving the culture at the firms he oversaw a key initiative of his tenure of at the institution. When Mr. Dudley took the helm in 2009, the financial crisis had left the New York Fed’s reputation as a regulator damaged. The institution had not done enough to address the severe weaknesses at the banks it oversaw, like  . Early on, Mr. Dudley commissioned a review of the New York Fed’s bank supervision department and then  . But in 2012, JPMorgan Chase, also overseen by the New York Fed, suffered huge trading losses in what was known as the London Whale scandal. The New York Fed was  . Following the embarrassing London Whale imbroglio, Mr. Dudley used his bully pulpit to focus on bankers’ ethics. Banks were stronger financially, but recent scandals showed that the culture of their firms still needed to improve, he observed. And if a cleanup didn’t occur, it may be a sign that they needed to be reduced in size, Mr. Dudley said in a 2014   that rattled Wall Street. The next big banking scandal — Wells Fargo’s widespread mistreatment of customers, which came to light in 2016 – strongly supported Mr. Dudley’s arguments. Wells Fargo was considered one of the most stable “too big to fail” banks, with its focus on plain vanilla lending, but in fact, its retail sales culture had degraded. The Fed earlier this year slapped relatively harsh   on the bank, including a limit on its size. The example of Wells Fargo is pertinent for John C. Williams, a   to replace Mr. Dudley. Mr. Williams is head of the San Francisco Fed, which oversees Wells Fargo. And there is still work to do to fulfill Mr. Dudley’s initiative. He proposed a “database of banker misconduct,” similar to the one for brokers, that would track a banker’s record on ethics and compliance. Banks could consult it before hiring. But this idea has not taken off. In   at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce on Monday, Mr. Dudley explained why: “Understandably, firms are concerned about legal risk if they share information about banker misconduct, but there may be ways to address these concerns through legislation.” Mr. Dudley had also pressed banks’ boards of directors to focus on ethical culture. On Monday, he said the boards had set up separate committees to focus on culture and conduct. “We’ve made part of the journey but I think more could be done,” Mr. Dudley said. Whether it will, depends on who steps into his shoes. The yield curve is near its flattest level since the financial crisis. The difference between the yields on the two-year and 10-year Treasury notes is at 0.52 percentage points, not far off its post-crisis low of 0.50 percentage points hit in January. That has some asking if the nine-year-old economic recovery is at risk. Since the end of World War II, no barometer has done a better job of predicting a recession than the yield curve. A flattening yield curve tends to indicate slowing economic growth in the near future. But what is more worrisome is if the yield curve goes beyond flattening and into outright inversion. The chances of a recession when the yield curve is flattening is just 20 percent, according to the calculations of Jim Paulsen, the chief investment strategist at the Leuthold Group. That jumps to 72 percent when the curve inverts. There is another reason not to be too concerned about a flattening yield curve, and it has to do with the actions of central banks around the world. The unprecedented stimulus from the Fed, Bank of Japan and E.C.B. have brought down long-term rates. That means the yield curve might not be the predictor it once was. A week after a self-driving Uber vehicle hit and killed a woman in Arizona, the fallout continues to spread. Nvidia on Tuesday n New Jersey, Santa Clara, Japan and Germany.    , using A.V. as an abbreviation for automated vehicles : Nvidia’s artificial intelligence platform is the autonomous industry’s leader. The chip maker has partnered with auto makers such as Volkswagen, Tesla and Audi. Around 320 firms - from software developers, automakers and their suppliers, sensor and mapping companies - use Nvidia’s platform,  . Nvidia is just the latest company to halt tests on self-driving cars in the wake of the accident in Arizona. Toyota, nuTonomy and Uber have all already done so. Citigroup became the biggest Wall Street firm thus far to take actions to limit gun sales. Others, like JPMorgan Chase, Bank of America, Visa and Mastercard, are studying options. (Bank of America and JPMorgan are   to Remington Outdoor, along with Wells Fargo, which is the N.R.A.’s bank of choice.) In  , Andrew suggests these new tactics: • Credit-card issuers and banks could give gun sellers who have announced restrictions on sales, like Walmart and Dick’s Sporting Goods, a special merchant category code. That could help financial firms decide with whom they want to do business. • Payment processors could geofence gun shows and enforce restrictions on transactions coming from those GPS coordinates. Here’s what Citi’s C.E.O., Mike Corbat, told Andrew about his firm’s actions: Where to begin? The company   from the Federal Trade Commission, the Senate Judiciary Committee, several state attorneys general and the watchdog group Common Cause. And Britain’s Parliament asked Mark Zuckerberg to testify ( ). Facebook’s stock overall is headed for its worst monthly performance in nearly five years. Yet the company’s shares recovered from another beating, closing up slightly yesterday. And just two analysts have “sell” ratings on the stock, compared to 44 who have “buy” ratings.  Did a Brexit campaign group violate election laws by  , a digital marketer with ties to Cambridge Analytica?  thinks that the big question is how many users value privacy more than having a Facebook account.   argues the Cambridge Analytica scandal could lead to “a full-scale personal and public reckoning that looks at the way we’ve used the internet for the last decade.” Bankers and deal lawyers may want to send some of their bonus to Amazon this year. M.&A. activity is running at record levels and concerns about the e-commerce giant have played a role in driving a number of the largest deals. The latest? GlaxoSmithKline’s   in their consumer health joint venture, which includes Sensodyne toothpaste, for $13 billion. Amazon may not have been the main reason, but its impact on the pricing of consumer health products likely played a role. Historically, such products  , but customers that keep coming back. Sales, though, are slowing, up just 3 percent over the past two years, half the rate of the previous two, according to Morgan Stanley. Price competition from online retailers like Amazon has some worried it could decelerate further. That partly helps explain why Novartis was willing to exit the business. So why was Glaxo willing to pay up for the business? 1) Starting this month Novartis  in the joint venture. Doing the deal now removes uncertainty. 2) The deal will allow its new chief executive to “get on with fixing GSK’s pharmaceutical division, which suffers from a relatively lackluster pipeline of new drugs,” writes  Shares of Glaxo have gained 6.3 percent. The S.&P. 500 rose 2.7 percent yesterday, its best day in nearly three years (as President Trump would be  ). Maybe it’s because, as Peter Eavis writes, the president’s threats of a trade war with China might be merely negotiating tactics. : According to this view, the tariff proposal was a jarring move partly aimed at getting China to see that the U.S. was serious about shifting trade terms. If China doesn’t show real signs that it will do more to open its markets, Mr. Trump could up the ante — roiling the markets again. But the White House’s more conciliatory tone yesterday after last week’s sell-off suggests there is not a strong desire for a full trade war. But remember that Beijing is firmly committed to  , while the U.S. is equally adamant about letting American companies  . (Even if G.M. and Ford, who have joint ventures with Chinese companies,   on U.S. car imports.) And Stephen Roach of Yale thinks that the U.S.-China trade deficit  .  The U.S. is near  , after winning concessions on steel exports and imports of U.S. cars.   is risky. Hedge funds are taking refuge in  . And the Western world’s economic institutions are being attacked  . • White House lawyers are examining whether more than $500 million of loans to Kushner Companies may have violated criminal laws or federal ethics regulations. ( ) • Democrats and progressive groups aren’t happy with the possibility of John C. Williams taking over the New York Fed. ( ) • Stormy Daniels’s interview with “60 Minutes” drew  , the program’s highest ratings in almost a decade. She’s suing President Trump’s personal attorney, Michael Cohen,  . • The White House’s criterion for judicial nominees: favor shrinking the federal government. ( ) The state’s governor, Doug Ducey, ordered Uber to   there after the death of a pedestrian in Tempe. Uber’s repeated problems — even after a change in leadership — have led the journalist Steven Hill to argue that   on the company, including caps on the number of vehicles and rules against subsidizing rides. • Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman and Masa Son of SoftBank met in New York. ( ) • The F.C.C. is another regulator wary of Huawei. ( ) • Google, Tesla and Qualcomm are banding together to challenge SoftBank’s ARM Holdings. ( ) • Bitcoin fell below $8,000 after Twitter banned some cryptocurrency ads. ( ) • A.I. is now coming for Hollywood special-effects producers. ( ) • IBM faces accusations of age discrimination. ( ) Third Point: Dan Loeb’s hedge fund has built a position in  , according to  , following Pershing Square Capital Management. They’re both betting that the industrial conglomerate will split up. Elliott: The firm has reportedly taken a stake in   and plans to push the company to  . D.E. Shaw: The hedge fund scored another win yesterday when   said that  . D.E. Shaw has been pressuring the retailer to expand sales more quickly and will have a say in choosing the new C.E.O. . Barington Capital: To settle a proxy fight, the embattled cosmetics company   gave the activist fund  . The fund has been pushing for a sale. • Meet HNA’s quiet power broker: Wang Wei, younger brother of the Chinese conglomerate’s chairman. ( ) • Akzo Nobel has reached a deal to sell its specialty chemicals unit to the Carlyle Group and GIC of Singapore for €10.1 billion, including debt, or $12.6 billion. ( ) • Brookfield Property Partners agreed to buy the 66 percent of GGP that it doesn’t already own for about $9.25 billion. ( ) •   is paying I.P.O.-level fees for its non-I.P.O.  , a cloud-based business software company, reportedly plans to go public. Both  , the maker of upscale coolers, and  , the Swiss airline catering business owned by HNA, have pulled their offerings. • Lightspeed Venture Partners is   for new funds. Lerer Hippeau is   of the embattled Binary Capital. • How Alibaba and Tencent became Asia’s biggest deal makers. ( ) • Why private equity hasn’t helped smaller grocery chains struggling against Walmart and Amazon. ( ) • Deutsche Bank is reportedly seeking to replace its C.E.O.,  , according to   and  . •  , the Coutts & Company banker accused of sexual harassment, has resigned. ( ) • JPMorgan Chase has named   as the co-head of its global diversified industrials investment banking team. ( ) • Shell Oil plans to name Gretchen Watkins, the former C.E.O. of Maersk Oil, as president and U.S. country chair. ( ) • Nickelodeon has cut ties with  , the producer of “iCarly” and “Kenan and Kel.” ( ) • Goldman Sachs began an investigation after a former employee wrote to Lloyd Blankfein saying that a group of colleagues attempted to rape her in 1994. ( ) • Goldman is deploying investment banking partners to hubs like Atlanta, Dallas, Seattle and Toronto. ( ) • The average Wall Street banker’s bonus last year was the highest since before the financial crisis. ( ) • How a tiny Latvian bank became a haven for the world’s dirty money. ( ) • Cisco Systems promised to donate $50 million over five years to fight homelessness in Santa Clara County, Calif. ( ) • Royal Dutch Shell has set out what it thinks it would take for the world to control climate change — including using far less oil by 2070. ( ) • G.M. said its South Korean unit would file for bankruptcy if a labor union rejected a restructuring plan. ( ) • Imagine if Gordon Gekko bought news empires. Heath Freeman is like that, only worse, writes Joe Nocera. ( )
SAN FRANCISCO — The virtual currency boom has gotten so heated that it is throwing the list of the world’s richest people into disarray. Consider what has happened to the founders of an upstart virtual currency known as Ripple, which has seen its value skyrocket in recent weeks. At one point on Thursday, Chris Larsen, a Ripple co-founder who is also the largest holder of Ripple tokens, was worth more than $59 billion,  . That would have briefly vaulted Mr. Larsen ahead of Facebook chief executive Mark Zuckerberg into fifth place on the Forbes list of the world’s richest people. Other top Ripple holders would have also zoomed up that list as the value of their tokens soared more than 100 percent during the last week — and more than 30,000 percent in the last year. The boom has turned Ripple into the second largest virtual currency, within striking distance of the original behemoth, Bitcoin. The explosion in Ripple’s value over the past month is the starkest illustration yet of how   has spilled over into a broader universe of virtual currencies. These coins — with names like Cardano, Stellar, and Iota — are generally new twists on the Bitcoin technology, which uses a decentralized network of volunteer computers to keep a record, known as a blockchain, of all transactions. While most of these currencies were worth nearly nothing a year ago, many are now responsible for creating billionaires — albeit with rapidly fluctuating fortunes. If this is a tulip fever, the fever has spread to chrysanthemums and poppies. Mr. Larsen’s soaring wealth sparked a few congratulatory messages on Twitter on Thursday, even if the value of Ripple — and his Forbes ranking — dropped later in the day. But his net worth, and the ballooning value of Ripple tokens, mostly drew comments about the irrationality of the virtual currency markets, which appear to be largely driven these days by the fear of missing out, or FOMO. “This is beyond insane,” said Jeremy Gardner, an investor who previously worked at the virtual currency hedge fund Blockchain Capital, which invested in Ripple. “There’s absolutely nothing driving this rally except rampant FOMO, misinformation, and speculation.” Ripple, whose tokens are known as XRP, is far from the only virtual currency being fueled by the hysteria. In 2017, there were 29 tokens — including Einsteinium and Byteball — that rose more than Bitcoin’s remarkable 1,600 percent jump, according to OnChainFx, a data provider. Nearly 40 virtual currencies are worth more than $1 billion — when all the outstanding tokens are counted at their current value — despite many of them not having been used in any sort of transaction other than speculative trading. Against this backdrop, Ripple could be considered a staid institution, though one with a colorful history. Ripple was invented in 2012 by Jed McCaleb, a programmer who had created Mt. Gox, a Bitcoin exchange that later  . Mr. McCaleb designed Ripple as a faster and more efficient version of Bitcoin, without the mining process that Bitcoin uses to distribute new coins and secure the network. Mr. Larsen joined Mr. McCaleb early on to create a company, also known as Ripple. The company helped develop an open source Ripple software that makes it possible to move money between digital wallets. The Ripple token is one of the currencies that can be transferred with the software. Mr. McCaleb later left Ripple in an acrimonious divorce, though he retained a sizable number of Ripple tokens. His holdings were worth around $20 billion at Thursday’s prices, putting him close to 40th on the Forbes list. (The actual list is only published once a year, and no big virtual currency holders have been officially added.) Mr. McCaleb has since created a competitor to Ripple, known as Stellar. Stellar has risen even faster than Ripple in recent weeks, with all outstanding Stellar tokens — known as Lumens — worth around $14 billion on Thursday, making it the seventh largest virtual currency. In contrast, all the outstanding Ripple tokens were worth $140 billion on Thursday, while all Bitcoin were worth $250 billion. Yet the fortunes of Mr. McCaleb and Mr. Larsen are not nearly as durable as those of other people on the Forbes list given that the value of virtual currencies fluctuates wildly. If Mr. Larsen wanted to access his wealth by selling Ripple tokens for dollars, it would likely drive down the value of Ripple tokens — and his riches. Mr. McCaleb and Mr. Larsen did not respond to questions about the recent price increases. Mr. Larsen was Ripple’s chief executive from 2012 until he stepped down last year to become the company’s executive chairman. During his tenure, Ripple focused on helping banks use its software to shift money between different foreign currencies, something that most banks currently do through a cumbersome process involving separate accounts in every country where they operate. Ripple has said it has signed up more than 100 banks to use the company’s technology, including American Express and Banco Santander. But banks do not need to use Ripple tokens for Ripple’s software to transfer dollars, euros and yen. That point appears to be lost on many small time investors who are buying Ripple tokens. Most of the buying and selling of Ripple tokens is happening in South Korea, according to data providers that track virtual currency exchanges, where   at a wide array of virtual currencies. Several virtual currency hedge fund investors said that they have talked to banks and heard about interest in Ripple’s software, but not its tokens. “I’m not aware of banks using or planning to use the XRP token at the scale of tens of billions of dollars necessary to support XRP’s valuation,” said Ari Paul, a co-founder of the hedge fund BlockTower Capital. Ripple has so far   is planning to use the Ripple token. Brad Garlinghouse, who took over as Ripple’s chief executive last year, said in an interview this week that other institutions are also using — or looking at using — XRP, but the company could not name them because of confidentiality agreements. Mr. Garlinghouse said he thought the rising value of Ripple tokens was justified, given the company’s growth and the size of the foreign currency markets that Ripple wants to tackle. “It’s clear that people increasingly understand that we are solving a very large problem,” he said. Ripple has attracted the ire of Bitcoin fans because Ripple has a greater degree of centralized authority in Mr. Garlinghouse’s company, even though the Ripple software is open source. Bitcoin and other virtual currencies were designed to operate without companies or governments in charge. But the company Ripple, if not the XRP token, has won a following among top figures in government and finance who are interested in bringing the ideas introduced by Bitcoin into the traditional financial system. The company’s board includes the former top financial regulator in New York state, Benjamin M. Lawsky, and Gene Sperling, who was the director of the National Economic Council under Presidents Barack Obama and Bill Clinton. Still, even virtual currency analysts who believe in Ripple’s software have said there is a big difference between Ripple the company being successful, and Ripple the token gaining enough traction to justify current prices. “An impossibly long list of things already needs to go right for XRP to become a reserve currency for banks,” Ryan Selkis, a virtual currency analyst,  . But, Mr. Selkis added, that doesn’t mean Ripple’s price won’t keep ascending. Why? “Because this is crypto, and everyone in the industry is now slinging crack crypto cocaine to retail addicts,” he wrote.
SAN FRANCISCO — A long-running civil war over the design of Bitcoin appears to be over for now, after one side in the fight acknowledged on Wednesday that it had not won sufficient support from other virtual currency backers. The camp that conceded had been hoping to double the number of transactions that could be run through the network that supports Bitcoin, in order to keep transactions cheap and fast. This expansion was vociferously opposed by many of the programmers working on the Bitcoin project, who worried that expanding the network quickly would make it easier for a company or government to exert influence over the decentralized system. The group pushing for expansion had planned to switch to a new version of the Bitcoin software next week, which would have created a split in the network and most likely wreaked havoc on the virtual currency. This planned split, though, was called off on Wednesday, after the companies proposing it failed to win significant support from the Bitcoin community. , the leaders of several of the largest Bitcoin companies said that “unfortunately, it is clear that we have not built sufficient consensus for a clean block size upgrade at this time.” The price of Bitcoin shot up immediately after the email went out, hitting a new high, above $7,800, before retreating. The price has been steadily climbing and is up nearly 1,000 percent over the last year. The rising price has attracted many new users, from places like Japan and South Korea and from big hedge funds, even as the authorities in places like China have cracked down on the currency. All of the new people seeking access to Bitcoin have run up against a limit on the number of transactions that can flow through the system every 10 minutes, which was put in place during Bitcoin’s early years. Because of the limit, the network can process only around five transactions a second. That has led to delays on the network and has pushed up the price of getting a Bitcoin transaction through. Companies that help process Bitcoin payments have been pushing to lift the limit on Bitcoin transactions for several years, arguing that it will be necessary if Bitcoin wants to compete with Visa or PayPal. The opposing camp has argued that quickly expanding the number of transactions flowing through the network would mean only large companies could track Bitcoin transactions, taking power away from individual users. The proponents of keeping the so-called blocks of Bitcoin transactions small said Bitcoin should be viewed more as digital gold: a secure place to keep money, even if it can’t be moved around as quickly and cheaply. Many of the programmers working on the basic Bitcoin software — the so-called core developers — said they would stop working on Bitcoin if the block size was increased. They also complained that the companies pushing through the block size increase were doing so without properly consulting the community. Leaders on both sides of the Bitcoin debate have complained about receiving death threats and hacking attacks, and some top developers have migrated toward other virtual currencies. In August, some of the most outspoken proponents of expanding Bitcoin created their own version, known as Bitcoin Cash, which can handle more transactions than traditional Bitcoin. The price of Bitcoin Cash has gone up since August, but it remains only a small fraction of the size of Bitcoin. On Wednesday, the companies that had been pushing for big blocks said they were calling off their plans in order to restore some measure of peace to the community. “Although we strongly believe in the need for a larger block size, there is something we believe is even more important: keeping the community together,” the email said. The announcement said that the companies still believed that an increase in the size of Bitcoin blocks would be necessary, but that they were willing to wait until the community agreed on a way to deal with the issue. The people opposed to quickly expanding the network say they still wanted to make it easier and cheaper to use Bitcoin. But they hope this will be made possible by new networks built on top of Bitcoin, keeping the Bitcoin network itself more secure and decentralized.
The Dropbox I.P.O. by the numbers. Will businesses reconsider their links to the N.R.A.? • Britain wants its cake in Brexit talks. • One reason the Treasury balked on Dodd-Frank’s bank resolution regime. • What happens now that China controls Anbang Insurance? • General Mills has bought the pet-food maker Blue Buffalo. The cloud storage company filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for an initial public offering. DropBox is the latest so-called unicorn, Silicon Valley startups with a private valuation of more than $1 billion, to test the public markets. Here are the details: Goldman Sachs, JPMorgan, Deutsche Bank, Allen & Co. BofA Merrill Lynch, RBC Capital, Jefferies, Macquarie Capital, Canaccord Genuity, JMP Securities, KeyBanc Capital and Piper Jaffray.  Nasdaq  Class B shares will have 10 times the voting power of Class common shares. The holders of Class B shares will continue to control the company after it goes public. Last summer the FTSE Russell and Standard & Poor’s said most newly public companies with dual or multi-class capital structures would not be included in their indexes.  Drew Houston, the co-founder and chief executive, has 24.4 percent of the voting power, while venture capital firm Sequoia Capital has 24.8 percent. Mr. Houston and Arash Ferdowsi, a co-founder, have a combined voting power of 34.3 percent, which is greater than 32.3 percent for the three outside investors listed in the offering document. Mr. Houston’s total pay last year was more than $110 million, including more $109 million in stock awards. His base salary was $400,000. Mr. Ferdowsi’s total compensation was $47.3 million.  In 2017, Dropbox lost $112 million but its cash flows totaled $330 million. The reasons for the difference: Dropbox had large noncash expenses, like stock compensation and depreciation and amortization. But revenue growth is slowing. Dropbox took in $1.1 billion of revenue in 2017, a 31 percent increase from $845 million in 2016. The company’s revenue surged by 40 percent in 2016. Dropbox will have to convince investors that it can add new paying users at a fast clip. It had 11 million paying users in 2017, up 25 percent from 2016. But that was a significantly slower pace than the 35 percent increase in 2016. In theory, Dropbox could squeeze more revenue out of each user, but it has not managed to do that in recent years. Revenue-per-user was $111.91 last year, not that different from $110.54 in 2016 and $113.54 in 2015.  Early investors in unicorns are obviously betting that their stake will be worth more when the company goes public. But Dropbox’s investors might be disappointed. The Wall Street Journal   that the offering will value Dropbox at $7 billion to $8 billion. That is below the implied $10 billion valuation for Dropbox when it raised money in 2014, the Journal reported. Shira Ovide at Bloomberg’s Gadfly uses a valuation for Box, a public company that stores and manages content in the cloud, as a guide for how much Dropbox might be worth on the stock market. Ms. Ovide’s conclusion is not encouraging. A series of companies has severed their relationship with the National Rifle Association after the school shooting in Parkland, Fla., following pressure from customers. Andrew highlighted   could limit the sale of guns in his column on Tuesday, causing debate on both sides and prompting  . On Thursday, the First National Bank of Omaha said   to issue an N.R.A.-branded Visa card. “Customer feedback has caused us to review our relationship with the N.R.A.,” the bank said. And Enterprise, which owns two other rental car brands,  , said it would stop offering a special discount for N.R.A. members. Groups   to dump gun stocks, with limited impact. Pension funds, including those for public-school teachers in at least a dozen states,  . And major money managers such as BlackRock and Vanguard are indirectly some of the biggest holders of gun stocks through exchange-traded funds. BlackRock says it can’t divest shares of a company in an index, but with $6 trillion under management, it is often effectively the biggest investor in such businesses. Lawmakers in New Jersey  to restrict the state’s public pensions from investing in the shares of gun manufacturers. BlackRock   to weapons makers “to understand their response” to the shootings. • Two gun safety groups are joining with Tom Steyer, the billionaire Democratic activist, in a drive to register high school students to vote. ( ) • President Trump embraced an N.R.A. position to arm some teachers. ( ) • Democratic governors from four northeastern states joined forces to restrict the movement of illegal guns and share information about residents barred from owning firearms. ( ) Top members of the British government met   to agree on what sort of relationship they want to have with the European Union after Britain leaves the bloc. The B.B.C.   of the meal that was served at the meeting, held at the official country retreat of Prime Minister Theresa May: A cream of sweetcorn soup with a ham hock croquette, a Guinness short rib of Dexter beef with onions and parsnip mash, and a lemon tart with raspberry sorbet and fresh raspberries. The menu is a reminder of how often food is used to help understand Brexit. The British government’s position seems to be that it wants to abide by some European Union rules that would be advantageous for trade, while discarding others. In the Brexit debate, Britain’s attempts to pick and choose is commonly described as  , and top officials of the European Union   they won’t let Britain take this approach. And for Britain to ask for   of cherries is likely just too much for the European Union to stomach. Why? The rationale for not letting Britain take an à la carte approach is that it allows the country  . Underpinning the European Union is the belief that the benefits of being more closely integrated are often obtained through compromises that all member countries must make. And to supporters of the bloc, Britain’s desire to opt in for some things and not others corrodes that community spirit. The cake and cherries rhetoric thrown around in the Brexit debate suggest there is little middle ground between the European Union and Britain. But an alternative way to view the tensions is that so much trade goes on between Britain and the bloc, and others ties are so deep, that both sides will ultimately strike a new relationship that retains much of the existing one. As analysts at Nomura wrote earlier this week: And the Sun newspaper is reporting that some in European Union may actually want to throw Britain a few cherries. The Sun’s  , who often has fresh insights from Brussels,   of a paper drafted by the Belgian government: President Donald Trump’s “America First” agenda seems to have met its match in the obscure world of international financial regulation. On Thursday,   the Treasury Department’s decision to retain the process for winding down a failing bank that was introduced under the Obama administration. A big reason the Treasury held back: The concerns of foreign regulators. As the Treasury’s  , an alternative to the Obama-era wind-down is a new form of bankruptcy for large financial firms, called Chapter 14. The Treasury favors using Chapter 14 where possible, but it opted to keep the current resolution mechanism. This disappointed Republicans who want Chapter 14 to replace the the current process. But foreign regulators pushed back against a bankruptcy-or-nothing approach. Specifically, the Treasury noted, foreign regulators have expressed doubts about whether they could coordinate effectively with a United States bankruptcy judge when winding down a big American bank that has large amounts of business overseas.  It could have told foreign governments that Chapter 14 judges would, in fact, be up to the task of handling international cases. Indeed, the Treasury in its paper said it expected the judges to have such competency: Instead, fearing higher costs for United States banks, the Treasury apparently gave the concerns of foreign regulators considerable weight and took an internationalist approach. The Chinese manufacturer has built up a $9 billion stake, or just under 10 percent, in the German automaker and parent of Mercedes-Benz. Geely also gained control of British sports-car maker Louts Cars last year. The government in Beijing   today of Anbang Insurance Group, the troubled Chinese company that owns the iconic New York hotel. • The Chinese insurance regulator said Anbang had violated regulations, putting into question its ability to pay claims. • A group that includes China’s central bank, its securities and banking regulators, the country’s foreign exchange regulator and other government agencies will oversee Anbang for a year. • The takeover could be extended if Anbang fails to complete an equity restructuring and resume operations. • The company’s former chairman was charged with  . Anbang came under scrutiny for its   and for   as it embarked on a period of frenzied deal making. But, “Anbang is too big to fail,” as an unnamed  . “Even though it has no real value, they will have to restructure it very carefully.” From Keith Bradsher and Alexandra Stevenson of the NYT: •   that the seizure is the boldest move yet in Beijing’s battle against financial excess, and the new precedent could be a worrying omen. • Anbang’s size and entanglements are comparable to Lehman Brothers or A.I.G. before the global financial crisis, and the insurer was always going to crash and burn if left untouched,  . Beijing’s intervention deserves a round of applause, she adds.   • Financial strains at another buyer, HNA, have prompted its subsidiary, the Irish aircraft leaser Avolon, to rewrite its bond documentation to try to reassure investors. ( ) • Fosun has acquired Lanvin, France’s oldest surviving couture house, after a fierce bidding war. ( ) The deal   and bolsters an area for General Mills, which owns brands including Cheerios, Lucky Charms and Yoplait, that has become increasingly popular: natural foods for pets The transaction is the latest as food makers, such as   and  , seek to acquire more organic and natural brands. • Standard Life Aberdeen has agreed to sell what was left of its insurance business to Phoenix Group for about $4.5 billion. ( ) • Swiss Re said it was still considering Softbank’s partnership approach. ( ) • In the wake of the new tax law, many business owners are asking: Will changing a company’s structure cut tax bills? ( ) • European banks with significant operations in the U.S. have seen multibillion dollar hits on their fourth-quarter results because of tax changes, but most say they expect to benefit from a lower rate in the future. ( ) • Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin believes policies introduced by the Trump administration will raise wages but not inflation. ( ) • Regulators are looking to ease rules that restrict the ability of companies to speak with investors before announcing plans for initial public offerings, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • Attorneys general in several states and a number of companies have filed lawsuits challenging the Federal Communications Commission’s repeal of net neutrality rules. ( ) • The U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services dropped language from its mission statement that characterized the country as a “a nation of immigrants.” ( ) • When he was working as President Trump’s campaign manager, Paul Manafort lied to banks to secure millions of dollars in loans as part of a long-running money laundering scheme, according to an indictment unsealed on Thursday in the investigation of Robert Mueller, the special counsel. ( ) Shares of the social media company  on Thursday after   that she no longer opened Snapchat. The tweet comes as Snap faces growing criticism from users about the redesign of its app. For tech companies like Snap and Twitter,  , celebrities “ought to be included as an intangible asset, to be written down when the celebrity stops being a customer — or stops being a celebrity.” Evan Spiegel, Snap’s chief executive, received $638 million in total compensation in 2017. ( ) • Altered images used by Russians to spread disinformation ahead of the 2016 U.S. election have exposed flaws in efforts by social media companies to stop such practices. ( ) • British authorities are examining changes to the taxation of technology companies, potentially leading to higher bills for internet giants like Facebook and Google. ( ) • Spotify’s listing will put pressure on the music-streaming company to to reduce its reliance on music labels. ( ) • Airbnb unveiled its Plus service, which features properties that are guaranteed to meet a 100-point quality checklist. ( ) • The lesson of the video-game company Rovio’s profit warning: Companies in high-risk industries with volatile earnings should think hard before going public. ( )  if a company goes for an initial coin offering? Here’s The Information’s Alfred Lee: • The crash in cryptocurrencies hasn’t dented the popularity of initial coin offerings. ( ) • Bitcoin is at $10,234.30. ( ) That’s the  . Separately, a group of Harvard graduates has a plan to bolster the  . The Treasury Department has   that would increase the likelihood that a failing bank would end up in bankruptcy rather than going through a resolution process overseen by the government. The tweak would still keep the emergency structures introduced as part of Dodd-Frank as an option. • Royal Bank of Scotland reported its first annual profit in a decade, after a grueling turnaround effort. That could make it easier for the British government to sell down its stake. ( ) • Behind John Flint’s bookish image lurks a ruthless streak that has helped him to rise to the role of chief executive at HSBC. ( ) • Dina Powell is talking to Goldman Sachs about returning to the firm in a global role, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • Kumar Galhotra, who has been running marketing and the Lincoln brand for Ford, will take over as head of North American operations after the abrupt departure of Raj Nair. ( ) • Hidden in rising bond yields, there could be good news for shareholders. ( ) • A federal judge criticized deferred prosecution agreements, which allow companies to avoid prosecution by paying a fine. ( ) • The Japanese airbag maker Takata reached a $60 million deal to settle consumer protection claims in the U.S. ( ) • Hewlett Packard Enterprise’s sales of storage and networking devices did well enough over the holiday quarter that it raised its annual profit targets. ( )
SAN FRANCISCO — Google is joining Facebook in banning advertising for Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies. Google, the largest provider of digital advertising on the internet,   that it plans to change its advertising policy for certain financial services, including cryptocurrencies, starting in June. The new restriction would apply both to space on Google’s platforms, like YouTube, and to third-party websites where Google sells advertising space. Facebook announced in January that   and other cryptocurrencies in order to stop misleading and deceptive promotions. Together, Google and Facebook account for the majority of advertising on the internet in terms of revenue. The short announcement on Google’s advertising policies page did not specify why Google planned to turn away that advertising. The company said the ban also applied to content related to cryptocurrencies “including but not limited to initial coin offerings, cryptocurrency exchanges, cryptocurrency wallets and cryptocurrency trading advice.” The frenzy around Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies has raised concerns about scammers using online advertisements to recruit potential marks enticed by  . Advertising for new virtual currencies exploded late last year when prices jumped. Some of that activity drew skepticism from regulators. Many start-ups sold their own custom virtual currencies in so-called  , which became a popular way to raise money to fund new software projects. Online advertising was a popular way to market the coins to new customers. In recent months, American regulators have made it clear that many of the coin offerings were most likely illegal. That has pushed down the prices of most virtual currencies and dampened the market for the ads. The restrictions on cryptocurrency advertising are similar to limits Google places on other forms of ads, including the promotion of counterfeit items or sexually explicit content.
Sometimes life shows you what absurd really is. This is one of those times. I’m talking about the phenomenon known as Bitcoin, a monetary system based on computation, complex algorithms and — let’s face it — communal delusion. You’ve probably heard about this funny money, digital tokens that can be sent securely from computer to computer, with records kept through an online accounting system known as blockchain. (My colleague  .) Millions of people now have accounts with Coinbase, the leading marketplace for digital currencies. And the rush into the market has helped push prices up. At the beginning of last year, you could pick up a Bitcoin (not literally, because they’re virtual, DUH) for about a thousand bucks. Its gyrations briefly brought its price near $20,000  according to  , which tracks such things. So what’s the problem? Let me answer that question with a question: What do you know about tulips? Yes, I am referring to the Dutch tulip craze back in the 17th century, and the speculative bubble that preceded the stock market crash of 1929, and the dot-com boom and crash that started in the late 1990s. Remember that last one, when learned analysts told us that advancing technology had eliminated the business cycle? Good times. No bubble is too big to burst. But hey, no regrets! Carpe Bitcoin! (But not literally.) Signs of a bubble seem to be everywhere in the Bitcoin world today.   Take the company called  , which makes, you know, tea. The price of its shares nearly doubled one day last month after it announced that it would change its name to “Long Blockchain Corp.” The company’s announcement claimed it would “pursue opportunities” in blockchain technology. Which makes it sound as if some of those teas they brew are highly caffeinated. Or that people are indulging in that other kind of Long Island Iced Tea. I called Christian Day, a professor at Syracuse University law school who has written about bubbles and panics. He said that comparing Bitcoin to the tulip craze was unfair to tulips: “The Dutch were not as crazy as they’ve been portrayed.” For one thing, the tulip bulbs were real, he said, and the hybrids that were the subject of speculation could be extremely valuable. What’s more, much of the trading was done by people who knew their horticulture. With the modern techno-tulips, he said, “I don’t think there’s anything there.” Some of the most skeptical folks are experts in cryptography and computer security. Steven Bellovin, an adept in computer security and a professor at Columbia University, told me that the technology is still too buggy, “a lab experiment that escaped into the wild.” It’s hard to trust a currency, he said, that’s “backed by the full faith and credit of software that has to be updated monthly.” Another security expert,  , “Cryptocurrency somehow combines everything we love about religious fanatics with everything we love about Ponzi schemes.” Ouch, currency guys. Well, you can afford some very expensive salves for those burns. For now. For another point of view — because I’m all about even-handedness, people! — I checked with Jim Harper, executive vice president of the Competitive Enterprise Institute. He served on the board of the Bitcoin Foundation and says the promise of Bitcoin is to create a payment system people can use anywhere in the world with privacy and security. He says its true value will be in commerce, not speculation. Well, that hasn’t happened yet; the price is too unstable. He said the currency will move beyond some of the early notorious uses in illegal commerce. As for the tulip comparisons, he joked, “Laugh all you want: My initial coin offering for cryptotulips will be worth billions!” I have discovered that the cryptocurrency revolution has reached my own family. My 22-year-old son told me that he had tried to buy a bit of a Bitcoin a few weeks ago and actually lost the money. It was his cash to spend, so there was no lecturing him about it. But I did ask why he had tried to invest in Bitcoin when he’s shown little interest in, say, mutual funds. He said that he had been unaware of the speculation in Bitcoin. Instead, he said, he was trying to use it for precisely what Mr. Harper says it will be best for: currency transactions with vendors who do not accept, for example, debit cards or PayPal. “What I was actually trying to do was buy porn,” he said patiently. “From Japan.” As I said, he’s a millennial, full of that generation’s bracing honesty. I’m glad he told me, but I sure don’t need to know more about the particular transaction, except for the clarifying fact that this vendor would take Bitcoin. He said he followed the instructions and created a “wallet” and went to an exchange and, after entering a great deal of personal information, bought a small fraction of a bitcoin — in fact, 0.005 of one, “the lowest quantity you could purchase” on the site. Then he found that he couldn’t figure out how to get to his money, grew frustrated and gave up. Well, I told him, losing 70 bucks is hardly ruinous; it’s more like the cost of an education. As we discussed the aborted transaction, he grabbed his laptop and took another look at the exchange site. “Oh,” he said. “I got in.” A calmer state of mind had led to success. The result? “I’ve got 0.00545679 Bitcoin,” he said, reading off the screen, “which is now worth … $96.” In the time the money had been locked up, it had jumped in value by about a third. “This has been a profitable evening!” Tell me about it. In sheer percentage terms, his little investment outperformed my 401(k)’s return for an entire year. Now I am trying to figure out how to cash in on all of this, though without buying Bitcoin myself. It’s exactly the kind of market that a fool like me might be tempted to rush into, but I’ve learned enough over the years to know that by the time I finally try the hot new thing, it is already cold and old. I am the maker of markets, the loser who helps to create winners. Instead, maybe I’ll just pull a Long Island Iced Tea and change my name to Blockchain Schwartz. It has a nice ring to it! But that’s just a start. I think I’ll write all of my articles from now on in an encrypted form and publish them via blockchain. This means, unfortunately, that no one will be able to read them. You may say that nobody can read your stuff anyway! You can be cruel, reader. But I say that the exclusivity and security built into my cryptoprose will make each article surge in value. Until I lose my passwords.
SAN FRANCISCO — Digital gold. The new tulip mania. A virtual currency. Whatever you want to call it, Bitcoin is on an extraordinary run, with the price of a single Bitcoin crossing $10,000 on some exchanges for the first time on Monday — less than two months after it crossed $5,000 for the first time. It is a bull market with few precedents in recent investing history. The Dow Jones industrial average, in its biggest year, 1915, went up 82 percent, or one-tenth as much as Bitcoin has gone up this year. Amazon’s red-hot stock is up only one-fifteenth as much as Bitcoin this year. The price has been pushed up by a   from around the world who think they have spotted a new kind of investment that could ultimately compete with gold as a place to store money outside the control of companies and governments. These mainstream investors have not just been the libertarian-minded programmers who helped Bitcoin survive its rocky first seven years, after the mysterious creator Satoshi Nakamoto released it in 2009. In recent months, trading among ordinary investors has taken off in . Seoul now has multiple storefronts where less technically adept people can buy and sell Bitcoin. It was on Korean exchanges where the price of Bitcoin first hit $10,000 on Monday. On American exchanges, the price was hovering around $9,700 on Monday. The skyrocketing price has brought forth no shortage of skeptics, from  , to Warren E. Buffett, who have variously called it a fraud, a bubble and a Ponzi scheme. The untethered price increase has, to a degree, proved their point, suggesting that this is an investment tied to few real-world fundamentals. But each time the skeptics have come forward, investors have defied them and bought more Bitcoins at higher prices. On Sunday, more than $5 billion was traded on Bitcoin exchanges, according to the data site Coinmarketcap.com — a greater volume than what many American stock exchanges see on a normal day. Believers in the Bitcoin technology, which is backed by a new kind of computer network, have argued that what we are seeing is the formation of a new asset class that could join stocks, bonds and physical commodities in the investment portfolios of ordinary people. If this is a new digital gold, today’s extraordinary prices still leave the total supply of Bitcoins in the world at a value that is only one-sixtieth of all the real gold in the world. But even aficionados have been dumbstruck by just how quickly the price has gone up in recent months. “While there has been a slew of bullish news for Bitcoin of late, the rapidity of the ascent to $10,000 has taken many of us by surprise,” said Chris Burniske, an investor and a co-author of the book “Cryptoassets.” Or as one trending comment on the Reddit social network put it: “This is officially madness. I am going to prepare myself for a large correction.”  to get a piece of the action. More than 100 hedge funds invest only in Bitcoin and other virtual currencies. In many places, this trading is happening on exchanges with little regulatory oversight or transparency. This has given rise to fears that a problem at one of the exchanges could trigger a panicked run on Bitcoin, something that is not unlikely given the relative inexperience of many of the new investors. A steep rise in the price of Bitcoin in late 2013 was punctured when the biggest exchange at the time, Mt. Gox, was discovered not to have the Bitcoins it claimed to have. That led to a three-year lull in the price. But current investors see that after all the previous popped bubbles — and there have been several — the price eventually returned to its old high and then vaulted past it. The price of a Bitcoin is now more than seven times the high it reached in 2013. What’s more, the Bitcoin ecosystem is now more distributed around the world, with less reliance on a  , which collapsed three years ago. While Mt. Gox hosted more than 75 percent of all Bitcoin trading in 2013, the largest exchanges today have only around 10 percent of the business. That should theoretically make the industry less vulnerable to problems at one institution. Bitcoin has been able to flow around the world and reach investors in countries large and small, because of the singular design that was laid out by its creator. Bitcoins are stored and traded on a decentralized network of computers that is not under the control of any government or company. That has been attractive to people in countries, like China and Zimbabwe, where the government has a history of seizing bank accounts and assets. The growing number of people using it in all these countries, often against the wishes of their governments, has also underscored the degree to which the software that manages Bitcoin has remained impervious to hackers and government control for nearly a decade. The recent price increases, though, have meant that Bitcoin is not living up to its promise as a currency routinely used for small purchases. Few people want to spend their Bitcoins if they believe the price will double in the next month. Bitcoin has remained popular as a way to pay for illegal drugs online because of the ability to open a Bitcoin wallet without providing any personal information. But Bitcoin has faced competition on this front from virtual currencies that provide more privacy. And the overall black market trade has diminished this year after the authorities took down some of the largest black market websites in the summer. This has been welcome news for many Bitcoin backers who want to see it lose its shadowy associations. Many Bitcoin investors have also come to believe that the Bitcoin network is not particularly well suited to handle lots of little transactions. These investors frequently argue that what Bitcoin is designed to do well is store money securely and outside the control of any company or government that could seize it, like a more transportable version of gold. “The reason people own Bitcoin is because it’s a great store of value, possibly the greatest that has ever existed,” said Jimmy Song, a programmer who works on the Bitcoin software. The last few years have brought a proliferation of virtual currencies that aim to compete with Bitcoin, sometimes with the goal of handling transactions more cheaply and quickly. This year, it appeared that the most popular virtual currency network other than Bitcoin, Ethereum, might pass Bitcoin in value. At the time, Bitcoin was hobbled by an internal battle over how to update the software and expand the network. In October, though, one side gave up the fight, and since then the price of Bitcoin has shot up, sometimes rising more in a week than it rose in its first seven years. In recent weeks, Bitcoin isn’t the only virtual currency that has been moving up. Ether, which lives on the Ethereum network, and Bitcoin Cash, another Bitcoin competitor, have also been rising quickly in value as investors look for anything that might have the same durability and upward mobility as the original.
SAN FRANCISCO — Want to get rich quick through Bitcoins or other virtual currencies? You’ll have to do it without Facebook. The social network said Tuesday that it would ban all ads for Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies, in order to stop promotions that it sees as “frequently associated with misleading or deceptive promotional practices.” Under Facebook’s new policy, no ads from well-known digital currency exchanges or for initial coin offerings will be allowed. Among those who will be affected is  , a self-described “crypto genius” whose viral ads have become a talking point in how the cryptocurrency boom has led to scams and wild price fluctuations. Facebook’s move followed questions about whether it has done enough to protect its site from bad actors. The company has been trying to clamp down on misinformation and false news after admitting last year that Russian agents had used it to spread divisive and polarizing messages. The world of cryptocurrencies, which people have flooded into as prices soared in recent months, has also increasingly raised fears that parts of the market are dogged by scams. The Securities and Exchange Commission said Tuesday that it had halted what may have been a fraudulent initial coin offering that asked people to fund what was supposed to be the world’s first “decentralized bank.” Rob Leathern, a Facebook product management director, announced the ban on cryptocurrency ads in  . He said the ban was intentionally broad, as Facebook seeks to “better detect deceptive and misleading advertising practices.” Mark Zuckerberg, Facebook’s chief executive, has recently expressed an interest in digital currencies. In a  this month, he wrote that he was studying how to introduce cryptocurrency to his company, adding that he thought it would 
 Why, hello there, new newsletter partner! It’s everyone’s favorite Bitcoin reporter, Nathaniel Popper! Thanks so much for subbing in for Farhad this week, sir, while he’s off doing whatever it is he does when he’s not being wrong about technology in this newsletter.  It’s good to be here to share some of my own wrong thoughts, Mike. I’ll see if I can do my best Farhad imitation, but with the added bonus of lots of tangents about Bitcoin and fintech.  Indeed. Well, it’s nice to have a finance expert join the tech pod and tell us all the ways that technology is changing how we bank and pay for things and all that stuff I barely comprehend.  Anyway, let’s get on to talking about the week in tech! And with that, why don’t we start off with Bitcoin? Square, the micropayments processing company co-founded by Jack Dorsey, recently started letting   using one of the company’s consumer-facing apps, Square Cash. It’s primarily a peer-to-peer money transfer service, but Square is dabbling in ways to make money from the app. Now, you’ve written a bit about Square over the past year, including how the company was set to  , Dorsey’s other beloved company. What should I make of this move? Is it something significant for the business or, alternately, is it a significant moment for Bitcoin? With all the daily vacillations in Bitcoin value, it’s hard for me to know if the currency is in a stable, real place with normal people or if it’s still a flight of fancy.  Square’s stock jumped after this Bitcoin news got out. It reminds me a bit of the British company that   after it simply added the word “blockchain” to its name. (For those tech readers who have successfully ignored all of this craziness, blockchain is the database technology that Bitcoin introduced.) It seems hard to dispute that this is a very bubble-y moment for Bitcoin and all the blockchain and virtual currency stuff that have spun off it. A lot of the people buying right now probably don’t have a terribly strong thesis about why the technology matters — they just see it going up and want to get in on the action. Bitcoin’s position as a new kind of global online gambling parlor has been particularly apparent in South Korea and Japan, which have risen out of nowhere over the last six months to become the largest markets for virtual currency trading. When I was  , I kept hearing how virtual currency trading fit neatly in countries where ordinary people have long speculated on foreign currencies. It’s worth keeping this in mind for anyone thinking of buying a Bitcoin through Square Cash. Even the speculation, though, points to one of the things that has gotten real technology people so excited about Bitcoin. Here is a new kind of digital investment that anyone in the world can access and buy and that can cross global borders without needing to go through banks. Jack Dorsey hasn’t hidden his interest in this. Back in August, he used an   to reveal his fascination with Bitcoin and the blockchain and his belief that it’s going to lead to some fundamental changes in how money works. I would bet that this trial on Square Cash is just the first baby steps in some bigger moves the company has planned.  I should probably try to find that random Bitcoin I purchased a few years ago on a whim. If only I remembered where I put that wallet.  Moving on, let’s head over to the world of Twitter, everybody’s favorite dysfunctional social network. First, it spent a  used social media to influence the 2016 presidential election. Then, a   for 10 minutes, sending the internet into a fit. Now, Twitter is making some changes to its verification program. You know that little blue badge that some people have on Twitter, signifying that they have been “verified” to be who they say they are? Well, Twitter thinks it needs an overhaul. The badge had become something of a status symbol. But then people started pointing out that avowed white supremacists had become verified, and people argued that Twitter was giving a tacit seal of approval to racist speech or the people behind it. This week, the company   though Twitter didn’t go into detail. Now, some prominent white supremacists are up in arms about being targeted on the service. I imagine they’ll have another few days of furor over this one. The company says it is also rethinking how verification should work in the future. I always thought being verified was sort of silly, even though I admit I have a little blue badge as well. It seems like the whole program really isn’t worth the headache to me.  It really seems like a bit of a no-win situation for Twitter to me — like so many of the battles around the social media sites these days. For much of the last year, they’ve been getting in trouble for not doing enough to stop bot accounts and fake news. Then they have this one program where they are actually trying to verify things, and that gets them in trouble as well. Didn’t Facebook confront something similar when they took on the fake news problem by adding human editors to their news feed? For Twitter, though, I have to imagine that part of the problem comes from how unevenly it applied those blue badges. You are a New York Times reporter with a badge; I am one without. I can appreciate why you have one, with your vast following and groupies — but the whole thing does feel a bit haphazard and unevenly applied. It does seem like you’d want some sort of guidelines around how the system works. The whole thing made me think that if I were Jack Dorsey, I’d want to leave my job at Twitter and just go sell Bitcoin at Square. What a headache. And only the latest of many for Twitter.  Indeed. Though on a positive note, Twitter is  , an area of the company’s revenue that historically hasn’t gotten much attention. Perhaps they’ll be in luck for this one. Anyway, thanks for coming on and making me smarter about fintech and Twitter! Please come back any time, especially when I start buying large quantities of Dogecoin.  I’ll only come back if you promise you won’t do that.
Like many Americans, Brad Hines spent much of September watching hours of hurricane coverage on television. For Mr. Hines, a digital marketing strategist in Boston, the storms hit close to home: Several family members in Florida were affected by Hurricane Irma. As the devastation unfolded, he opened his computer and donated money to the Red Cross, but it was not in cash. He gave in Bitcoin, which the Red Cross has been accepting since late 2014. He could have donated dollars, but, he said, the more he can use the cryptocurrency for buying goods and giving to charity, the more it will be used by others. “I want to pitch in and help get the currency adopted,” he said. “And it’s also fun to use.” It was his first donation with Bitcoin, the virtual currency that was created in 2008, but it will not be his last. As more charities accept digital currency, the more likely he will open his virtual wallet instead of his physical one, he said. Few people are donating to the Red Cross with Bitcoin, with the group receiving just $2,000 worth of the currency in 2017, but the numbers are rising elsewhere. Fidelity Charitable, a $16 billion donor-advised fund, has received $13.5 million in Bitcoin donations this year, up from the $4.1 million it received from November 2015, when the fund started accepting the cryptocurrency, to December 2016. Why would someone donate with Bitcoin over dollars? There are two reasons: It can be tax advantageous, and the technology the currency is built on could make it easier to see how a donation is being used, forcing charities to become more transparent. For many Bitcoin holders, the main impetus for donating their cryptocurrency is taxes. In 2014, the Internal Revenue Service classified cryptocurrencies, which includes Bitcoin and other digital dollars like Ethereum, Litecoin and Ripple, as an asset, like a stock, which means that sales are subject to capital gains. With a unit of Bitcoin rising to just over $7,000 this month from about $340 in early November 2014, sellers could be subject to hefty taxes depending on when they bought and sold. If they give those coins to charity, the asset is not subject to capital gains and donors still get to deduct the asset’s value from their taxes as a charitable donation. That’s partly why Fidelity Charitable began accepting Bitcoin donations. Its donors were asking about it, and the fund saw an opportunity after the I.R.S. clarified the rules. “We didn’t do anything until the I.R.S. determined that it was going to be treated as an asset,” said Matt Nash, Fidelity Charitable’s senior vice president of donor engagement. “If you look at an overall mix of a portfolio and one asset is gaining value much faster than another, then it’s strategic to donate that asset to charity. You’re getting better overall value for the dollar.” Mr. Nash said that the fund did not accept Bitcoin directly and that it did not hold any cryptocurrencies in its own portfolio. The fund uses Coinbase, a digital asset exchange company, to accept donations and convert them into dollars as soon as they come in. It’s a similar process with stocks. Fidelity Charitable turns assets it receives into cash right away, but it’s even more important that the fund transfers Bitcoins into dollars because of its volatility. Bitcoin fell by nearly 20 percent from Aug 28 to Sept. 11, for instance. Fidelity does not want to be caught holding something that can decline so quickly. Some technology entrepreneurs and cryptocurrency enthusiasts say that the system these currencies are built on can alter how people give and track their donations. Cryptocurrencies use a blockchain, a digital ledger that records transactions. Normally, when someone pays cash for an item in a store, the transaction is seen by only the buyer and the seller. With a blockchain, the transaction is recorded in a digital ledger in near real time that anyone can see. It is also impossible for transaction details to be changed. Because everything is tracked, donors can easily see that their payments have gone from their digital wallets into a charity’s hands. It’s this tracking mechanism that has many in the nonprofit sector excited. If everyone who touches a donation accepts Bitcoin, like the charity and the store providing the supplies, then donors can see how their donations are being used. “Having that tracking mechanism would certainly be something that donors would be interested in,” said Steve MacLaughlin, vice president of data and analytics at Blackbaud, which develops software for nonprofits. “The nonprofit that creates the shortest distance between gift and outcome wins.” Ideally, if donations can be better tracked, organizations will have to be more upfront about how they are spending their money, including how much goes toward overhead, said Andreas Antonopoulos, a Bitcoin expert and author of “The Internet of Money.” “You’ve seen numerous scandals where charitable donations end up being used for operating costs,” he said. “It’s very difficult to see where a donation is going, but this could change that.” Raphaël Mazet, a founder of Alice, a London-based software company that helps charities accept donations, said that end-to-end transparency was a long way off. Most of the organizations that charities give their money to do not accept digital currencies, so tracking stops when a cryptocurrency is converted into cash. Currency volatility is also holding tracking back, Mr. Mazet said. If the value of the currency strikingly drops before it is used, that donation will be worth a lot less than initially planned. His company transfers digital donations into a proprietary coin that’s essentially worth one British pound to avoid those ups and downs. “There is the potential for currencies to be sent around the world, but these issues make it difficult to work with blockchain right now,” he said. Still, technology companies like Alice, and Toronto-based Grace Token, are hoping to revolutionize giving. Both operate on the Ethereum blockchain, which Mr. Mazet said was more sophisticated than the Bitcoin blockchain. It allows people to use smart contracts, which give funders greater flexibility over how their donations are spent. With Alice, which is working with the homeless shelter St. Mungo’s in London, donations are released once the charity meets its goals, like finding a place for someone to stay and receiving mental health care. Those milestones are verified by the Greater London Authority. “Once those goals are validated, payment is triggered and then reported to the funders,” Mr. Mazet said. “So you know that your money has gone to help a person find a flat.” Grace Token, which is still building its software, will work in a similar way. It will allow donors to distribute funds at different times and only if certain goals are met. Funders will also be able to take back unused portions of donations if they feel their money is not being spent properly. “Traditionally, you can’t get your money back or determine how it’s being used,” said Michael Yeung, a founder of Grace Token. “Now we can specify a time or conditions to each donation.” Mr. Mazet will not go as far as to call his technology disruptive, but he does say it is bringing “massive innovation” to how charities track, measure and report gifts. It is likely that as more people start using digital money, the more cryptocurrency donations will be made. If these currencies keep rising, then it will continue to make sense to donate in Bitcoin purely for the tax advantage, said Mr. Nash of Fidelity Charitable. For Mr. Hines, who gave money to the Red Cross using Bitcoin, donating with the cryptocurrency is no different from donating anything else. “It’s easy to do,” he said. “And it lends credence to the currency.”
MOUNTAIN VIEW, Calif. — If you want to understand the priorities of a technology company, first look at the seating chart. At Google’s Silicon Valley headquarters, the chief executive, Sundar Pichai, now shares a floor with Google Brain, a research lab dedicated to artificial intelligence. When Facebook created its own artificial intelligence lab at its offices about seven miles away, it temporarily gave A.I. researchers desks next to the fish bowl of a conference room where its chief executive and founder, Mark Zuckerberg, holds his meetings. “I can high-five Mark and Sheryl from my desk, and the A.I. team was right next to us,” said Facebook’s chief technology officer, Mike Schroepfer, referring to Mr. Zuckerberg and Sheryl Sandberg, the chief operating officer. Even Overstock.com, the online retailer based in the Salt Lake City area, now runs a mini-research operation called OLabs. It sits directly outside the office of the company’s chief executive,  . A growing number of tech companies are pushing research labs and other far-reaching engineering efforts closer to the boss. The point is unmistakable: What they are doing matters to the chief executive. It may even be the future of the company. “The world is moving faster and faster. It is being driven by technology and innovation,” said John Kotter, an emeritus professor at Harvard Business School who has written several books on business leadership. “And a lot of these businesses are concluding that the speed of technological innovation should be the heart of everything.” A year ago, the Google Brain team of mathematicians, coders and hardware engineers sat in a small office building on the other side of the company’s campus. But over the past few months, it switched buildings and now works right beside the loungelike area where Mr. Pichai and other top executives work. Jeffrey Dean,   who oversees the Brain lab, is a short walk from Mr. Pichai. So are Ian Goodfellow, the researcher behind a new   on its own, and Norm Jouppi, who explores ways of accelerating A.I. research through  . “Any C.E.O. thinks a lot about where people are sitting — who they can walk around and have casual conversations with,” said Diane Greene, who oversees Google’s cloud computing team and sits on the board of Alphabet, Google’s parent company. “It is a very significant statement that he has moved that group right next him.” Google is placing big bets on the A.I. being explored by researchers like Mr. Goodfellow. Many   still   the   of this research. But Mr. Pichai and the rest of the Google leadership hope it will accelerate the evolution of everything from smartphones and home appliances to internet services and robotics. To Mr. Byrne, shaking up the seating chart at Overstock was a bit like a common management tactic in the military, when an officer will work closely with a small “command initiatives group” that is considerably more nimble than the rest of the organization. “We were getting bureaucratic,” Mr. Byrne said. “And this was a way of creating added competition outside the bureaucracy.” These big companies are trying to duplicate the vibe of a Silicon Valley start-up, where the boss is next to everyone. As start-ups grow, they often put key technology teams next to the chief executive. Ms. Greene, who was the chief executive of the software company VMware, said she had always made a point of sitting beside the top engineers because they saw the company’s future. There are limits to these arrangements. When Facebook built a team to explore the future of virtual reality on its vast social network, it made a similar desk move. The group is no longer seated next to Mr. Zuckerberg. Facebook said this was because the group had grown too large. But across Silicon Valley, virtual reality is no longer the buzziest of topics. That honor belongs to artificial intelligence. Where you sit has mattered for years at Facebook. The company’s ad group traditionally sat far away from Mr. Zuckerberg. But after Facebook went public and started a big push for revenue, important members of the ad team moved next to the boss, said Antonio García Martínez, who wrote a  . At Overstock, Mr. Byrne walks past his small research team every time he leaves his office. Like Ms. Greene, he sees this as an opportunity for spontaneous interaction. The team members can discuss their work with him, and Mr. Byrne, a doctor of philosophy with a long history of unorthodox business choices, will share his far-reaching ideas with them. And he gets to hear, without the pressure of a formal presentation, what the engineers are excited about. “It was undeniable that proximity sparked conversation,” said Judd Bagley, a kind of roving technologist and strategist who once worked in this group. “Patrick prides himself on being able to walk up to anyone at the company, say ‘hello,’ and occasionally even eat french fries off the plate on their desk.” Through OLabs, Overstock became the first major retailer to  , and the lab eventually produced a company spinoff that seeks to  . Now, in an echo of the A.I. labs at Google and Facebook, the operation is focused on machine learning, which involves systems that can learn tasks on their own by analyzing large amounts of data. If a chief executive is close to these researchers, he or she is learning from them. But the boss is also showing them how important they are to the company. That is enormously valuable for engineers and mathematicians who are not necessarily generating immediate revenue, said Kevin Quennesson, a start-up executive who ran an A.I. team at Twitter. He also warned that companies risked putting too much pressure on researchers to produce results from work that was, by definition, a trip into the unknown. Amid so much spontaneous conversation with the chief executive, Mr. Bagley said, it is sometimes difficult to tell the difference between “the formal direction and informal brainstorming.” Status at Facebook was defined by how close your desk was to Mr. Zuckerberg, Mr. Martínez said. And if you were close to the boss, other groups resented you. Priorities also tend to ebb and flow. At Overstock, a new Bitcoin project will squeeze in beside OLabs. And at Facebook, the A.I. lab is no longer side by side with Mr. Zuckerberg because it also grew too large. Still, this work is particularly important to the company as it works to ensure “the safety and integrity of our community” — which has become Facebook code for guarding against false, misleading or dangerous activity on its social network, Mr. Schroepfer said. And the A.I. team is still only a short walk from Mr. Zuckerberg.
• Regulatory concerns sink Ant Financial’s purchase of MoneyGram. The value of the digital currency leapt about $1,000 this afternoon. Why? Turns out that  . From Rob Copeland of the WSJ: As of this writing, Bitcoin is valued at about $14,655. Founders Fund is, after all, a venture firm rather than a hedge fund. But the firm apparently believes that start-up valuations currently are sky-high, while digital currencies will continue to climb in worth. The WSJ reports, citing its unnamed sources, that the firm bought about $15 million in Bitcoin and that its stake is now worth hundreds of millions of dollars. So much for Jack Ma’s charm offensive. United States officials  . Ant Financial, the electronic payments company controlled by Mr. Ma, became the latest Chinese firm to have its acquisition of an American company fall apart because it was unable to secure approval from the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States, or Cfius. The deal failed despite a charm offensive by Jack Ma, the Chinese internet. Shortly after President Trump won the 2016 election, Mr. Ma famously stood with the president-elect in Trump Tower in New York City and pledged that his e-commerce empire would help create one million American jobs. The attempted purchase of MoneyGram was   of the Trump administration’s political and regulatory approach to China, and the deal’s failure could spell trouble for other Chinese companies considering major acquisitions. The strong flow of Chinese money into the United States has prompted growing worries. Lawmakers from both parties have   calling for greater scrutiny of Chinese investments in the United States. They are pushing for a significant expansion of Cfius, a multiagency panel that reviews foreign deals for potential threats to national security. Of the deal,  : MoneyGram’s shares are down 6.8 percent after the close. The Nasdaq Composite rose 1.5 percent Tuesday to close above 7,000 for the first time. The gain was driven by Netflix, Facebook, Google-parent Alphabet and Apple, which jumped between 18 percent and 4.8 percent. Tuesday’s rally follows a 28 percent gain for the Nasdaq last year. That beat the 25 percent gain for the Dow Jones industrial average and the 19 percent rise for the Standard & Poor’s 500 index.  As of Friday, the index was trading at 27.55 times the last 12 months of earnings, well above the S.&P. 500′s level of 18.27 times earnings,   But the Nasdaq’s current price-to-earnings ratio remains well below 72.2, which it hit in March 2000.  Yes, Apple, Microsoft and Amazon.com drove the Nasdaq’s run to 7,000. But Riot Blockchain saw the biggest percentage gain between the Nasdaq’s first close above 6,000 in April to its close above 7,000 on Tuesday,  . Shares of Riot “surged more than 640 percent during that period, with the bulk of those gains coming after the company switched its focus to investing in blockchain technology October.”  Senator Orrin Hatch, Republican of Utah,  , according to the NYT. That gives Mitt Romney — former presidential candidate, former Massachusetts governor,  , current (and increasingly frequent)   — a chance to run for the seat. Money is cheap, the global economy is gaining momentum and markets are at records. “Yet things  ,” writes Quentin Webb of Breakingviews. With that as the backdrop, here are a few of Breakingviews’ predictions for 2018: • “For the first time in years, rich-world bond issuance will outstrip buying by the Fed and friends,” and “bond vigilantes will rise from the dead.” • “Passive funds will, despite their name, dethrone a chief executive.” • “In tech, investors can consider a tasty new dish: SLAW, for Spotify, Lyft, Airbnb and WeWork, four prospective candidates for public life.” • Apple’s position as a privacy-sensitive hardware specialist will give it some shelter from mounting anger at Silicon Valley’s power and lack of accountability. We’re just two days into 2018, and we already have a huge M.&A. prediction, courtesy of the analyst Gene Munster. From  : Getting the timing on this is difficult, but seeing the value of the combination is easy. Amazon believes the future of retail is a mix of mostly online and some offline. Target is the ideal offline partner for Amazon for two reasons, shared demographic and manageable but comprehensive store count. It’s a big, if logical, assumption given the ever-expanding empire that Amazon has been assembling — one that   on their back heels. Target shares were up nearly 4 percent as of this afternoon.  Yes. Yes, but it’d be pretty expensive. Target’s market capitalization as of Tuesday morning was nearly $37 billion. Amazon had about $24.3 billion in cash and short-term investments on its balance sheet as of Sept. 30, meaning that the company would have to borrow a hefty amount. Assuming a 20 percent takeover premium, Target would be almost $40 billion. Amazon could pay in stock as well as cash, but it hasn’t struck a big deal using stock since its takeover of Zappos in 2009. And stock remains an expensive form of currency, though that hasn’t stopped the likes of Disney from stock deals. (Mr. Munster asserts that a deal is affordable because the cost of a Target acquisition is just 8 percent of Amazon’s market cap. Obviously, I think it’s a bit more complicated than that.) Obviously, it’s antitrust. Mr. Munster notes that a combined Amazon-Target would only have about a 13 percent share of the overall American retail market, compared to Walmart’s 23 percent. But it’s hard to determine at the moment what the Trump administration’s yardstick for market concentration is: • AT&T and Time Warner say that their proposed deal is a vertical deal that falls within the bounds of acceptable deals. The Justice Department  . • Disney and Fox have announced a deal that would inevitably lead to lots of layoffs. President Trump   as potentially “great for jobs.” “As for antitrust, the Trump administration won’t do any favors for Jeff Bezos, but the market share numbers suggest the deal will be approved,” Mr. Munster writes. That’s a potentially big assumption. Kevin McLaughlin of   that the two companies “are actively working to replace Oracle software running on critical business systems with open-source database software alternatives, and have made significant progress toward getting off Oracle entirely,” citing people familiar with the matter. Oracle’s shares are down nearly 2 percent. They had been trading about 1 percent higher before the report. The Dow Jones industrial average jumped 25 percent in 2017. Does that mean investors should turn bearish on stocks this year? The answer is no if history is any indicator, LPL Financial’s Ryan Detrick points out. Also, is the first day of trading predictive of the stock market’s performance for the full year? If you couldn’t recall last year’s highlights over the recent holidays, Andrew can remind you with his   (the humor of which is his and his alone). A sample: But it’s a new year, and   we’ll be keeping our eyes on: • Now that the tax fight is over, the White House is  . Will Gary Cohn and Steven Mnuchin be able to tame President Trump’s hard-line tendencies? • Can Congress make progress on   it’s facing? • SoftBank  . Will the ride-hailing giant make further strides toward going public this year? ( .) And what will Masa Son of SoftBank and his $100 billion Vision Fund get up to? • What other industries   this year? And   can Mr. Bezos’s behemoth get? • North Korea is trying to   between South Korea and the U.S. And it  . How will Mr. Trump — and the global economy — respond? • Stevie Cohen is   for his new hedge fund. But how much presence will he retain in the industry? • In the world of M. & A. fights, who will AT&T or the Justice Department prevail? Broadcom or Qualcomm? And will Disney and Fox get their deal done? And the Trump administration’s deregulatory push   — even if skeptics question whether rolling back government rules stimulates corporate growth. Corporate leaders always cite “uncertainty” as a reason to hold back on capital expenditures or transformative acquisitions. And fewer than half of the respondents in the National Association of Manufacturers’ most recent survey said they faced an “unfavorable business climate.” Yet some see a bigger phenomenon at work. This is what Mark Zandi of Moody’s Analytics told the NYT: • Corporate America’s great loophole scavenger hunt has begun. ( ) • China has responded to the tax law by temporarily exempting foreign companies from taxes on their earnings in the country — but there’s a catch. ( ) • Democrats in high-tax states are seeking ways to blunt some of the impact of the tax overhaul. ( ) • The gig economy could get a boost. ( ) • Betting on the dollar continuing to strengthen in 2018, thanks to the tax law. ( ) The Murdoch family tensions behind the Disney deal. It may have been a brief sales negotiation with Verizon that prompted Rupert Murdoch to consider selling pieces of 21st Century Fox. But the NYT reports that friction between the media mogul and his son James   toward the Disney transaction. From the article by Brooks Barnes and Sydney Ember: • James Murdoch has privately grumbled about the control that his father still exerted at Fox and has chafed at some of the elements of Fox News’s coverage. • Rupert Murdoch was wary of how Hollywood was being reshaped by digital giants like Netflix, Apple and Amazon, and unsure his empire could compete. • Lachlan Murdoch, who is more conservative than his brother, has become the heir apparent at what would remain of Fox, but was initially uneasy about a sell-off. Beyond easing family tensions among the trio, the deal could make the Murdochs some of Disney’s biggest shareholders. Yes, Ron Baron has lowered fees on some of his smaller funds. But he’s unapologetic about charging roughly 54 percent more than the industry average.  Landon Thomas Jr. of the NYT:  Chalk it up to a combination of looser oversight, the $10 trillion of investor money still dedicated to actively managed funds and a lack of investor awareness that high fees don’t necessarily pay for performance. One fund investor’s take in the NYT: Bruce Steinberg, an executive at the hedge fund, and his family were among the 12 killed when a single-engine plane   on Sunday. Ray Dalio of Bridgewater   yesterday:  Richard Cousins, the C.E.O. of Compass Group, the world’s biggest catering company, was one of six killed in   on Sunday. What’s notable is that Time’s Up — formed by more than 300 women and including a legal-defense fund — isn’t focused only on the entertainment industry. It plans to offer help to janitors, nurses, hotel staff and other blue-collar workers. Here’s what  , told Cara Buckley of the NYT: The actresses America Ferrera, Eva Longoria and Reese Witherspoon; Donna Langley, the chairwoman of Universal Pictures; and roughly 295 other women in Hollywood. The Time’s Up Legal Defense Fund, which is backed by $13 million in donations and is overseen by Tina Tchen, a former chief of staff to Michelle Obama. It will help provide less-privileged women with lawyers to bring misconduct cases to court and protect them from blowback. • Take a peek behind the curtain at the monthly drug- and sex-fueled monthly parties attended by some of Silicon Valley’s most powerful men, in an excerpt from “Brotopia,” the forthcoming book by the Bloomberg anchor Emily Chang. ( ) • The former Fox News anchor Gretchen Carlson, who was a Miss America, will take over as chairwoman of the pageant as it works through its harassment scandal. ( ) • Business schools in the United States are hastily reshaping their curriculums with case studies on sexual harassment. ( ) • Political partisans are starting to exploit the #MeToo movement. ( ) • The former C.E.O. of SoFi, Mike Cagney, has approached potential investors about backing a fintech start-up. ( ) • The longtime leader of the New York City Ballet, Peter Martins, has retired after accusations of sexual harassment and verbal and physical abuse. He denies wrongdoing. ( ) Last week, the NYT reported on how the Metropolitan Transportation Authority ends up with some of  . Some facts: • The Second Avenue subway cost  . Expanding Grand Central Terminal is now expected to cost  . • Construction companies inflate their projected costs by up to   for M.T.A. work. Labor unions have arranged for up to   the necessary staffing on some projects. • Consultants have persuaded officials to spend heavily on design and management. Here’s what Mr. Blankfein, Andrew’s choice as 2017’s best corporate tweeter,  : (Mr. Blankfein has good reasons for pique over the tax law: Goldman Sachs   in its fourth-quarter earnings tied to the changes.) • Caterpillar faces a potential tax bill of $2 billion from the I.R.S., which says it has underpaid on profits from parts sales through its Swiss unit. ( ) • The new Salesforce Tower in San Francisco is the tallest office building west of the Mississippi, and a symbol of tech’s triumph in the city. ( ) • Morgan Stanley is entering the robo-advice market, with an automated service that includes a choice of exchange-traded funds, mutual funds and seven themed portfolios. ( ) • Europe’s new “MiFID II” investment rules — on how research is paid for, how trades are documented and executed, and how brokers share information — come into force tomorrow. ( ) • Playboy Enterprises is considering shutting the print magazine to concentrate on licensing deals and brand partnerships. ( ) • Retail cannabis shops in California opened their doors on Monday, inaugurating what proponents say will become the world’s largest legal market for recreational marijuana. ( ) • One of America’s biggest rehab companies built an empire. But after a patient died, its enemies — investors and rivals alike — struck hard. ( ) • Andrew picked his favorite business (and business-adjacent) books of 2017, including “The Spider Network” by David Enrich, “Reset” by Ellen Pao” and “Principles” by Ray Dalio. ( )
 into his presidency, President Trump has transformed the world’s view of the United States. His anger at NATO, awkwardness with allies and friendliness with autocrats have taken the U.S. from being an anchor of the international order to something more inward-looking and unpredictable. Here’s a detailed accounting of  . Above, the first lady, Melania Trump, and Mr. Trump, in Beijing with President Xi Jinping and his wife, Peng Liyuan, in November. _____  in Afghanistan and Yemen took strikingly bloody turns this week. In Afghanistan, above, the Islamic State claimed responsibility for a   that killed at least 41 people. It was the latest in a series of mass-casualty attacks against Shiite targets. And in Yemen, airstrikes on a market and a  , including eight children, the U.N. said. The two attacks occurred on Tuesday, making it one of the deadliest days for civilians so far in the country’s civil war. _____  loses its regional allies and finds itself in need of money, it is  . The state-owned oil company, once a cash cow, is on  . And Venezuela’s leftist president, Nicolás Maduro, is increasingly regarded as a despot. With its oil, Venezuela is likely to be an attractive, if risky, long-term gamble for Beijing and Moscow. But Mr. Maduro, above center, is negotiating from a position of weakness, a former diplomat said. _____   , people are stressed about the potential job-destroying rise of automation. But not in Sweden, where   more efficient. As employers prosper, Swedes have consistently gained a proportionate slice of the spoils — a stark contrast to the U.S. and Britain, where wages have stagnated even while corporate profits have soared. _____    of our  , where the number of obese adults has tripled since 1990, can turn down the sweets. In sugar-producing places like Mackay, on the Queensland coast, sugar isn’t just part of the culture, it’s a source of pride. But health experts say it’s contributing to a national health crisis. _____   , Alabama certified Doug Jones’s Senate victory,  . Mr. Moore, who has been accused of sexual misconduct against teenage girls, has refused to concede the race. We asked 615 men about  . About a third said they had done something within the past year that would qualify as objectionable behavior or sexual harassment. _____ offered a tax break to U.S. businesses thinking of taking their profits out of the country. There’s a catch: To be eligible, foreign firms must invest in  . tumbled after   or sell virtual currencies anonymously. for loopholes begin. The   is likely to display the abundant creativity of U.S. businesses in interpreting the tax code.  we told you about all the ways technology failed over the past year. Here’s a look at  . . Here’s a snapshot of  . made a “risky” escape from China to the United States. He had been jailed and was living under police surveillance. [ ] in Japan indicted the Mongolian-born former sumo grand champion Harumafuji for assaulting a junior wrestler. [ ]  George Weah, a former soccer player, won the presidential election, according to provisional results. [ ] to provide antimissile systems to Japan was criticized by Russia as a violation of an arms-control treaty. [ ] winners urged Myanmar to release two Reuters reporters arrested in Yangon earlier this month. [ ] denied reports that it is violating U.N. sanctions by secretly selling oil to North Korea. [ ] Comanche has been declared the winner of the Sydney to Hobart race after Wild Oats XI was penalized for breaking race rules. [ New Year’s resolutions  . . Try something new on pasta night, like  .  for drones was on display at an air show in Wuhan last month, where jets and planes were  .  our magazine remembers some of the artists, innovators and thinkers we lost in the past year. the city of  . Its veneer of calm, even affluence, is at odds with the growing hatred against the group elsewhere in the country. Each year on New Year’s Eve, millions of people in the U.S. and around the world turn their attention to Times Square for the annual ball drop. It all began at a New York Times party on Dec. 31, 1904. The newspaper had just moved its headquarters from Lower Manhattan to a 24-story tower in Longacre Square, at the intersection of 42nd Street, Seventh Avenue and Broadway. Mayor George McClellan renamed it Times Square, and the publisher, Adolph S. Ochs, celebrated by putting on a New Year’s Eve party with a live band and fireworks. “No more beautiful picture was ever limned in fire on the curtain of midnight,”   on Jan. 1, 1905. The tradition lived on, but in 1907, the fireworks were replaced by a ball drop. The idea came from Western Union Telegraph Company in Lower Manhattan, which did a ball drop every day at noon. (  had been used to tell time for decades.) The paper moved out of the building in 1913, but the ball drop continued, except for two years during World War II. A  , was in charge of it from 1907 to 1957. For more on the ritual,   by our in-house historian, David Dunlap.
An eon or two ago, Eastman Kodak was a bleeding-edge technology company. It hired the smartest engineers and put them to work racking up patents, pioneering new chemical processes and building a globe-spanning camera and film business that, at its peak, employed 145,000 people. But the digital photo age passed Kodak by, and today, the Rochester, N.Y., company exists mostly in the past tense. Many of the patents have been  , buildings have been rented out or  , and the company has continued to shrink since it filed for bankruptcy in 2012. Now, the 130-year-old company is trying an unlikely sort of comeback — one built by betting on cryptocurrency. It’s a bold gamble that has excited some investors, perplexed others and raised questions about how closely Kodak vetted its cryptocurrency business partners, who now include a paparazzi photo agency, a penny-stock promoter and a company offering what has been called a “magic money making machine.” This month, Kodak lent its name to a digital currency called KodakCoin, which is billed as “  to empower photographers and agencies to take greater control in image rights management.” The basic idea behind KodakCoin is to use the blockchain to help photographers manage their collections by creating permanent, immutable records of ownership. The company also struck a licensing deal for a Bitcoin-mining computer called the  , which allows users to generate their own cryptocurrency. Kodak’s stock rose more than 200 percent following the announcements, and has not fallen much since. That’s partly because the blockchain — the mathematical ledger system that forms the basis of digital currencies — has a kind of talismanic effect in today’s stock market. As investors seek to capitalize on the popularity of currencies like Bitcoin and Ethereum, a number of struggling companies have  , at least temporarily, simply by adding “blockchain” to their names or announcing a new cryptocurrency venture unrelated to their previous line of work. (The most notorious example is Long Island Iced Tea Corp., a beverage company that   after it rebranded itself “Long Blockchain Corp.”) These sudden, brazen moves have also attracted the attention of regulators. In a  , Jay Clayton, the chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, said that the agency was “looking closely at the disclosures of public companies that shift their business models to capitalize on the perceived promise of distributed ledger technology.” Kodak is the most prominent old-line company to enter the cryptocurrency game so far, and maybe the most controversial. Almost immediately, critics pounced on the company’s plans, characterizing them as a desperate money grab. “It feels like a publicly traded company issuing a token to raise its stock price from the grave,” said Kyle Samani, a partner at the cryptocurrency trading firm Multicoin Capital. “I would not be sleeping very well if I was involved in this,” said Jill Carlson, a blockchain consultant. In an interview, Jeff Clarke, Kodak’s chief executive, said that the company’s blockchain ambitions were genuine. He began looking into blockchain technology last summer, he said, and realized that it could solve a perennial problem for photographers — proving ownership of their images, tracking down copyright violators, and getting paid. “This is not a dog food company that’s creating a currency,” Mr. Clarke said. “This is a real solution around digital rights management that Kodak has been involved in for many years.” In theory, photographers will be able to upload their images to a platform called KodakOne, create a blockchain-based license for each image, and use web-crawling software to scour the internet looking for copyright violations. Instead of using dollars, photographers can have clients pay them in KodakCoins. KodakCoin’s initial offering, scheduled for Wednesday, is expected to raise as much as $20 million. (On Tuesday night, KodakCoin’s website said that it would delay the offering by “several weeks” to verify the credentials of potential investors.) But there are few details about what that money will be used for, or why a similar system could not be built without the blockchain. There is also a more obvious question: Why would photographers want to be paid in digital tokens, rather than cash? In several calls with KodakCoin leaders, I couldn’t get straight answers to these questions. And KodakCoin’s white paper, a technical document that details the plans for the currency, is a 40-page mishmash of marketing buzzwords and vague diagrams, like the one below: Make no mistake: Digital rights management is a real issue for photographers, and the blockchain does, in theory, offer a compelling solution. But the specific attributes of KodakCoin present some red flags. First, despite the name, KodakCoin is not actually a Kodak project. The company behind the offering, WENN Digital, is a California-based affiliate of a British photo agency that specializes in paparazzi photo licensing. Under their licensing agreement, Kodak will not receive any direct revenue from the public offering. It will receive a minority stake in WENN Digital, 3 percent of all KodakCoins issued and a royalty on future revenue. Cameron Chell, a lead adviser to the KodakCoin project, told me that the initial offering represented a “seminal moment” for Kodak, and that the company’s interest in blockchain technology was a savvy long-term investment. “The real story is that it’s about to be a renaissance,” he said. But Mr. Chell, a Canadian entrepreneur and motivational speaker who once opened for Tony Robbins, has a troubled track record. In 1998,   from the Alberta Stock Exchange in Canada and paid a $25,000 fine in connection with a violation of the exchange’s rules. A previous company of his ended in ignominy after its   charged with fraud. Asked about these incidents, Mr. Chell said that he was “young, inexperienced and was irresponsible in my actions,” and that he had “learned a lot since 1998 and work hard to conduct myself in a manner that does not reflect that poor judgment.” A Kodak spokesman did not return a request for comment about Mr. Chell and whether it knew about the ban. Mr. Chell has refashioned himself as a blockchain expert in recent years, and KodakCoin is his biggest project so far. He is the chairman of Appcoin Innovations, which was registered as a literary agency — Redstone Literary Agents — until last year, when it became a consulting firm that provides “a turnkey set of services for companies to develop and integrate blockchain and cryptocurrency technologies,” according to securities filings. The company, which trades over the counter as a penny stock, earned no revenue in 2015 or 2016, according to S.E.C. filings. Appcoin Innovations is slated to receive 20 percent of all KodakCoins issued and a portion of the offering proceeds, a stake that could amount to millions if the offering is successful. “Once formally launched,” Mr. Chell wrote to me in an email, “the company will hopefully provide shareholders a traditional and transparent place to participate in the crypto space with projects that are regulatory compliant.” Now, about those coins. You might think that a digital currency that is trying to “democratize photography and make licensing fair to artists,” in Mr. Clarke’s words, would be easily accessible. But because of regulatory requirements, KodakCoins will be available only to so-called accredited investors in the United States. An accredited investor is defined as a person with a net worth of $1 million or more, or an annual income above $200,000. How many cryptocurrency-obsessed millionaire photographers do you know? Even if photographers do meet the requirements to participate, they could have a hard time spending their KodakCoins, or redeeming them for cash. The S.E.C. has   that securities sold in private offerings, such as KodakCoins, may be difficult to resell — and that investors may be required to hold on to them “indefinitely.” A KodakCoin representative told me that the company believes its tokens will eventually be freely traded, and that it may issue other types of tokens in the future that will not be subject to the same restrictions. KodakCoin’s white paper says that token holders may receive other benefits, such as a share of KodakOne’s revenue and access to a “marketplace” that will allow them to spend their KodakCoins on camera equipment, studios for photo shoots, and travel expenses. But these benefits could fail to materialize. Cryptocurrency experts also do not seem impressed with the Kodak KashMiner, a Bitcoin-mining machine advertised at this year’s CES electronics trade show. According to the  , users will pay $3,400 to rent the machine, a Kodak-branded computer that solves complex math equations to unlock new Bitcoin, for two years. Half the Bitcoins successfully mined with the Kashminer will go back to Spotlite, the company licensing Kodak’s name, and the user will keep the other half. Kodak hasn’t shared many details about its KashMiner deal. But renting the machines could be a hard sell. In its CES advertisement, KashMiner estimates that each renter will earn $9,000 from mining Bitcoin over the two-year contract window. Experts told me that figure was most likely inflated, because Bitcoin mining gets harder over time. And they   that the KashMiner itself appears to simply be a rebranded version of a popular Bitcoin-mining machine that can be purchased outright for less than the rental cost. All of this — the origins of KodakCoin, the currency itself and the lofty claims about the KashMiner’s moneymaking potential — adds up to a big question mark, and points to the possibility that Kodak may be in over its head. “The best-case scenario is that they believe that the technology will eventually be able to deliver what they’ve pitched,” said Ms. Carlson, the blockchain consultant. “The worst-case scenario is that they are just being very opportunistic.” Mr. Clarke, Kodak’s chief executive, characterized the blockchain projects as a small part of the company’s overall strategy, and said it was “ironic” that critics were faulting Kodak for embracing a young technology like cryptocurrency, given that its past problems were caused by a failure to innovate. “This isn’t speculative,” Mr. Clarke said. “We’re taking an emerging new technology in blockchain, and we’re using it to solve a real problem.”
• F.T.C. is “evaluating the serious issues raised” in Uber’s hack. • Trian is pushing back against P&G’s review of its shareholder vote. • The Republican tax proposals aren’t winning much support from economists. • The F.C.C.’s decision pits Google and Netflix against Comcast and Verizon again. • Has AT&T had a bad week, or a good one? Tuesday Uber  and that the company had kept the data breach secret for more than a year after paying a $100,000 ransom. The F.T.C. is not the only regulator looking at how Uber handled the breach.  that attorneys general in Illinois, Massachusetts, New York and Connecticut each said they would investigate. Uber has experienced breaches before. The company  , an event Uber discovered later that year and disclosed in February 2015. In that attack, the names and driver’s licenses of more than 50,000 of the company’s drivers were compromised. In August, Uber   from the F.T.C that the company did not keep promises to protect customer data. The largest and most expensive corporate proxy battle in history is getting even more contested, as Procter & Gamble reviews a preliminary tally of shareholder votes that showed a narrow win for activist investor Nelson Peltz. Mr. Peltz’s investment firm, Trian Fund Management, expressed its disappointment on Wednesday that Procter & Gamble is waiting to make Mr. Peltz a director while it looks into election results from independent election inspector IVS Associates. Last week, Trian said that Mr. Peltz   on Procter & Gamble’s board by a slim margin of 42,780 shares, or about 0.0016 percent of the shares outstanding. In a statement on Wednesday, Trian estimated that Procter & Gamble, which owns brands such as Tide and Gillette, has already spent $100 million defending itself since Mr. Peltz began his bid in July. “P.&G. shareholders should be concerned that P.&G. has opted to waste further time and shareholder money contesting the official tabulation of the independent inspector,” Trian said. “The review and challenge process will be a continued distraction at a time when management and the Board should be focused on improving business results and regaining lost market share.” Damon Jones, a spokesman for Procter & Gamble, said the company has “not issued a challenge to the results” and is “still firmly in the review period.” “Our objective has not changed, and that is to ensure that every vote is counted and counted accurately, nothing more, nothing less,” he said. The Initiative on Global Markets at the University of Chicago Booth School of Business : Only one of the respondents agreed. Twenty-two, or 52 percent, disagree or disagreed strongly, while 15 were uncertain. (The rest did not respond.) Also, nearly every economist who responded to the survey agreed or strongly agreed that the tax proposals would leave the United States with a significantly higher debt load. Only one economist was uncertain. Add these academics to the list of Wall Street economists and Washington think tanks that have criticized the tax cuts,  In choosing to  , the F.C.C. chairman Ajit Pai has pleased traditional broadband providers who want to charge for some kinds of internet traffic while angering online tech giants who want all internet services to be treated equally. Expect the court battles to begin soon. Here’s how Mr. Pai  : (Here’s the NYT explainer on what the rule change  .) Verizon’s statement: “We continue to believe that users should be able to access the internet when, where, and how they choose.” Facebook’s statement: “We are disappointed that the proposal announced today by the F.C.C. fails to maintain the strong net neutrality protections that will ensure the internet remains open for everyone.” The   will be with states that seek to impose net neutrality on a more local level, Politico reports. • Devin Coldewey notes that millions of comments opposing a rollback of net neutrality rules were posted to the F.C.C.’s website. “For someone who claims to be working for the American people, F.C.C. Chairman Ajit Pai sure doesn’t seem to care what they have to say.” ( ) • Shira Ovide writes, “No matter what the FCC does, America’s internet is not an equal place and it’s only going to become less fair.” ( )  The Justice Department sued to block its $85.4 billion bid for Time Warner. And President Trump once again weighed in on that transaction, saying, “Personally, I’ve always felt that that was a deal that’s not good for the country. I think your pricing is going to go up.”  The F.C.C.’s net neutrality move. Also, potentially, Mr. Trump’s comments, which keep alive the question of whether the Justice lawsuit was politically motivated. And the case   — the man who approved Comcast’s takeover of NBCUniversal, a deal very similar to AT&T’s. Spencer Kurn of New Street Research described   of the government’s actions: Or as Jennifer Saba of Breakingviews put it, “The Trump administration and tight coordination of policy  , so it’s not surprising that watchdogs are roaming all over the field.”  on the strength of the government’s case although many acknowledge that the Justice Department   battling previous case law involving “vertical” mergers.  Bloomberg points out that Time Warner’s top five executives are set to receive as much as   if the deal with AT&T goes through. Two prominent merger advisers told Michael and Andrew that while the conditions and needs behind a surge in deal making are still there, the Justice Department’s move  . , Centerview Partners: “Is it idiosyncratic, or a different perspective on what the regulatory framework to going to be? We don’t know yet.” , LionTree: “This event does not eliminate the need for transformational events or scale in these industries. However, it has created a heightened level of uncertainty in the deal environment.” And Rich Greenfield of the research firm BTIG told CNN that media M. & A. is  : “Nobody knows the rules of the road.” • John Lasseter, who helped found Pixar and was one of the Walt Disney Company’s most important executives, will take a leave after unspecified “missteps” that made staff feel “disrespected or uncomfortable.” ( ) • Charlie Rose was officially fired by CBS and dropped by PBS. ( ) • Two female-led investor groups have emerged as potential buyers for the Weinstein Company, each with promises of helping sexual misconduct victims as part of their bids. But some media executives wonder if the offers are serious, or if they’re more about making statements. ( ) • Bob Weinstein paid about $600,000 to two female employees of Miramax who accused his brother, Harvey, of sexual harassment and assault. ( ) Senator Lisa Murkowski of Alaska, who helped torpedo Congress’ previous efforts to overturn the Affordable Care Act, may accept the Senate tax legislation’s elimination of a key part of the A.C.A. “Eliminating this tax would allow Alaskans to have greater control over their money and health care decisions,” she wrote in  . Ms. Murkowski signaled that she might back the tax plan if it passed alongside legislation that shores up state health insurance exchanges. But there are still a handful of Republican senators on the fence about the Senate’s tax proposal — and three of them voting no would kill the legislation. • The real estate industry is worried about the tax bill making homeownership less valuable and has been calling legislators, warning clients about future tax bills and staging protests. ( ) • An argument that the House bill, which removes tax breaks for graduate students, could undermine research in STEM fields. ( ) And it’s another headache for his successor, Dara Khosrowshahi. : Last year, hackers stole data on Uber drivers and customers, then demanded $100,000 ransom. The company paid off the hackers, who signed nondisclosure agreements, and then covered up the payments by disguising them as “bug bounties.” “While I can’t erase the past, I can commit on behalf of every Uber employee that we will learn from our mistakes,” Mr. Khosrowshahi wrote in a   about the incident, which emerged during a board review. The incidents didn’t happen under Mr. Khosrowshahi’s tenure, and Uber has already dismissed its chief security officer. But it   about what went on while Mr. Kalanick was C.E.O. — a pertinent issue as the company prepares to go public in the next few years. A reminder: Mr. Kalanick is still on the board. This time, it involves words used by the activist hedge fund manager to an African-American aide of Mayor Bill de Blasio’s. From Shane Goldmacher of  : Mr. Loeb told the NYT that his comments weren’t aimed at Mr. Buery but at “the broad institutional failing by our government to confront a broken educational system.” (The financier is the chairman of Success Academy, a network of charter schools.) It isn’t the first time Mr. Loeb has gotten into trouble for  .  How much damage do these controversies do to Mr. Loeb’s much-cherished issue, charter schools? “If you’re stupid enough to buy it, you’ll pay the price for it one day,” the JPMorgan Chase C.E.O. once said of the digital currency. Now his firm’s clients may be able to  : the bank is considering providing clients access to CME’s new Bitcoin product through its futures brokerage unit, according to the WSJ. As   writes: As Bitcoin goes more mainstream — you can buy Bitcoin on Square — the NYT l , the opaque exchange that has had legal troubles and has been hacked twice. She announced   as Hewlett-Packard Enterprise’s C.E.O. yesterday, saying, “I’ve been working straight for 35 years.” Remember that she almost had another gig — C.E.O. of Uber — until she   in negotiations with the ride-hailing company.
, President Trump’s former chief strategist,   — the latest twist in the investigation into Russian meddling in the 2016 presidential election. This is the first time the special counsel, Robert Mueller, is known to have used a grand jury subpoena to question a member of Mr. Trump’s inner circle. It could be a negotiating tactic, or a sign that Mr. Bannon is not the focus of the investigation.  meant to be a long-awaited discussion of border walls turned into an impromptu interrogation   — or did not use — last week to describe African countries. “I don’t dispute that the president was using tough language,” said Kirstjen Nielsen, the Homeland Security secretary, above, but she denied hearing Mr. Trump call African nations “shithole countries.” The Trump administration, meanwhile,   with a report that concluded that three out of four convicted terrorists in the U.S. were foreign-born. Ms. Nielsen called the data “truly chilling.” But the statistics were notable as much for what they did not contain as for what they did. overall health was “excellent,”   after a medical exam. But the president’s weight is 239 pounds and, according to the doctor, he does not get enough exercise. “I’ve found no reason whatsoever to think the president has any issues whatsoever with his thought processes,” the physician said. And Mr. Trump will need that mental stamina: A government shutdown could come at the end of this week if Congress doesn’t reach a deal on a spending bill.   for lawmakers in both parties. _____ , this time in Japan. Just days after the state government of Hawaii accidentally sent a cellphone alert that North Korea had launched a missile and that citizens should take shelter —  . One big difference: It took Hawaii nearly 40 minutes to correct the mistake; in Japan it took five. _____  emerged from Southern California, where the police reported  , some in chains, by their own parents, above. The discovery came after one sibling, a girl, escaped and called the police, who rescued her 12 brothers and sisters, some shackled to their beds. The officers did not immediately realize that seven of the siblings were adults because they were emaciated. In fact, they range in age from 2 to 29. The girl who called the police, officials said, looked to be 10, but was actually 17. _____   An article published by a feminist website that accuses the actor and comedian Aziz Ansari of sexual misconduct is “arguably the worst thing that has happened to the #MeToo movement,”  . To lump a lousy romantic encounter in with the same movement that brought down men who abused their power “trivializes what #MeToo first stood for,” she said. _____    and there is no shortage of reasons for the prices to climb higher. And   in the $1.5 trillion tax overhaul. And in another win for banks,   that were put in place after the 2008 financial crisis. Separately, it was a  , which took on a $6.2 billion charge to pay for problems in its finance unit. _____  is driven by greed — but the fever for cryptocurrency could eventually  . (Even if it’s a bit complicated.) To investigate, we went inside the  . We found a tightknit group of friends — developers, libertarians, Redditors and cypherpunks — who talk about changing the world order. _____ , our literary critic wondered what the author of “American Pastoral,” “I Married a Communist” and “The Plot Against America” makes of this strange period we are living in now. Here,  , the (former) novelist shares his thoughts on President Trump, #MeToo and retirement. And here’s another tribute to  , above, the lead singer of the Irish rock band the Cranberries who died on Monday in London. _____  late night hosts like Stephen Colbert, above, and Jimmy Fallon weren’t about to let President Trump’s reported remarks about Haiti and certain African countries go away. : “Former White House communications director Anthony Scaramucci defended Trump, saying, ‘At the end of the day, he’s not a racist.’ Then he said, ‘During the day, it’s a different story.’” Have a great night. _____
Several years ago, tech enthusiasts in San Francisco began buzzing about a new and mysterious thing called Bitcoin. There were rumors that the virtual money, invented by a pseudonymous math genius named Satoshi Nakamoto, would revolutionize modern finance and render government-backed currency obsolete. Or maybe it was just a passing fad. I wanted to understand the phenomenon for myself. So in 2013, I  , a clunky and labor-intensive process that involved going to a CVS and using MoneyGram to wire the dollar value of a Bitcoin — which was around $140 at the time — to a cryptocurrency exchange. I sold my Bitcoin a week later for a small loss, thoroughly unimpressed with the experience and pessimistic about the virtual money’s prospects. “The Bitcoin dream is all but dead,” I  . Hoo boy, did I blow it. Today, the Bitcoin I sold for about $140 would be worth  , and cryptomania has  . As of this week, Bitcoin futures are trading on the Chicago Board Options Exchange, and Coinbase, the largest consumer trading platform for Bitcoin, briefly   last week because of a huge influx of traffic. And while   that the exuberance around Bitcoin is a classic sign of a bubble, few think it will disappear altogether even in the event of a crash. [ ] What happened? Why did so many people — myself included — get Bitcoin so spectacularly wrong? After a couple of weeks of thinking about it, I can point to at least five bad assumptions I made. In the early days of Bitcoin, its proponents envisioned people using cryptocurrencies to buy food, pay their rent and make other day-to-day purchases. Eager to bring Bitcoin to the mainstream, they set up   to facilitate easy transfers and encouraged their local restaurants and bars to start accepting Bitcoin payments. Today, though, hardly anyone is spending Bitcoin on actual goods and services. (Why would you, if the value could jump 40 percent in two days, as it did last week?) And few merchants have gone through the hassle of updating their systems to accept cryptocurrency. “The disparity between virtually no merchant acceptance and Bitcoin’s rapid appreciation is striking,” a team of Morgan Stanley economists  . As it turns out, while few people want to use Bitcoin as a currency, plenty want to treat it as an investable security, similar to gold or silver, especially while the price keeps rising. One of the earliest predictions among Bitcoin skeptics and boosters alike was that Bitcoin itself would be just a predecessor technology to the real, lasting innovation: the blockchain — the peer-to-peer ledger system that records cryptocurrency transactions and allows them to operate without a central authority. I agreed, thinking that the blockchain had real promise, but that Bitcoin would ultimately fade away. Four years later, there has, in fact, been enormous hype around blockchain projects. (One British company added the word “blockchain” to its name and   nearly 400 percent.) But that frenzy hasn’t detracted from investor enthusiasm for Bitcoin itself — in fact, it has amplified it. And the potential applicability of blockchain technology to all kinds of different industries, from   to   to  , has inspired lots of non-techies to learn about cryptocurrencies, and served as an intellectual on-ramp for new Bitcoin investors. In the frontier days of cryptocurrency, it seemed that every other story was about how criminals and tax-evaders were using Bitcoin to buy and sell illegal goods and services. A huge dark-net narcotics market, Silk Road, was broken up, and its owner was   to life in prison. Several large cryptocurrency sites suffered   and thefts. It was easy to think that these problems would lead regulators to take swift action against Bitcoin. But regulators have been  . The I.R.S. didn’t issue official guidance on the tax treatment of Bitcoin and other digital currencies until 2014, and the Securities and Exchange Commission has just   to look at whether  , a kind of public auction of new cryptocurrencies, should be more closely regulated. [ ] Partly, this is because some Trump-era regulators seem more interested in   than making new ones. But it’s also a reflection of the way regulators tend to operate — many are reactive, and Bitcoin is still a relatively esoteric product that hasn’t claimed many real-world victims yet. There might well be a regulatory reckoning as Bitcoin moves closer to the mainstream, but for now, it’s still the Wild West. Back in 2013, when I began asking Wall Street bankers about Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies, their reactions ranged from polite dismissal to outright mockery. Few thought digital currency had any chance of succeeding, and many shared the view of Jamie Dimon, the chief executive of JPMorgan Chase, who has   that would only appeal to murderers and drug dealers. But banks are ultimately service businesses, and I underestimated Wall Street’s philosophical flexibility when confronted with a new product that its clients really wanted to trade. Now, in the same way that the rise of junk bonds created an entirely new lucrative finance niche in the 1980s, Bitcoin’s rapid ascent has pulled even the most traditional financial institutions into the fray. There are now dozens of  , and even Goldman Sachs is   for some clients. The arrival of institutional investors into the cryptocurrency market has begun to make Bitcoin look less like a fringe technology project, and more like any other securities market. When Bitcoin’s price was swinging wildly between $100 and $200, sometimes within a few days, I thought to myself, “Who would sign up for such a roller-coaster ride?” I naïvely thought that what people liked about money was its stability, and knowing that $100 today would still be worth $100 tomorrow. But you know what’s more popular than stable monetary instruments? Casinos! People love to gamble, and the spectacular rise of Bitcoin — especially in the age of social media, which tends to hasten trends and encourage bandwagon behavior — has encouraged a set of thrill-seeking speculators to bet big on the currency, hoping to make a quick buck and get out before a crash. This behavioral dynamic should have been clear to me earlier. In a low-interest-rate environment, when many of the fastest-growing companies are privately held and  , there aren’t many investments that can produce outsize returns for the average person. Many Bitcoin buyers aren’t bothered that their $100 could become $200 overnight, or crash to $10 — in fact, that’s part of the appeal. Real Bitcoin enthusiasts, of course, will say that I’m still missing the point, and that today’s trading mania is just a prelude to an even bigger, more transformational era of cryptocurrency. And while I still have my doubts, I can’t credibly predict that they’re wrong. After all, look what happened the first time.
